=========================
volum1
=========================
Subscriber’s  resolutions  发起人决议书
Resolutions of  the First director  首席董事决议书
Resolutions of the Sole Director of the Compay 公司唯一董事决议书
Share transferr  股权转让书
Original copy of the Cerificate of Incorporate企业登记证原件
A stamped Memorandum and Articles of Association   M&A  :公司章程原件
Copies of M&A 公司章程复印件
Regist of Members ,Directors ,Officers,Transfer and Changes　公司成员/董事/职员登记册和股份转让
A booklet of share certifcates 股权证明
Compay seal and chop 公司钢印和图章
Copy  of  Filling  Schedule  of  Cayman  Islands Compaies 开曼公司文件登记时间表  
Advance/ Decline Line   A/D   - Define meaning of the word Advance Decline Line
     A technical analysis market timing tool used as an indicator of market movement. The A/D line is derived from the total number of stocks that advanced versus the total number of stocks that declined in price each day on the New York Stock Exchange.
技术指标中英文对照
绝对幅度指标  absolute breadth index  
累积/派发线  accumulation/distribution line  
累积摆动指标  accumulation swing index  
上涨/下跌线  advance/decline line  
上涨/下跌比率  advance/decline ratio  
上涨-下跌值  advancing-declining issues  
价格上涨、价格下跌和价格不变的证券成交量  advancing，declining，unchanged volume  
安德鲁斯干草叉  andrews s pitchfork  
阿木思指标  arms index  trin    
阿隆指标  aroon  
平均真实区域  average true range  
布林带  bollinger bands  
宽度突破  breadth thrust  
牛/熊比率  bull/bear ratio  
日本烛形图  又称蜡烛图    candlesticks，japanese  
肯思里姆  canslim  
蔡金货币流量  chaikin money flow  
蔡金摆动指标  chaikin oscillator  
钱德动量摆动指标  chande momentum oscillator  
商品通道指标  commodity channel index  
商品选择指标  commodity selection index  
相关分析  correlation analysis  
累积成交量指标  cumulative volume index  
周期  cycles  
需求指标  demand index  
非趋势价格摆动指标  detrended price oscillator  
动向指标  directional movement  
双指数移动平均线  double exponential moving average  
道氏理论  dow theory  
动态动量指标  dynamic momentum index  
轻松移动指标  ease of movement  
有效市场理论  efficient market theory  
爱略特波浪理论  elliott wave theory  
轨道  交易带    envelopes  trading bands    
等成交量  equivolume  
斐波纳契研究  fibonacci studies  
预测摆动指标  forecast oscillator  
百分之四模型  four percent model  
傅立叶转换  fourier transform  
基本分析  fundamental analysis  
江恩角  gann angles  
哈里克获利指标  herrick payoff index  
惯性指标  inertia  
利率  interest rates  
日内动量指标  intraday momentum index  
卡吉图  kagi  
克林格成交量摆动指标  klinger oscillator  
大宗交易比率  large block ratio  
线性回归指标  linear regression indicator  
线性回归斜率指标  linear regression slope  
线性回归趋势线  linear regression trendlines  
市场便利指标  market facilitation index  
质量指标  mass index  
迈克勒兰摆动指标  mcclellan oscillator  
迈克勒兰和指标  mcclellan summation index  
中间价格指标  median price  
会员空头比率指标  member short ratio  
山形正弦波指标  mesa sine wave  
动量指标  momentum  
货币流量指标  money flow index  
平滑异同平均指标  moving average convergence/divergence  
移动平均指标  moving averages  
负量指标  negative volume index  
新高-新低累积指标  new highs-lows cumulative  
新高/新低比率  new highs/lows ratio  
新高-新低指标  new highs-new lows  
零股平衡指标  odd lot balance index  
零股买入/卖出指标  odd lot purchases/sales  
零股卖空比率  odd lot short ratio  
欧得思概率锥形曲线  odds probability cones  
平衡交易量  on balance volume  
未平仓合约  open interest  
公开-10交易指标  open-10 trin  
期权分析  option analysis  
超买/超卖指标  overbought/oversold  
抛物线状的止损与反转  parabolic sar  
形态  patterns  
百分比回落  percent retracement  
表现指标  performance  
点值图  point and figure  
极化分形效率指标  polarized fractal efficiency  
正量指标  positive volume index  
价量趋势指标  price and volume trend  
价格通道  price channel  
价格摆动指标  price oscillator  
价格的变动率指标  price rate-of-change  
投射带  projection bands  
投射摆动指标  projection oscillator  
公众空头比率  public short ratio  
看跌/看涨比率  puts/calls ratio  
q棒指标  qstick  
四等分线  quadrant lines  
R的平方指标  r-squared  
拉弗回归通道  raff regression channel  
随机行走指标  random walk index  
区域指标  range indicator  
矩形  rectangle  
相对动量指标  relative momentum index  
比较相对强弱指标  relative strength，comparative  
相对强弱指标  relative strength index  
相对波动性指标  relative volatility index  
忍蔻图  renko  
速度阻力线  speed resistance lines  
价差  spreads  
标准离差  standard deviation  
标准离差通道  standard deviation channel  
标准误差  standard error  
标准误差带  standard error bands  
标准误差通道  standard error channel  
斯蒂克斯  stix  
随机动量指标  stochastic momentum index  
随机摆动指标  stochastic oscillator  
摆动指标  swing index  
三重指数移动平均  tema  
三线突破  three line break  
时间系列预测  time series forecast  
泰龙水平线  tirone levels  
总卖空比率  total short ratio  
交易量指标  trade volume index  
趋势线  trendlines  
契克斯  trix  
典型价格  typical price  
终极摆动指标  ultimate oscillator  
上涨/下跌量比  upside/downside ratio  
上涨/下跌量指标  upside/downside volume  
垂直水平过滤指标  vertical horizontal filter  
蔡金波动性指标  volatility，chaikin s  
成交量指标  volume  
成交量摆动指标  volume oscillator  
成交量变动率  volume rate-of-change  
加权收盘价  weighted close  
威尔德平滑  wilder s smoothing  
威廉姆斯累积/派发指标
  williams s accumulation/distribution  
威廉姆斯%r  williams s %r  
之字形指标  zig zag  
Short Interest  空头净额
The total number of shares of a security that have been sold short by customers and securities firms
Short Interest Ratio 空方比率
A sentiment indicator that is derived by dividing the short interest by the average daily volume for a stock. This indicator is used by both fundamental and technical traders to identify the prevailing sentiment the market has for a specific stock. Also known as the "short ratio".

Sell Side　
The retail brokers and research departments that sell securities and make ecommendations for brokerage firms' custoers

Road Show 路演
A presentation by an issuer of securities to potential buyers. It is intended to create interest in the securities.

flat fee 固定费用，统一费用;平价

fraught  adj.  [仅用作表语]1. 装着...的2. 充满...的; 隐藏...的; 伴随着...的 with  
a policy fraught with danger充满危险的政策
n.  [苏]  船上的  货物, 装载物
pick up the tab  替人付帐
itinerary  n.  旅程, 游记, 旅行指南   adj.  巡回的, 旅程的, 游历的
tour      n.  旅行, 旅游, 游历        v.  旅行, 巡回, 周游; 周游, 游历, 观光
contingent  n.1. 偶然的事， 意外的事2. 部分， 份儿3. 分遣队； 分舰队； 代表团
contingent of students学生名额contingents of the people's militia民兵师
The young heir's contingent of the estate was smaller than he had hoped for.
这位年轻的继承人所得的遗产份儿比他希望的要少。
adj.1. 临时的， 偶然的； 应急的2. 或有的， 不是逻辑上必然的3. 伴随的4. 视情况而发生的a contingent event意外事件a contingent fund应急费用contingent fee成功后才给的报酬（如胜诉后付给律师的酬金）
Whether or not we arrive on time is  contingent on the weather.
我们是否按时到达要视天气情况而定。
contingently  adv.  偶然， 意外， 相应地， 看情况
contingent on/upon  视...而定 be contingent to　依/视…而定
plagiarism  n.1.   文章、学说等的  剽窃, 抄袭2. 剽窃物
plagiaristn.  剽窃者, 抄袭者   Cristic  adj.  剽窃的, 抄袭的
recognized   adj.  公认的; 经过证明的; 普遍接受的
appropriate  v.  拨出; 挪用, 盗用; 占用 adj.  适当的, 恰当的, 相称的
compromise  n.1. 妥协， 和解2. 妥协［折衷］办法， 和解契约3. 中间物， 折衷物4. 损害; 连累; 危及make compromise with与...妥协compromise of principle原则上的让步vt.1. 和解， 对...妥协， 折衷处理2.危及， 连累3. 放弃（原则， 利益）; 泄露（秘密）compromise a lawsuit和解诉讼compromise sb.'s reputation损害某人的名誉vi.1. 和解， 互让了事2. 姑息， 妥协， 退让
in the context of  在...情况下
ibidem         adv.  同一个地方; 同前所述; 出处同上   abbr 缩写 ibid  
knowingly     adv.  熟悉地; 故意地; 会意地;有意地
reference       n.1. 参考, 查询[阅], 询问, 访问2. 提到, 涉[论]及, 有关系[联]3. 职[授]权范围4. 证明, 介绍; 证明[介绍]信[人] 有关某人品格或能力的）证明文书, 介绍信; 证明人;推荐函5. 参考文献[资料, 书目, 符号, 电源], 说明书, 附[旁]注, 引证[用], 出处6. 基准(点), 标准, 依据, 坐标, 标记7. 读数起点位置[条件]
civil disobedience  ph. 不合作主义;(以拒绝遵守政府法令,拒绝纳税等方式进行的)非暴力反抗 温和抵抗 和平抵抗
conference call   ph.. 电话会议
unsolicited       adj.  未经请求的; 主动提供的; 自发的; 无缘无故的; 多事的; 多余的
Secondary Offering  证券第二次发行
1. The issuance of new stock for public sale from a company that has already made its initial public offering (IPO). Usually, these kinds of public offerings are made by companies wishing to refinance, or raise capital for growth. Money raised from these kinds of secondary offerings goes to the company, through the investment bank that underwrites the offering. Investment banks are issued an allotment, and possibly an overallotment which they may choose to exercise if there is a strong possibility of making money on the spread between the allotment price and the selling price of the securities.
2. A sale of securities in which one or more major stockholders in a company sell all or a large portion of their holdings. The proceeds of this sale are paid to the stockholders that sell their shares. Often, the company that issued the shares holds a large percentage of the stocks it issues.
Allotment  配股 
首次公开上市中向各承销机构分配，容许其出售的股份。其余股份会分给其他取得上市股份出售权的证券公司
     During an IPO, this is the number of shares granted to each participating underwriting firm that they are permitted to sell. Remaining surpluses are then given to other firms which have won the bid for the right to sell the IPO.
buy out  买下全部产权,购入全部股权 买下...的全部股份
      Buy out the exclusive selling right  独家经销权
      aving bought out all his partners he now owns the whole company.
他买下合伙人的全部股份，现在整个公司是他的了。
quiet period  静默期　静止期
In terms of an IPO, the period where an issuer is subject to a SEC ban on promotional publicity. The quiet period usually lasts either 40 or 90 days from the IPO.
	在首次公开上市的过程中，静止期指美国证监会禁止发行人进行公开推销活动的时期。静止期一般为发行后的40至90日
refute  vt.驳斥, 驳倒, 反驳
Ballot  (尤指无记名的)投票
The documentation representing a shareholder's decision when a company's ownership group votes on corporate issues. Ballots are usually dispersed at annual meetings, when shareholders vote in the board of directors.
custody  n.1. 监督; 监视; 保护2. 监护, 看守; 拘留, 监禁3保管, 照顾, 保护
child custody儿童保护
safe custody保管(文件、财物密封后交银行保管)
A father has the custody of his children when they are young.
孩子年幼时, 做父亲的有监护的责任。
His car was held in the custody of the police.
他的汽车被警察扣压。
Takeover Bid  收购出价
A type of corporate action in which an acquiring company makes an offer to the target company's shareholders to buy the target company's shares in order to gain control of the business. Takeover bids can either be friendly or hostile.
    指一家公司为收购另一家公司而开出的收购条件。出价可以是现金，也可以是股票，或两者混合的方式。收购条件通常会设定有效期。收购可以是敌意的（即没有获得收购目标的同意或合作），也可以是善意的（即已获收购目标接受）。
take-over offer  purchasing order  收购要约
Tender Offer  股权收购要约  收购一家企业部分或所有股东股份的建议。收购建议的价值一般高于市场价格
      An offer to purchase some or all of shareholders' shares in a corporation. The price offered is usually at a premium to the market price.
perpetuate  vt.  使永存, 使不朽, 保持
pro rata  按比例
Risk tolerance  风险容忍度
投资者对于投资组合价值负面变化方面的不明朗因素的可接受程度
The degree of uncertainty that an investor can handle in regard to a negative change in the value of his or her portfolio.
casualty insurance  意外保险,伤害保险,灾害保险
property insurance  财产保险
whistleblowing  告密 揭发
contract worker  n.合同工
intern　　vt.1. (尤指战时)拘留2. 软禁vi.1. 做实习医师(或实习教师、实习生)n.1. 实习医师;实习教师;实习生 unpaid intern
      I worked as an intern in that firm last summer. 去年夏天我在那家商行实习。
      Xinhua News Agency, Hangzhou, September 1st, by reporter Guoxian Zhu and intern Zhehui Guan   新华社杭州九月一日电（记者朱国贤、实习生管哲晖）
Condominium   n. 【美】各户有独立产权的公寓(大厦)
contingent n.1. 偶然的事， 意外的事2. 部分， 份儿	3. 分遣队； 分舰队； 代表团contingent of students学生名额contingents of the people's militia民兵师
The young heir's contingent of the estate was smaller than he had hoped for.
这位年轻的继承人所得的遗产份儿比他希望的要少。
adj.1. 临时的， 偶然的； 应急的2. 或有的， 不是逻辑上必然的3. 伴随的4. 视情况而发生的a contingent event意外事件a contingent fund应急费用contingent fee成功后才给的报酬（如胜诉后付给律师的酬金）
Whether or not we arrive on time is  contingent on the weather.
我们是否按时到达要视天气情况而定。
contingently  adv.  偶然， 意外， 相应地， 看情况
contingent on  视...而定contingent upon  视...而定
compliance system   合规制度
Compliance Department  合规部 稽核部
The department within a brokerage firm that oversees the trading and market-making activities of the firm.
compliance procedure  合规性程序  符合程序
system of checks and balances 制约和平衡的体制 监督制衡体系 权力制衡机制
reminder  n.1. 提醒者[物], 令人回忆的东西, 纪念品2. 提[暗]示, 信号, 通知3. 
【商】催单a reminder slip催询单a reminder tray意见箱a gentle reminder暗示
Co. ,Ltd  =Company Limited 有限公司
inc.  n.股份有限公司 Incorporated
accountable  a.  负有责任的, 可说明的, 可解释的[经] 负有责任的
be accountable to sb for sth
memo  n.便笺  备忘录
thoroughness  n.  完全, 十分 彻底性 精确
     The main credit for the success of the test attaches to the thoroughness in their work.这次试验之所以成功，主要归功于他们工作中一丝不苟的精神。
philosophy  n.1. 哲学2. 哲理3. 人生观4. (某一学科)基本原理5. (除医学、法律、神学外的)所有学科; [古]自然科学6. 伦理学7. 哲人态度, 达观, 冷静8. 对知识的热爱
adhere to1. 粘附Mud adhered to our shoes.我们的鞋上沾着泥。
2. 坚持She adhered to what she had said at the meeting.她坚持她在会议上说过的话。  3. 拥护;支持
pretext n.1. 借口, 托词2. 假象, 掩饰(for)He used his sore throat as a pretext for not going to school.他以喉痛作为不去学校的借口。
vt. 以...为借口, 假托pretext an early appointment in town next morning以第二天早晨镇上有约会为借口　　　find a pretext for为...找口实make a pretext of  以...作口实
on some pretext or other  用某种借口under[on, upon] the pretext of  以...为借口
identify　　vt.1. 确认;识别;鉴定,验明[(+as)]She identified him as her attacker.她认出他就是袭击她的人。I cannot identify this signature.我识别不出这是谁的签字。
2. 视...(与...)为同一事物[(+with)]
Never identify wealth with happiness.
千万不要把财富和幸福等同起来。
3. 使参与;使合作[(+with)]；支持
The politician refused to identify himself with the Administration's foreign policy.
那位政治家拒不支持政府的外交政策。
4. 发现,确定
vi.1. (与...)认同;一致;感同身受[(+with)]
I identified with the heroine of the novel.
我与小说中的那个女主人公感同身受。
decline  vt.1. 谢绝, 拒绝, 推辞2.使下降; 倾斜; 使(头)低垂3. 【语】使变化(名词、代词、形容词等的)词尾
decline an offer   拒绝请求     decline an invitation谢绝邀请
decline to answer a question    拒绝回答问题
vi.1. 谢绝, 拒绝2.下倾, 下降, 下垂3. 倾斜, 偏斜4. 衰落, 衰退, 减退5. 跌落, 减低; 降落6. 降格; 屈尊7.接近结束, 接近尾声8. 【天】沉没
substantiate 　 vt.  使具体[实体]化; 证实[证明]某事有根据
substantiation  n.  1. 具体化; 证实 substantiator 2. 证明人，证人
prowess　　　　n.[U]1. 英勇，勇敢;无畏2. 非凡的能力;高超的本领，超凡技术
prominent  adj.1. 突出的; 突起的, 凸起的2. 杰出的; 著名的; 显著的; 主要的,重要的
Write-Up　增记　提高帐面价值　（提高资产的账面价值，因为相对市场价值估值过低
计算根据当时市场价格、面值、息票利率以及距离到期日时间，也假设所有息票以同样的利率进行再投资）
An increase made to the book value of an asset because it is undervalued compared to market values.
stake 　n.  桩,
 stakes (a) [pl]奖金（尤指赛马的）　　　　the stake（旧时的）火刑柱 　　　　投资; 投放的本钱　　　at stake　在胜败关头; 冒风险
v.  把...押下打赌, 拿...冒险; 以桩支撑; 系...于桩上; 用桩标出的界限
　　　　资助, 支持（某人/某事物）
close out  平仓
referrall fees 介绍费
consideration  n.1. 考虑， 思考； 顾虑2. （为别人）着想； 体谅3. 考虑的因素， 原因； 考虑的结果4. 重要性5. 报酬，酬金
　　　in consideration of sth 作为对...的回报; 考虑到
compromise  n. 妥协, 折衷案, 折衷v. 互让解决;放弃;连累,危及/害; 泄露; 妥协, 让步
undermine 　 v.  渐渐破坏, 暗地里破坏, 挖掘地基
proprietary product 专有/利产品
tip off  　　向...泄露, 告诫
exposure  暴露风险,承受风险,风险
discretionary adj.  任意的, 无条件的
discretion  n.1. 判断(力), 辨别(力)2. 慎重, 谨慎3. [古]离散,分立;不连续4. 自行处理,【律】任意决定权act at [on] one's discretion  自行决断
Non-discretionary funds　　　　　非任意基金   
Discretionary Fund Management  代客操作业务(
discretionary income 　　　　　　　自由支配收入;自由支配所得
sub-  pref 前缀  ( 与名词和形容词结合) 在...之下; 低於...:  ( 与名词结合) 级别较低的; 次於...的:  与形容词结合) 不完全的; 近似的: (与动词和名词结合)（形成）...之较小的或次要的部分: 
subadvisor   次/副/子顾问
evergreen  长年信用
A contract provision that automatically renews the length of the agreement after a predetermined period, unless notice for termination is given. Evergreens are often used for long term agreements such as memberships or maintenance contracts
mezzanine             n.  夹楼; 戏院最底层楼厅; 中层楼; 舞台下房间
Mezzanine Financing  夹层融资
1. 收购项目采用的股本融资方式，利用优先股及可转换证券扩大目标公司的规模
2. 结合债务及股票的融资活动
A hybrid of debt and equity financing that is is typically used to finance the expansion of existing companies. Mezzanine financing is basically debt capital that gives the lender the rights to convert to an ownership or equity interest in the company if the loan is not paid back in time and in full. It is generally subordinated to debt provided by senior lenders such as banks and venture capital companies. 
     Since mezzanine financing is usually provided to the borrower very quickly with little due diligence on the part of the lender and little or no collateral on the part of the borrower, this type of financing is aggressively priced with the lender seeking a return in the 20-30% range. 
fund of funds  综合基金
A mutual fund that invests in other mutual funds. This method is sometimes known as "multi-management". 
registration statement   n.有价证券申请上市登记表
outside director   不参与管理的董事 外部董事--并非公司员工或权益方的董事会成员
     Any member of a company's board of directors who is not an employee or stakeholder in the company.
Independent Directors          独立董事
a general manager secretary　　总经理秘书
emerging market               新兴市场
token       n.  标记, 标志; 纪念品; 象征; 代价券, 筹码
adj.  作为标记的; 意思意思的; 象征性的; 充场面的
original adj.1. 最初的; 最早的; 原始的; 固有的, 本来的2. 正本的, 原作品的
3. 新颖的; 新奇的; 崭新的4. 有独创见解的; 有独创性的5. 原作者的
n.1. 原物; 原作品; 原文; 正本2. 有独创性的人; 有独到见解的人3. 原型(依据真人[事]形象地描绘); 原形图[像]4. 古怪的人
tax evasion  逃税; 漏税
Local society 当地社会　乡土社会　基层社会
cold call  主动与准客户接触　　意外访问
round up  清盘　综述；总结; 摘要　集中　把...聚集在一起; 包围; 兜扑; 把...(按回舍五入法)调高为整数/向上舍入　　（人p 动物或事物的）聚集; 聚拢　
credential n.1. 凭证2. [pl.]信任状, 证书; 国书3. (学历, 资历, 资格或成就等)背景
present one's credentials呈递国书credentials committee资格审查委员会
be in good standing with sb.  得到某人的好感或欢心
in good standing  　　　　　　遵守规章的[地]; 交清费用的[地]; 声誉良好的[地]
social standing社会地位business standing营业状况commercial standing商业信用
securityn.1. 平安; 安全(感)；安全性2. 确信; 安心3. 保护, 防御; 防御物; 保护物(against; from)4. 治安防卫(措施); [常Security ]治安防卫当局5. 【律】保证; 抵押6. 担保品, 保证人7. [常用复]证券, 债券8. 疏忽; 过度自信
capital appreciation  资本增值　　资本升值　　capital  depreciate 资本贬值
anonymous   adj.1.匿名的; 无名的; 假名的; 不具名的2. 无个性特征的
anonymously  adv.  不具名地; 化名地
furtive  adj.1. 偷偷摸摸的, 鬼鬼祟祟的2. 狡猾的 be furtive in one's action 行动鬼祟
            3.私下的, 隐密的, 秘密的
liaison  n.联络 联系  私通   组织内单位间的交流与合作 a liaison officer 联络官
Boutique  精品店
A small investment firm specializing in offering specific, but limited services to a select number of individuals.
penny stock  n.价格低下的普通股
　　A stock that trades at a relatively low price and market capitalization, usually outside of the major market exchanges. These types of stocks are generally considered to be highly speculative and high risk because of their lack of liquidity, large bid-ask spreads, small capitalization and limited following and disclosure. They will often trade over the counter through the OTCBB and pink sheets. 
labor union  工会
rock the boat　　把事情打乱搞糟
make waves　　掀起风波、打乱现状
hold water　　“滴水不漏”　比喻确实可靠经得起严密审查
high and dry　　处于一筹莫展的困境的
recreation 　　　n.  消遣; 休养; 娱乐, 游戏
windsurfer 　　　n.  风帆冲浪板; 风帆冲浪运动员
avid  　　　　adj.1. 渴望的; 贪婪的　~ (for sth) 2. 热心的 
be avid for (praise)  渴望(得到表扬)　　be avid of (money)贪(财)
in trust  被托管
ambiguous  adj.1. 有两种或 多种意思的2. 含糊的, 模棱两可的, 暧昧的3. 多重性的; 可疑的; 分歧的4. 二价的; 双原子价的
ambiguity  n.含糊,模糊点,分岐
retroactive adj.  反动的, 有追溯力的, 追溯的
equitable adj. 公平的, 公正的, 合理的
stifle  vt.1. 使窒息2. 镇压, 阻止(反叛等)3. 藏匿(up)4. [美俚]打垮
vi.1. 憋闷; 窒息(而死)2. 抑制  n.  (马、狗的)后膝关节
entrant n.1. 进入者2. 新加入者; 新会员; (刚入大学的)新生; 新就业者3. 参加竞赛[赛跑]者
viable  adj.1. 能维持下去的2. 有生存能力的3. 可行的4. (胎儿等)能活的; 子宫外能活的5. (种子等)能萌发的6. 实际的; 可实施的
generic  adj.  (=generical)1. 一般的, 普通的2. 【生】属的, 类的3. (商品)未注册的4. 
【语】全称的, 总称的n.  (=a generic drug)未注册的药品
grind out  . 费力地做出
by all means  尽一切办法,务必 无论如何
forgo  vt.  (-went; -gone)摒绝, 放弃; 对...断念; 谢绝
strike  　　执行价
preamble n.1. 序言, 绪论; (条约等的)前言; 开场白2. 预兆性事件; 开端
vi.  作序言[绪论]　　　　without preamble  开门见山地, 直截了当地
histogram 柱状图     tree diagram  树形图
polygon  多边形　多角形
quartile  四分位数  quintile 五分位数  decile十分位数  percentile百分位数
the lognormal distribution 对数正态分布 
quantile n.【统】分位数  fractile  n. 分位数值(分位点)
embark  v1. 搭载(飞机), 上船(on)2. 开始, 从事, 着手搞; 投资(in, on, upon)
be grounded in  以...为基础,以...为根据
scenario(s)   n.  情节, 剧情，情景，方案, 剧本
erratum n.  (pl.-ta [-tE])(书写或印刷中的)错误; [pl. ]勘误表 errata  erratum 的复数
toolkit  工具包 工具箱; 一套程序改良工具, 一组用作特别装置程序或用新式方法程序基础的程序或过程 (计算机用语)
tenure   n.1. (财产、职位等的)占有(期, 权, 条件)，职位保有权，任期，保有权（期）
2. (土地的)使用(权, 期), 所有权3. 保有, 享有
comprehensive  adj.1. 广泛的， 全面的， 综合的； 综合教育的
2. 有理解力的； 容易了解的
ethical  adj.1. 伦理的, 伦理学的2. (合乎职业)道德的; (药品)合乎规格的; 凭处方出售的
grapple  v 1. 抓紧[住],钩住2. 扭打, 徒手格斗(with)3. 设法解决 with
effectively grapple with problems    有效地解决问题
reassure  v.  使放心, 使消除疑虑; 给...再保险; 向...再保证
instill    vt.1. 徐徐滴入[(+into)]2. 逐渐灌输;徐徐地教导[(+in/into)] 逐渐培养
tandem n.  两匹马拉的双轮马车, 双座脚踏车　双人或多人骑的）串联式自行车.
　 in tandem  一前一后地; 排成纵列: 协力地in tandem with  同...串联, 同...合作
fiduciary  n.受托人，受托者，受信托人adj.  基于信用的; 受信托的; 信托的
substantive  n.  实词, 独立存在的实体, 名词adj.  表示实在的, 独立的, 有实质的，本质的, 坚固的，大量的，真正的
imperative  n.  命令; 需要; 诫命adj.  命令式的, 势在必行的, 急需的
go well  　进展顺利
cosmetic  adj.1. 化妆用的； 美容的， 2. 装点门面的；装饰性的；表面的n.化装品
legitimate  v.  认为正当, 使合法, 立为嫡嗣　adj. 合法的, 合理的，正当的，婚生的
contingency  n.  偶然; 意外事故; 可能性【统】列联【数】相切; 偶然误差， 偶然错误
bylaw  　　n.  地方法规; 细则, 附则; 内部章程
proceeding  n.1. 程序, 进行; 进程2. 行为, 行动; 做法3. [pl. ]【律】诉讼程序
4. [pl. ]事项, 项目5. [pl. ] 记录, 会议录; 年[学]报; (科学文献)汇编，会议议程
oversight 　　 n.1. 监督, 监视; 看管2. 疏忽, 漏失, 失察, 失错
sanction 　　n.1. 批准; 承认, 同意2. (使法律得到遵守的)赏罚; 处罚;【律】惩罚
proctor  n.  代理人, 代诉人,[美]监考人，[英]校/学监
ramification  n分枝, 分叉; 分歧, 分裂; 分枝状; 分枝法2. 支流, 支派; 区分, 门类
3. 衍生物，派生影响; 结果, 后果，
peer  n.  同等的人; 贵族; 同辈, 同事; 上院议员　v.  凝视, 盯着看; 出现; 隐约出现
construe v.  解释, 逐字翻译, 分析; 作句法分析
imminent  adj.  即将来临的; 逼近的
perpetrate vt.1. 犯(罪, 错误), 荒谬的事2. 开玩笑, 胡说, 行诈3. 笨拙地实施或表演
perpetrator  n.犯罪者/罪犯　
dilemma  n.1. 左右为难的状况,进退两难的困境，窘境energy dilemma 能源危机
2. 【逻】双关论法, 两刀论法, 二难推论
protocol n.1. (外交的)议定书; 会谈记录[备忘录]2. (条约等的)草案; 草约; (罗马教皇诏书等的)首尾程式3. 礼仪, 礼节4. [the Protocol ]法国外交部的礼宾司
vt., vi.1. (把...)记入议定书2. 打(草稿), 拟(草案)
prospect 　n. 景色, 展望,希望v. 勘探, 寻找;勘探,有前途in prospect可期待;在考虑中
prospectus  　招股章程；发行章程　公开说明书
absolve  v.  使免除; 赦免...的罪; 宽恕
sever  vt.1. 切割; 割断2. 断绝, 隔离, 终止; 离间; 使...分离3. 【律】分割(产业等); 分别处理4. 区别
refrain  vi., vt.1. 忍住;抑制, 制止2. 戒除(from)3. 避免[开]
punitive  adj.(=punitory)给予惩罚的; 惩罚(性)的; 刑罚的
jeopardize (Amer.)  v.  危害, 使陷危地, 使受危困
coerce  胁迫,强迫，强制
symbion  n.  共生体; 共生生物
symbiotic adj.  共栖的, 共生的
remuneration  酬金；薪酬；报酬
seminar  n.会议,会议; (大学)研究班,研讨会，研究班讨论会[课程]; [美]专家讨论会
proxy statement  n.委托书
conference call  电话会议
venue　　　n.  犯罪地点, 集合地点, 审判地
retaliate  vi.(向某人)报仇, 反击(upon, against); 为某事进行反击; 倒算(for)
vt.  回报, 报复; 征收报复关税　　　-ation  n.  报复; 反击; 倒算-ative, -atory
retaliatory  adj.  报复的; 回敬的; 报复性的
reprisal  n.1. (指国家间的)暴力性报复, 报复行为; 报复性劫掠[拘押]2. [常用复]赔偿[款]
perception  n.  知觉, 领悟力, 感觉，觉察
soft dollar practice  收取非金钱利益的做法
stock warrant  认股证；认股权证
warrant  认股权证；拨款令；支款授权书；保证
investment decision  n.投资方案
universe  n.1. 宇宙; 天地万物2. 世界; 全人类3. 【天】恒星 与星辰系; 银河系
4. 思想等的体系、范围，领域等
gratuity  n.1，退伍金, 抚恤金, 养老金,2 小费; 赏金，赠物，酬金
corporate  adj.  法人的; 公司的; 团体的; 共同的, 全体的
private placement  n.直接转销,自售证券,私人配售，私募
通过非公开证券配售（相对于公开配售）筹集资金。一般的结果是买入证券的投资者数目较小。
Raising of capital via private rather than public placement. The result is the sale of securities to a relatively small number of investors. Investors involved in private placements are usually large banks, mutual funds, insurance companies, and pension funds.
impinge  vi.1. 冲击, 撞击, 影响(on, upon, against)2. 抵触, 冲突; 侵犯3. (密切)接触
sales force  n.销售人员
limousine  n.  大型豪华轿车（尤指有玻璃将司机座位隔开的）; 小型巴士; 大轿车
taint  n.  污染/点, 感染, 耻辱，败坏　v.  污染, 沾染, 使腐败; 腐坏, 败坏; 被污染
myriad n.无数, 极大数量adj.  无数的; 众多方面的, 形形色色的myriad-minded  adj.  才气纵横的, 多才多艺的
flagrant  adj.罪恶昭彰的, 公然的,明目张胆的; 臭名远扬的; 穷凶极恶的
excerpt　  n. v.  摘录; 引用
verbatim  adv.  逐字地（的）　verb n.  动词　verbal noun  动名词
verbal  n.  准动词adj.  言语的, 逐字的, 口头的
verbalize (Amer.) v.  以言语表现, 使变成动词; 累赘, 唠叨
caveat 　 防止误解的说明,保护发明特许权的请求书(美国),中止诉讼的申请,停止支付的通知(商业)，警告
outsourcing  n. 外包， 使用外界力量, 大公司雇佣合同工人来完成某项工作而不是公司自己做
algorithm  n.  【数】算法; 规则系统; 演段; 编码
egregious adj.  异乎寻常的; 惊人的; 过分的，突出的; 显著的
compile  v.  编译; 汇编; 编辑compilation n 编辑; 编纂; 编制; 编写; 编译.
undocumented  adj.  无正式文件的, 无事实证明的
correspondence n.  对应，相符,符合； 信件, 通信
Asset Allocation  资产分配/配置
typographical  adj.  排字上的; 印刷上的
triple v.  使成三倍, 三倍于; 增至三倍adj.  三倍的; 由三部分构成的; 三重的; 三方的
municipality  n.  自治市/区; 市政当局
subscribe  签署(文件)，认购（股票），订阅（报刊），捐助（款项）
infraction  n. （对规则p 法律等的）违背, 违犯; 侵害
fraction  n.  分数, 破片,片段，小部分
affluent adj.  富裕的; 富饶的; 丰富的; 流畅的
reference  n.1. 参考, 查询[阅], 询问, 访问2. 提到, 涉[论]及, 有关系[联]3. 职[授]权范围4. 证明, 介绍; 证明[介绍]信[人],证明文件5. 参考文献[资料, 书目, 符号, 电源], 说明书, 附[旁]注, 引证[用], 出处6. 基准(点), 标准, 依据, 坐标, 标记
trustworthiness n.  可信赖; 可靠；值得信任
due n.  应得之物; 应付款; 应得权益; 税金adj.  应得的；应支付的; 正当的; 应付的
Surcharge  附加费　超载
trespass  vi.1. 未经许可进入私人土地; 非法侵入(私地), 侵犯(on, upon)2. 打扰, 妨碍(on,upon)3. 冒犯,违犯(against)trespassupon sb.'s property非法侵入某人的土地
n.1. 侵入, 侵犯, 侵害2. 罪过3. 【律】非法侵害4. 【律】侵害诉讼
transgression  n.1. 侵越, 超过2. 违背, 犯罪, 违犯; 犯规
senior securities  优先证券 一级证券
redemption  赎回，偿还
additional security  追加保证金
the passage of time 时间的推移
release  vt.1. 释放; 免除, 赦免; 解除(痛苦等)2. 投, 扔3. 放出, 放松4. 发表(消息); 发行(影片),发表，出版
as opposed to　 in contrast to 与...对比/照;而不是……
oppose M against N  把M与N相对照或相比
oppose M to N       把M与N相对照或相比
oppose oneself to    反对
briefing  n.  简报,摘要（书），情况介绍v.  作简报, 节录, 摘要adj.  简短的; 短暂的
go beyond  vt.超过,胜过
facilitate  v.  使容易; 帮助; 促进
premise  n.1.【逻】前提2. [pl. ]房产; 房屋(及其附属建筑, 地基等)，(pl)生产/经营场所
initiative adj.起始的; 初步的; 自发的，主动的
perceptive  adj.1. 知觉的2. 感觉(敏锐)的; 有理解力的，理解的
Proprietary Trading  自由资金交易  解释：公司为赚取直接收益，而不是佣金的交易。具体来说，指公司决定通过直接市场交易，而不是通过赚取处理买卖的佣金而获利
personal trading 个人交易
equitable  adj.  公平的; 公正的
blackball   v.  投票反对, 排斥，抵制，取消会员资格[入场权]
vice versa  反之亦然
discriminate  v.  区别, 辨别; 有差别地对待，差别待遇; 区别, 辨别; 使有区别, 区别于
enforcement  n.实施，执行; 强制
counterproductive  adj.  产生不良后果的，起反作用的
overlap  n.  重叠, 重复v.  重叠, 重复，[与...]部分相一致[巧合]
preclude  v.  排除; 阻止, 妨碍; 防止, 杜绝
reactive  adj.  反动的, 反作用的，反冲的, 反应性的; 活性的, 化学反应的
impetus   n.  推动, 促进; 刺激; 推动力,动力; 冲力
stringent  adj 1（指法律p 规则等）严格的,必须遵守的,严厉的，2(指财务状况）因缺钱而困难的, 银根紧的3紧迫的
secondary offering  n.证券的二次发行，解释：公司一名或以上主要股东出售证券所有或大部分持有量。承销收益由股东，而不是企业收取
foreman  n.工头,领班，工长   首席陪审员 workforce  工作人口，(全厂的)劳动力
fill in  n.  1填充; 填满; 填写  2临时工，(暂时)代替之人或物，暂代，临时填补物
adj.  临时补缺的
misappropriation  n.  侵吞; 滥用,占用，盗/挪用
appropriate adj合适的v拨出; 挪用, 盗用; 占用 n指拨,预算拨款
cripple  n.  跛子; 残废的人   v.  1使残废/跛, 使成残废2严重损坏或削弱(某事物)
He that lives with cripples learns to limp.    近朱者赤, 近墨者黑。
conglomerate   n.跨业经营大公司，综合企业(集合多个独立业务线的企业)，通过合并若干企业而组建的）大公司
labour leader  n.劳工/工会领袖
depreciation  折旧；贬值；(机器)损耗，磨损
Underperform  表现落后大市，表现不佳
Outperform    表现超越大市，(机器等)性能比...好, 在使用上胜过; 超额完成
plunge      大跌；急挫；盲目投资,负责v.  使投入, 使陷入, 使插入; 投入, 陷入, 跳进
derivate   n.  导数; 衍生物
market power  n.市场支配力
optimistic   adj 乐观的 pessimistic  a. 悲观的
guise   n.[C]1. 外观,装束2. 伪装,假装 in a certain guise  穿(某种)外衣
in/under  the guise of  假借; 以...为幌子
ownership interest  n.所有者权益
controlling interest    多数股权 控股权益
orchestrate  v. 精心安排; 把...编成管弦乐曲    orchestra  n.  管弦乐队
sensationalize  vt. 使引起轰动  以耸人听闻的手法处理
Hedge Fund  对冲基金
进行安全及投机性高投资的积极管理投资组合。大部分对冲基金包含的投资者数目限于最多100名。对冲基金大多不受监管，因为投资对冲基金的投资者大多经验丰富，财力雄厚
  An aggressively managed portfolio of investments that uses advanced investment strategies such as leverage, long, short and derivative positions in both domestic and international markets with the goal of generating high returns (either in an absolute sense or over a specified market benchmark). 
Legally, hedge funds are most often set up as private investment partnerships that are open to a limited number of investors and require a very large initial minimum investment. Investments in hedge funds are illiquid as they often require investors keep their money in the fund for at least one year.
short position  空仓；淡仓；空头；短盘
account for  说明; 证明;对...负有责任
Bid-Ask Spread  买卖差价 (叫价高于出价的金额)
   The amount by which the ask price exceeds the bid. This is essentially the difference in price between the highest price that a buyer is willing to pay for an asset and the lowest price for which a seller is willing to sell it.
pump priming  n.刺激经济的政府投资
reiterate   v.  重申,反复地说, 反复地做
decline    v/n1. 下降,下跌;减少;衰退,衰落2. 婉拒;谢绝 [+to-v]
She declined their invitation.她婉拒了他们的邀请。
She declined to have lunch with her friend, saying that she wasn't feeling well.
她说她身体不舒服,婉拒了与她的朋友共进午餐。
meanwhile  ad. 同时  n. 其时,其间
by virtue of   由于;依靠;凭借
caution 谨慎　　discretion 慎重,谨慎, 自行处理,【律】任意决定权　at discretion 1. 随意, 任意2. 无条件地 at the discretion of sb.  随某人的意思, 叫某人自行处理
discretionary  adj.  任意的, 无条件的
in the context of  在...情况下
judicious  adj.明智的, 贤明的, 深思远虑的, 头脑精明的
with respect to  n.关于,就...而论,相对于
disparity  n.不均衡,不一致，不对称
vulnerable  adj.  易受伤害的, 易受攻击的, 有弱点的
custody  n.1.保管2. 监护; 拘留, 监禁
hostile adj.  怀敌意的, 敌对的
ward off  避开; 挡住
precedence  n.优先,居先
consummate  v.  完成; 使达到极点　adj.  圆满的; 完美的; 至上的
favoritism 　　n.  偏爱; 偏袒;
facsimile　　　n. 复写,传真v. 传真
general distribution  一般分配法，公开发行
block allocation  整体拨款；整笔拨款
round lot 　　　 交易单位，“一手”；整批，整数成批股票；
Odd Lot  零星股、散股（数目不足正常交易单位的证券），证券交易中低于单位交易额的零星交易量
forgo 　 v.  摒绝, 放弃
originator  n.创办人，创始人,发起人
override 　v. 不管,不顾/理(某人的意见等);拒绝，无视;使...无效;藐视n.【美】销售酬金
bona fide　 adj.真实（的）; 真诚（的）; 合法（的）: n.善意
privy  n.  有利害关系的人adj.  个人的, 私人的; 私下的; 隐蔽的, 秘密的;
time frame  n.时限,时间范围
follow up  采取进一步行动，跟进, 把...探究到底
timeliness　 n.  及时, 适时
Pro Rata  按比例
franchise  专营权；特许权
cut back　削减
clout  n. 破布　敲打　v权力，力量影响力
Mortgage Backed Securities　按揭证券　 以房地产抵押作担保的证券（代表一组房地产抵押不可分割权益的投资工具，该组房地产抵押的本金及利息将用以支付这种投资工具的本金及利息）
cross-transaction　交叉交易
presumably   ad. 推测上,假定上,大概
unsolicited  adj.未经请求的,主力提供的
in case of  　假如,如果发生，要是,万一
the passage of time　　时间推移
current income  本期收入/益，经常收入
unfunded liabilities  无资金准备的负债
contemplate　　v.  注视, 打算, 沉思;深思熟虑
covered call  备兑认购期权
An options strategy whereby an investor holds a long position in an asset and writes (sells) call options on that same asset in an attempt to generate increased income from the asset. This is often employed when an investor has a short-term neutral view on the asset and for this reason hold the asset long and simultaneously have a short position via the option to generate income from the option premium.
venture capital  创业资金；风险资本（向具有巨大增长潜力的初始企业及小型业务提供的资金及资源）
pooled fund　集合基金
common trust fund  n.共同信托基金
retro-  pref.  前缀　表示“ 向后”, “倒退”, “追溯”, retroactively adv. 追溯地
promote  n.创立,推销,促进 promotional a. 推销的
abstain from  戒绝　放弃　避开
whistleblowing  告密  揭发
justify  v.  替...辩护, 验证，证明; 证明合法
contradict  v. 反驳/对,矛盾　与...矛盾， 与...抵触， 与...相反
languish  　v.  憔悴, 苦思, 凋萎　1变得衰弱无力; 失去活力; 失去兴趣2. 憔悴, 潦倒; (植物等)凋萎3. 焦思, 因渴望而苦恼(for)4. 松弛, 放松
close [pred 作表语] ~ (to sb/sth); ~ (together)（在空间或时间上）接近: 将要
Buyout  收购（入一家公司或一家公司的控股股权。负债收购指通过借贷或发行更多股票完成收购）
Rest　~ on sb/sth　依靠或依赖某人[某事物　指目光等）停留在某人[某物]上
associate  有联系的人；合伙人；联系人
exclusive  adj.  独占的, 排外的, 唯一的；精选的　n.专营
wavie 　放弃　免除
intern n.  实习（医师）; 被拘留者　v.  做实习（医师）; 拘留
misappropriate  v.  侵占, 盗用, 霸占
condominium  　n.住户所有公寓式住房
partiality  n.1. 偏袒, 偏见2. 偏爱; 癖好(for, to)
partial   adj.  部分的, 偏爱的, 偏袒的
Facility  信贷额度　设备　　[常用复]便利
discharge  破产解除；清偿〔债务〕；尽职，尽(义务), 履行　解雇
delegate　  n.  代表v.  委派...为代表，委任；授权，委托
enact v.  制定; 颁布; 扮演
industry standard　行业标准
the chain of command  指挥系统
enumerate    v.  列举, 枚举, 计算
stand alone   独立
encumber   v n. 妨碍 阻塞　塞满（with）
~ sb/sth (with sth) 阻碍或妨碍某人[某物]自由活动
unencumbered 　adj.  不受妨碍的，没有阻碍的; 没有(抵押等)负担的　无产权负担
deter         v.  制止, 威慑, 使断念, 使踌躇 deter ...from  阻拦, 妨碍
boilerplate    n. 标准文本(报纸用的); 样板文件；可以直接打印的抄本 锅炉钢板
tailor  n.  裁缝师; 服装店v.  裁制; 使合适; 修改; 做裁缝
[尤用於被动语态] ~ sth for/to sb/sth （为某目的）做某事物或适应某事物
prospectus  招股章程；发行章程  公开说明书  计划书  简介
futures commission merchant   n.期货佣金商
sound   adj.  健全的; 合理的; 可靠的
screening  筛选
vendor  卖方；出售人；售卖人 小贩
consensus  n.集体意 一致; 舆论; 合意; 共识
substantiate   vt.证明/实,使...具体化　
substantial  adj.  实质上的, 有内容的, 物质的
loophole  n.漏洞　　枪眼,小窗,换气孔　望孔
exuberance  n.繁荣　茂盛; 健康; 丰富
subscribe　 v.1. 订购[阅], 预订2. 签名, 署名3. 捐助, 认捐
basic format 基本格式　　general principles 一般原则
well Cinformed  消息灵通的，博识的
capsule  n.  胶囊　　v.  概括, 简述; 使浓缩
stipulate  v.  规定; 约定
outlook 　n. 观点,见解；展望,前景；景色；形势
conjecture 　v　n. 推测,臆测
after the fact  事后
hitch  　　n.延迟　v钩住，套住
scenario  n.  情节, 方案, 剧本
prowess  n. 英勇,勇敢；超凡技术，高超的技艺/本领; 非凡的才能; 专长:
emulate 　v.  效法, 同...竞争, 尽力赶上
redirect  v.  重寄；使改变方向, 使改道
track record    记录　工作履历，业绩档案
err on the side of  过分表现（通常指好的）,宁可
on one's behalf  on sb.'s behalf  以某人的名义; 为了某人; 代表某人
market making  n.证券市场制造兴旺气象　证券市场为调整供求或价格而进行的买卖
prevalent 　adj.  普遍的, 流行的　prevalence  n. 传播,流行,普及
burdensome  adj.  累赘的, 艰难的, 恼人的
pecuniary　　adj.金钱(上)的, 应罚款的＊
inadvertently  ad. 不注意地，不经意地，非故意地　advertent  adj.  注意的; 留意的
outstanding  adj.未付的 未偿还；尚未支付
Board Of Directors   董事会
Commercial Paper   商业票据
Equity-Linked Note  股票关联票据(回报率取决于一种证券、一组证券或一个股票指数表现的投资工具)
replicate  v.  折叠; 复制
align     v.  使结盟; 使成一行; 排列
bestow  v. 授予　把...赠与,把...给予[(+on/upon)]；使用,花费[(+on)]
oversubscription  n. 认购超额
Private Placement  私募　私人配售　发行债券时的直接销售
surrounding       adj.  周围的; 附近的
beneficial ownership  实益拥有权 实际所有权
infusion　　 n. 注入，灌输,激励
legitimate  v.  认为正当, 使合法, 立为嫡嗣adj.  合理的，合法的, 婚生的, 正当的
close out  平仓　vt. 抛售(停止,停业)
assimilate  n.v 1消化，吸收，同化2使相似, 使相同, 使成一样3把...比作(to, with)
in kind 　 以实物(偿付),以同样的方法
soft dollar 非金钱
on a regular basis  定期地
reassess  n.重新估价　对...再摊派;再课(税)
undermine  v.  渐渐破坏/削弱, 暗地里破坏
circumvent 　v.  围绕; 智取; 包围；规/回避
advocate　 v.  拥护; 主张; 提倡; 鼓吹n.  提倡者; 辩护者; 拥护者; 律师
smudge n. 污点,渍痕v. 弄脏，模糊
heed  　n.  注意, 留心　v.  留心, 注意
tip off  向...泄露　向...透露消息
affiliate  vt.1. 使紧密联系(+with)2. 接纳...为成员(或分支机构);使隶属于(+to/with)
Principal  本金、[企业]主要负责人、[交易]当事人
alumnus  n.  男毕业生, 男校友 alumna n. 女校友,女毕业生 (pl.alumnae)
vote down  (以投票)否决
lobby 　　n.  大厅;休息室；游说议员者; v.  游说议员; ; 游说；经常出入休息室
lobbying  n.  游说
slate 　　n石板, 石片, 蓝色，候选人名单adj. 暗蓝灰色的, 含板岩的v. 铺石板；提名...为候选人(+for)
preview n.  预看; 预习; 预先审查; 试演v.  事先查看, 预演, 预展
endorse  v. 支持,赞同,背书于
competitive bids  n.公开招标
ex ante  n.事先*
adhere to  坚持；依附，粘附；拥护，支持
Private Equity 私人股本
指没有在股票市场挂牌，但企业或投资者可参与的股本资金。筹集的资金可用作开发新产品或科技、增加周转资金、进行收购或强化公司的资产负债表
equal footing  n.平等地位
convergence 　会聚,聚焦，集中　【数】收敛
in addition to  除...之外(还)
envision 　　v.  想像; 预想　　
arena 　　n.  竞技场, 舞台; 活动场所
dual     adj.双的; 二重的; 二元的; 二体的, 二联的; 孪生的; 复式的; 加倍的
degree of confidence  n.置信度
critical issue 　重大问题
attribution  n.1. 归属, 归因2. 属性
reciprocity  互惠措施；互惠条件　 相互性; 对等; 相互作用
Carveout  分拆上市,分享资产　解释：1. 即一家母公司出售一家子公司的少数权益（一般为20%或以下），以进行子公司的首次公开上市或供股发行2. 一家非网络实业公司与创业投资者与新的管理队伍联合实行互联网业务分拆上市
compliance check　合规检查/监督
council  n.理事会
equal footing  n.平等地位
elaborate 　v.  精心制作; 详细阐述; 详细说明;adj.  精细的, 精心的, 详尽的
the level of control　控制程度
Trade Date Accounting 交易日会计原则
accrual accounting  n.权责发生制会计
segregate v.  使分离, 使隔离; 
reclaimable 　adj.  可收回的，可返还的　nonreclaimable　不可返还的
reclaim  n.抵偿,回收，恢复　开垦, 开拓;
on request  n.根据买方通知发货;n.函索
on request 　when asked for 一经要求
 Catalogues are available on request. 备有目录供索取
remain with  vt. 属于(归于,在...的权内)
hybrid 　　　n. 混血儿,杂种,混合物　a. 混合的,杂种的,混合语的
up to     　a. 正在做，直到,相当于,胜任,该由...决定
measure of dispersion  离散度
intact      adj.未经触动的, 原封不动的, 完整无损的
custom    n.  习惯; 风俗; 海关adj.  订做的, 订制的
administrative fee 托管费
appreciation  增值,货币升值
tranche  　　n.  国际货币基金贷款划分的“部分”　
automatic IMF tranche货币基金组织中自动份额
gold tranche  (国际储备的)黄金部分; (国际货币基金组织会员国缴纳基金的) 黄金部分; 黄金存值　　　higher credit tranche  高档信贷份额
super gold tranche  国际货币基金会员国超黄金缴存额信贷部分
paid-in capital  实缴/收资本；实缴股本
appraiser　　n.  评价人; 估价人; 鉴定人
closed end  　n.固定金额 封闭的
carried interest  附带权益,附股权益
Private Equity  私人股本　非上市公司权益
Vintage Year　最早时期
Vintage
A slang term used by mortgage-backed securities (MBS) traders and investors to refer to an MBS that is seasoned over some time period. MBSs typically have maturities around 30 years, and a particular issue's 'vintage' will expose the holder to less prepayment and default risk, although this decreased risk also limits price appreciation.
vintage  n.1. 葡萄收获(期量); (当年)葡萄酒产量2. 酒; (=vintage wine)(特指某年某地所产的)美酒3. (同年代的)一批产品; 同期产生的人物4. 制造的时期; 开始存在的时期; 年龄; 寿命adj.1. 酒的; 酿造的2. 属于某一时期制造的3. 优良的4. 古老的; 过时的(尤指曾经一度为最佳的)
The year in which the first influx of investment capital is delivered to a project or company. This marks when capital is contributed by venture capital, private equity fund or a partnership drawing down from its investors.
authorized capital  法定资本, 认可资本 auxiliary capital  辅助资本
bank credit capital  银行信贷资金　bureaucrat capital  官僚资本
immaterial capital  无形资本　　　incorporeal capital  无形资本
registered capital  　注册资本　　 commited capital   认缴资本？
Turnaround     转亏为盈、市道转好
Fair Value    公允/平价值
carrying value  帐面结存价值[等于总资产 - 无形资产及负债（例如债务）]
   An accounting measure of value, where the value of an asset or a company is based on the figures in the company's balance sheet. For assets, the value is based on the original cost of the asset less any depreciation, amortization or impairment costs made against the asset. For a company, carrying value is a company's total assets minus intangible assets and liabilities such as debt. Also known as "book value".
generalist  n.多面手,通才
period-end  期末
drawdown  减少，下降
strike a balance (between A and B) find a sensible middle point between two demands, extremes, etc; compromise 找到折衷办法; 妥协: It was difficult to strike the right balance between justice and expediency. 在公正与私利之间很难两全
mandatory  adj.1. 命令的, 委托的(upon)2 指示的3 强制性的; [美]强迫的,义务性质的
clarify   n.v澄清；（使某事物）清楚易懂; 使明晰
required verifyication procedure 认证必备程序
fully  discretionary 全权委托  discretionary trust  n.全权托管/信托
discretionary manager  全权管理人
investment discretion 投资决策
give rise to  n.引起,导致,产生
reclaim v.  使改过, 纠正; 回收; 开垦, 开拓   tax reclaim 返税
in place  在适当的位置; 适当
assert  v.  清楚而有力地表明（某事物）为事实; 声称; 断言; 坚持, 维护; 显示
custodial  adj.  保管的; 保管人的 custody  n.  监护, 监禁, 拘留；保管，保护
disposition  产权处置 财产转让
Free Cash Flow  自由现金流
if any  若有的话
amortize  v.   摊销, 分期偿还
slang  n.俚语,行话
unitize  vt.1使成为一单位或一整体. 2统一化, 规格化3. 成组, 成套
in addition to  n.除...以外,除...外又
metric  adj.  （公制长度单位）米的, 以米为基础的 公制的; 十进制的; 米制的
metricate  v  convert (sth) to the metric system 将（某物）改为公制metrication  n
margin of error  n.误差界限
underpin      v.  从下头支持, 加固,支持, 支撑 
underpinning  n.1. 支柱, 支承结构, 支承基础; 支持物; 墙基2. 基础材料; 基础结构
3. [常用复](学说、理论等的)基础4. [常用复]腿
interim   n.  中间时期; 暂定; 过渡时期adj.  中间的, 临时的, 暂时的,中期的
at interim  暂时的; 临时代理的in the interim  在这期间; 在过渡期间
cohesive   adj. 粘性的，有粘着力的；凝聚性的；内聚性的，有结合力的
garner     n.  谷仓, 积蓄v.  储存, 贮藏; 取得, 获得,收藏
at arm's length   n.按市价进行交易   n.在伸臂可及之外,一臂之长 无关联 疏远
intellectual property rights  
智力财产权, 对智力材料的财产权 (比如文学著作, 音乐, 专利, 牌子, 商标等等)
adj挂牌的，上市的 v报价
quoted company  上市公司  quoted share  上市股票；挂牌股票
quoted subsidiary  上市附属公司
quote vt.1. 摘引; 引用; 复述2. 提到, 举出(例子)3. 把...放进引号内, 用引号把...括起来4. 【商】报(价); 开(价); 开盘； (向...)提出(价格)
elementary statistics  基础统计学,初等统计学
performance measurement  n.性能测定，业绩评估
realizable value  可变现价值         
last resort最后手段,最后一招;最后的解决办法 终审/最高法庭without resort 无计可施
loan stock     债权股额；贷款债券；公司信用债
entry  n.  登录; 进入; 条目,分录，帐目
roll up  卷起, 包起来, 卷成球状; (乘车)到达；渐次增加; 积累成
provision  1拨款；预留款项；备付款项；准备金2规定,条款3准[预、防]备, (预防)措施4 [pl. ]供应品(特指粮食与副食品); 杂货vt.  向... 供应粮食 [必需品]
toolkit  n.  工具包; 工具箱;
descriptive statistic  n.描述性统计   inferential statistics  n.推论统计学
descriptor  n.(数据处理中表示某一项目的)标码, 描述符, 解说符, 叙词
quasi  pref 前缀adj.  类似的; 半的; 准的; 外表的
      conj.  宛如, 就象, 就是说 adv.  类似地, 准地
mode 　　众数　　meidan 中间值，中位数　
kurtosis  n.. 【数】峭度;峰态　　        　  dispersion 离差
Skewness 偏斜性，不对称性              　 lopsided  adj.  倾向一方的, 不平衡的
harmonic mean  n.调和平均数，倒数平均数   subset 子集
random variable  n.随机变量　　　　　　　　variance 方差
exhaustive events　　穷举事件
exclusive events   n.互斥事件
prior probability  先验概率  事前概率
conditional probability  条件概率 unconditional probability   无条件概率
joint probability  n.连接概率,结合概率，联合概率
factorial  n.1. 【数】阶乘;【统】阶乘积,阶乘因子
combination  组合　　　permutation  n.排列
covariance 协方差　　　correlateion　相关性
notation  n.标记法　【数】记数法　　bayes’　formula 贝叶斯公式
junior mortgage  n.低次抵押权,次级抵押
mechanics  1力学, 机械学　2技术;技巧　　in turn  依次; 轮到
course of action  n.行动过程，行动步骤，做法
time preference  n.时间偏好
full faith and credit　十足信用
gilt-edged　金边的，最上等的　~bond　金边债券　gilt-edged securities  金边证券
gilt-edged investment  稳当投资
 negotiable 　　adj.  可转让的, 可流通的; 可谈判的, 可协商的
lump sum  一次付款额; 总金额
interest-bearing  有息　　　interest bearing bank debosit  n.银行有息存款
interest bearing securities  n.有息证券　interest bearing note  n.附息票据
formalize (Amer.) v.  正式化; 使形式化; 定形
glimpse　　n.  一瞥, 一闪　　v.  瞥见; 投以一瞥, 闪烁不定
lottery  　　n.  奖券,彩票
certificate of deposit  存款单
round up 向上舍入　
decimal  a. 十进位的,小数的　n十进制，小数
convention  n. 会议， 大会; 习俗; 协定，约定，规则，公约，召集,集合[U]
limiting value 　极限值
transcendental  【数】超越数　【数】超越的
raise　【数】使自乘　　power　 幂，次方
natural logarithm     自然对数　a logarithm in which the base is the irrational number
irrational number　ph【数】无理数（e=2.71828……）R10=Se10
annuity due  n.期初应付年金即付年金
space interval 时间间隔　　increment 增量
multiple  n.倍数
A term that measures some aspect of a company's financial well-being, determined by dividing one metric by another metric. The metric in the numerator is typically larger than the one in the denominator, because the top metric is usually supposed to be many times larger than the bottom metric. Calculated as:
 
multiply   v.  乘, 使相乘
bracket   [pl. ]括号({ }, ( ), [ ])
parenthesis  n.圆括号 ( )   parentheses　pl  in parenthesis 在（圆）括号里:
square brackets  方括号  [ ]
angular bracket  尖括号  < >  point bracket   angle brackets
brace   【刷】用大括号括 xy
shortcut   n. 捷径
vantage-point  (观看某事物的）有利地点，优势
keep track of  n.记住,记录，留意
calendar time  n.日历时间
payoff   1收益；2发薪;发薪时间;3清偿，清算
down payment   分期付款的头款 首期付款
level sequential　　等值连续
set aside  留出/留置　放在一边
keystone  n.[C]1. 【建】(拱门的)拱心石,楔石2. 主旨;基本原则;基础[(+of)]
working capital  流动资本;营运资金；周转资金
sunk cost   沉入成本, 已支付成本( 或称非相关成本、历史成本。指在过去已经发生已经不能改变的成本，因而不适于作当前的决策，如机器的原始购置成本属于沉入成本，它不适用于决定机器是否应该更新)   
tangible cost  可回收成本,有形成本
denominator    n.【数】分母  numerator n.【数】(分数的)分子
fraction          【数】分数
decision rule  n.决策规则
Hurdle rate  最低预期回报率:投资者进行投资要求的最低回报率
capital charges  资本支出；资本费用
interpret as  把…理解为
crossover discount rate  n.交叉贴现率
synonym  n.同义词
quadratic equation  二次方程式
placeholder  位置标志符,占位符
bank discount basis 银行贴现标法
redeem  n　v.偿还,赎回
accrued interest  n.应计利息
full price  n.足价,十足价格
Certificate Of Deposit (CD) 存款证
set-off  1抵销；对销2出发,动身3扣除
measurement scales 衡量尺度
nominal scales 名义量标度
ordinal scales  顺序量标度
interval scales　等距/区间量/标度
ratio scales　　比例量量/标度
natural number 自然数
gauge  n.  标准度量, 计量器v.  精确计量, 估计
collapse  1.n/v. 倒塌,崩溃,瓦解 2（价格)暴跌，跌价3 折叠4(健康等)垮掉;衰退;累倒
price inflation  1价格上涨；物价上涨2物价膨胀
bell shaped  n.钟形的  line graph  n.线形图
slope  n.1. 倾斜;坡度2. 坡;斜面[C]3【军】托枪姿势[U]4. 【数】斜率vt.1. 使倾斜, 使成斜坡2. 掮(枪)Slope arms!(口令)掮枪!3. 倾斜, 成斜坡4. 闲荡(about); 逃离(off)
bulk sale  n.大宗销售 ; 整批销售
cross sectional data  n.剖面数据          cross sectional datum  n.横断面资料
cross sectional analysis  n.同业比较分析   cross comparison    横向比较
longitudinal profile――纵断面，纵剖面(图) 
longitudinal section――纵剖面，纵截面，纵断面 
horizontal section――横断面 
transverse section――横剖面，横断面
liken vt.把.比喻成(to);比喻,比拟;使象Life is often likened to a dream人生常被喻为一场梦。
outlier   n.1门外汉,局外人2异化值,异常值
fulcrum  n. 杠杆的支点,支点,叶之附属物
trim n.  整齐, 修剪, 装饰v.  整理, 装饰, 修剪; 消减; 修正方向; 调整; 获得平衡adj.  整齐的, 整洁的; 平衡的
Trimmed Mean  平衡均值
    method of averaging that removes a small percentage of the largest and smallest values before calculating the mean. After removing the specified observations, the trimmed mean is found using an arithmetic averaging formula.
Investopedia Says:
The trimmed mean looks to reduce the effects of outliers on the calculated average. This method is best suited for data with large, erratic deviations or extremely skewed distributions.  A trimmed mean is stated as a mean trimmed by X%, where X is the sum of the percentage of observations removed from both the upper and lower bounds.
For example, a figure skating competition produces the following scores: 6.0, 8.1, 8.3, 9.1, 9.9. A mean trimmed 40% would equal 8.5 ( (8.1+8.3+9.1)/3 ), which is larger than the arithmetic mean of 8.28. To trim the mean by 40%, we remove the lowest 20% and highest 20% of values, eliminating the scores of 6.0 and 9.1. As shown by this example, trimming the mean can reduce the effects of outlier bias in a sample.
Winsorized Mean　　缩尾均值
A method of averaging that initially replaces the smallest and largest values with the observations closest to them. After replacing the values, a simple arithmetic averaging formula is used to calculate the winsorized mean.
Winsorized means are expressed in two ways. A "kth" winsorized mean refers to the replacement of  the 'k' smallest and largest observations, where 'k' is an integer. A "X%" winsorized mean involves replacing a given percentage of values from both ends of the data.
Investopedia Says:
The winsorized mean is less sensitive to outliers because it replaces them with less influential values. This method of averaging is similar to the trimmed mean; however, instead of eliminating data, observations are altered, allowing for a degree of influence.
Let's calculate the first winsorized mean for the following data set: 1, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 14. Because the winsorized mean is in the first order, we replace the smallest and largest values with their nearest observations. The data set now appears as follows: 5, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 10. Taking an arithmetic average of the new set produces a winsorized mean of 7.71 ( (5+5+7+8+9+10+10) / 7 ).
Even  偶数　odd 奇数
Mode  众数
A statistical term referring to the most frequently occurring term in a set of numbers.
Investopedia Says:
For example, in the following set of data--32, 34, 34, 34, 45, 67, 71, 43--the mode is 34 because it is the most common number in the set .
unimodal adj.  【统】(曲线)单峰的
modal interval  众区间
department store  百货公司
radical sign     n. [数]根号
1.11% or 111 basis points
A  basis point is one-hundredth of 1 percent(0.01 percent)
concave  adj.  凹的   convex  adj .凸的
amount per unit  单位数量
Euro   n.欧元(欧洲经济共同体的统一货币单位)
harmonic mean    n. 调和平均值
harmonic series   n.调和级数
array  n.数组，排列
whole number   n. [数]整数       integer n.【数】整数
linear interpolation  线性内插法  线性插值
interpolatevt., vi.1. 窜改(文稿, 书等)2. 插入, 增添(字句等)3. 【数】插值, 内插, 内推
et al     abbr. 以及其他人或事物
range   【数】值域
mean absolute deviation  平均绝对偏差
identity n.1. 同一(性); 一致2. 身分; 本身; 本体; 个性; 特性3. 【数】恒等(式)
the identity of interests  利益的一致   an identity card身分证
reach (an) identity of views   取得一致看法
honor roll   (美)光荣榜
divisor     n.  【数】除数, 除子, 约数, 因子
downside  n. 消极面,负面下[低]侧, 向下的走向[趋势]
a-    pref. 表示“not”的意思, 如:amoral, asexual,asysmmetric
 Derivative  衍生工具(价值取决于相关证券表现的证券，例如期权或期货合约等) 
【数】导数
stem from  vt.源于,基于,出于
depict  v.  描述; 描写
mnemonic  adj.  有助于记忆的; 记忆的
cube   n.1. 立方体, 立方形物, 正六面体; [pl. ] [美俚]骰子2. 立方, 三次幂; 
 reprint  再版; 重印; 翻印; 转载
algebra   n.代数(学)   algebraic  adj.  代数的; 代数上的; 代数学的
kurtosis   n. 【数】峰度，峰态；峭度
leptokurtic   n.  频率分配曲线的尖顶峰度  尖峰
platykurtic   n.平顶峰度,低峰态的          平峰
mesokurtic   常峰态的
intervene   v. 插入,调停,干涉
intervening  n.插入 中介　a.1. 介于中间的;发生于其间的
semilogarithmic  adj.半对数的
logarithm  n.对数
Trailing	A term used to describe the most recent time period.  
Investopedia Says:
Most often you will hear the term "trailing 12 months", and, from time to time, "trailing three months" or "trailing six months". The term may also modify a reported metric. For example, the earnings in a trailing price-to-earnings ratio refers to the past earnings per share over a certain period - usually 12 months. Trailing 12 months is denoted by the acronym "TTM".  
come under  归入, 受到1. 被包括在...之内;可在...下(或后)查到2. 遭受
option pricing model  期权定价模式
italic   n.  斜体字 adj斜体的　[Italic ]古代意大利(人)的, 意大利语族的
empirical probability  　经验概率    估计事件发生相对频率的概率
subjective probability　 主观概率　　一种以主观判断为基础的概率分配方法
objective probability  　客观概率　　指客观存在的不是因主观原因引起的概率
prior probability    　  先验概率　　指事件的初始估计概率
The probability that an event will reflect established beliefs about the event before the arrival of new evidence or information. Prior probabilities are the original probabilities of an outcome, which be will updated with new information to create posterior probabilities
odds 　　　n.  可能的机会; 优势; 成败的可能性
　　odds for E＝**　　　　 发生E事件的概率（成功或发生的机率或可能性）
　　odds against　E＝**　　不发生E事件的概率（失败或不发生的机率或可能性）
draw on　　1. 穿上;戴上2. 利用3. 临近
deduce  　　v. 推论,演绎出
well-defined  定义明确的; 清晰的
out of    a. 来自(出自,从...当中,越出...范围外,失去)
antitrust  adj.  反垄断的; 反对垄断
discrepancy n.1. 差异, 不一致, 矛盾2. 偏差,误差accumulated discrepancy  累积差
　　　price discrepancy  价格差异　　statistical discrepancy  统计差异, 统计误差
inconsistent adj.  不一致的, 矛盾的, 不合理的；不相容的
　　　inconsistent equation　　【数】不相容方程, 矛盾方程
unconditional probability  　无条件概率
conditional probability  条件概率
marginal probability  　　　　边缘概率
wager n.  赌, 赌物, 赌博　v.  下赌注, 保证; 打赌
None but fools and knaves lay wagers.  [谚]只有傻瓜和骗子才同别人打赌。
A wager is a fool's argument.  [谚]只有傻瓜才以打赌来解决争论。
　　wager on  1. 打赌, 押(赌注)2. 确信; 担保
stand alone  孤立　卓越　　无与伦比
inclusive　  adj.  包含(首末)的; 包括的
limit order  n.限价委托/指令
stringent  　adj.  迫切的; 严厉的; 银根紧的; 令人信服的
sequential comparison 顺序比较
regression analysis  n.回归分析　　regression coefficient  n.回归系数
total probability  总概率, 全概率
各个相互独立的条件下事件的概率之和为一个事件发生的全概率
total probability rule  全概率法则 
complement  【数】余角，余弧，余数，余集，余(子）式
【计】补数（事件的补集），补码； 反码　objective complement  宾语补足语
sample space  采样空间，取样空间
continuous random variables  连续随机变量
summation  n.  总结; 总数, 总和;【数】加法; 求和;【律】(双方论据的)辩论总结
differential  n微分analytic differential解析微分
quadratic/second differential二次微分　　differentiation 【数】微分法, 求导数
integration　【数】积分(法)
negligible   a. 可以忽略的,很小的，微不足道的
node  n.结点
intercept　 vt.【数】(在两点或两线间)截取n【数】截距
operating costs  生产费用 营业成本 
in the event of   如果...发生   倘若(万一,如果发生,倘使)
break-even  收支平衡；收支相抵
recover  n.恢复,补偿
risk averse  风险反感
　　A description of an investor who, when faced with two investments with a similar expected return (but different risks), will prefer the one with the lower risk.
recovery rate  恢复率，回收率
covary  　vi. [数]共变
follow from  是从...得...出的
clutter 　v. 弄乱,混乱
cross product  n.交叉乘积
does not matter  vi. 无关紧要
inverse relationship  逆相关  相反关系
outnumber  vt. 数量上超过
qualifying   a. 使具有资格的,限制的
covariance matrix  协方差矩阵
square format 　正方形，方格
pure number  纯数
inverse probability  逆概率　逆机率
Earnings Surprise　收益差异　盈利不符合预测
	
When the earnings reported in a company's quarterly or annual report are above or below analysts' earnings estimates.
posterior probability  后验概率　　事后概率
　　The probability that an event will reflect established beliefs about the event before the arrival of new evidence or information. Prior probabilities are the original probabilities of an outcome, which be will updated with new information to create posterior probabilities.
Investopedia Says:
Prior probabilities represent what we originally believed before new evidence is uncovered. New information is used to produce updated probabilities and is a more accurate measure of a potential outcome. For example, three acres of land have the labels A, B and C. One acre has reserves of oil below its surface, while the other two do not. The probability of oil being on acre C is one third, or 0.333. A drilling test is conducted on acre B, and the results indicate that no oil is present at the location. Since acres A and C are the only candidates for oil reserves, the prior probability of 0.333 becomes 0.5, as each acre has one out of two chances.
Binomial Option Pricing Model　　二项/分期权定价模型
An options valuation method developed by Cox, et al, in 1979.  The binomial option pricing model uses an iterative procedure, allowing for the specification of nodes, or points in time, during the time span between the valuation date and the option's expiration date. 
The model  reduces possibilities of price changes, removes the possibility for arbitrage, assumes a perfectly efficient market, and shortens the duration of the option. Under these simplifications, it is able to provide a mathematical valuation of the option at each point in time specified.
Investopedia Says:
The binomial model takes a risk-neutral approach to valuation. It assumes that underlying security prices can only either increase or decrease with time until the option expires worthless. A simplified example of a binomial tree might look something like this:
 
Due to its simple and iterative structure, the model presents certain unique advantages. For example, since it provides a stream of valuations for a derivative for each node in a span of time, it is useful for valuing derivatives such as American options which allow the owner to exercise the option at any point in time until expiration (unlike European options which are exercisable only at expiration). The model is also somewhat simple mathematically when compared to counterparts such as the Black-Scholes model, and is therefore relatively easy to build and implement with a computer spreadsheet.
enumeration 　　n. 计数/算,列举,细目, 【统】点查
by convention  n.按照惯例 出于习俗
multinomial   a. 多项的 n. 多项式
shorthand    n.  速记, 速记法
binomial formula 二项式定理  二项式公式
sequence  【数】序列
hypothesis test  假设检验
null hypothesis  n.零假设
A type of hypothesis used in statistics that proposes that no statistical significance exists in a set of given observations. The null hypothesis attempts to show that no variation exists between variables, or that a single variable is no different than zero. It is presumed to be true until statistical evidence nullifies it for an alternative hypothesis.
Investopedia Says:
The null hypothesis assumes that any kind of difference or significance you see in a set of data is due to chance.  
For example, Chuck sees that his investment strategy produces higher average returns than simply buying and holding a stock. The null hypothesis claims that there is no difference between the two average returns, and Chuck has to believe this until he proves otherwise.  Refuting the null hypothesis would require showing statistical significance, which can be found using a variety of tests. If Chuck conducts one of these tests and proves that the difference between his returns and the buy-and-hold returns is significant, he can then refute the null hypothesis.
  是指在假设检验的程序中，最初假定为真的假设：如审计人员在抽查企业会计记录时，假定某一资产项目的实际价值等于帐面价值。如通过抽查接受这项假设，但它并不符合实际情况时，即发生第二种错误（type Ⅱ　error）。如通过检查拒绝这项假设，但它符合实际情意时，即发生第一种错误(type Ⅰ　error)
alternative hypothesis  备择假设：是指当原假设被拒绝时，被认为是真的假设。
nullify  [nul?li?fy || 'n?l?fa?]  v.  使无效, 取消, 废弃
refute  [re?fute || r?'fju?t]   v.  驳倒, 反驳
mis-   pref.  表示“错, 错误 的, 坏, 误;不; 没; 无
proposition　提议, 建议; 主张;见解【逻】命题;【修】主题;待解的问题; (待证明的)定理
discrete uniform   离散均匀
binomial    adj.1.二项(式)的2.双名的, 复名的n.1.二项式2.双名法
univariate   adj.  单变量的, 一元的
multivariate  adj. 多元， 多(重)变量, 有几个变值 (数学和统计学用语)
confidence interval   置信区间
shortfall risk   空头风险
optimal portfolio 最优资产组合
lognormal   adj.  【数】对数正态的
historical simulation  历史数据模拟
stratify      vt.使成层, 使分层 　stratum 层
central limit theorem  中心极限定理/律：统计学的一项基本原理。据此定理，统计抽样的样本量越大，则随机选择的样本平均值越接近于正态分布。
standard error      n.标准误差校正过程
desirable property  合乎要求的性质
degree of freedom 　　　　n.自由度
data mining/snooping　数据挖掘：在没有理论基础或先验支持的情况下，对同一数据进行反复研究和分析，直至找到有价值的发现
data-mining bias   数据挖掘偏差/好：不断重复演算或研究大量资料，直到获利令人满意的重要模型的一种偏好。
Sample Selection Bias　样本选择偏差：如果样本不是随机的，那么得到的结果就不能应用到总体分布，这时就会产生样本选择偏差。
A type of bias caused by choosing non-random data for statistical analysis. The bias exists due to a flaw in the sample selection process, where a subset of the data is systematically excluded due to a particular attribute. The exclusion of the subset can influence the statistical significance of the test, or produce distorted results. 	
Survivorship Bias 生存偏差：当业绩较差经理退出经营，从基础数据中剔除，只保留业绩较好经理，产生于这种情况下的数据的偏好程度；当既定日期的数据只反映那一日期仍存在的实体的情况时
The tendency for mutual funds with poor performance to be dropped by mutual fund companies, generally because of poor results or low asset accumulation. This phenomenon, which is widespread in the fund industry, results in an overestimation of the past returns of mutual funds. 
alternative hypothesis  备择/择一假设
test statistic   检验 测试统计
paired comparison test  n.一对一比较试验
paired comparisons method  n.成对比较法	
indicator  n.指标
monte carlo simulation  n.孟特卡罗模拟法
A problem solving technique used to approximate the probability of certain outcomes by running multiple trial runs, called simulations, using random variables. 
at most   n.至多
quantity  n.定量,数量大量多批,量,大量；值;n.数量
tick  记号, 勾号
uppercase  adj.  大写字母的
subscript   adj.  标在字母[符号]下角的, 写在下角的
n.  脚码[号, 标, 注], 添标, 下标, 下角数码(如H2O的2)
Embedded Option  隐含期权(为其他金融工具不可分割部分的期权安排，与此相反的是与相关证券分开买卖的一般（或单纯）期) 　　嵌入期权
An option that is an inseparable part of another instrument. Compare this to a normal (or bare) option, which trades separately from the underlying security.
cut off   v.  切掉, 切断, 删去adj.  切掉, 切断, 删去
retire    1收回(纸币, 债券, 股票等); 付清(证券的本息)；2退休
posterior probability  后验概率, 事后概率
prior probability  先验概率, 事前概率
 probability mass function  概率质量函数
finite    adj.有限的;【语】限定的;【数】有穷的, 有尽的
twofold  adj.两倍的,双重的;adv.有两个方面地
dynamics  n.动态,动力学，动力
Trading Desk  交易柜台
mirror image  镜像; 映像; 反映; 翻版
Tracking Error 跟踪误差
A divergence between the price behavior of a position or a portfolio and the price behavior of a benchmark. This is often in the context of a hedge or mutual fund that did not work as effectively as intended, creating an unexpected profit or loss instead.
Investopedia Says:
Tracking errors are reported as a "standard deviation percentage" difference. This measure reports the difference between the return you received and that of the benchmark you were trying to imit
Success rate 成功/通过率
critique  n.1.批评,批判, 评论; 审定; 检阅;鉴定(on)2.评论文, 短评3. 批评术, 批评法
unmanaged flexibility  n.自由浮动
unmanaged   非托管的，不可控的，自由的
transition probability   n.转化/蜕变/跃迁 概率up transition probability 上升概率
survival probability  残存几率, 存活率
Binomial Tree 二叉树图
A graphical representation of possible intrinsic values that an option may take at different nodes or time periods. The value of the option depends on the underlying stock or bond, and the value of the option at any node depends on the probability that the price of the underlying asset will either decrease or increase at any given node.  
potential value  潜在价值
take care to     n.一定,务必
Call Option  买入期权(一种协议，给与投资者以特定的价格在特定的时间内购买一种股票、债券、商品或其他金融工具的权力（但并非义务）)；看涨期权
Ex-Dividend  除息、不带息
recursive  n.循环的,递归的,
real number  n.实数   real line   实线
curve graph  n.曲线图 
middle line  中线
interest coverage ratio  n.盈利对利息之倍数
A ratio used to determine how easily a company can pay interest on outstanding debt. The interest coverage ratio is calculated by dividing a company's earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) of one period by the company's interest expenses of the same period:
statistical inference  n.统计推论/理/断
joint normal distribution　　联合正态分布
unit normal distribution　　单位正态分布
literally   adv.  逐字地, 照字面地; 实在地, 不加夸张地; 正确地; 简直
common stock  portfolio 　普通股投资组合
mean variance analysis　　均值方差分析
expected utility  期望效益/用
utility function  效用函数
quadratic utility function  二次效用函数
quadratic  a. 二次的　n. 二次方程式
downside risk  　下跌风险　负面风险（对个别证券在市场环境转坏的情况下价格可能下跌幅度的预测）An estimation of a security's potential to suffer a decline in price if the market conditions turn bad.
shortfall risk　空头风险
threshold 　　 n.临界（值）,阈值,门槛
constraint  　约束,约束条件, 强制
value at risk  风险价值
analytical method　  分析法　　分析方法
noteworthy 　adj.值得注意的, 显著的
taking log　取对数
opposite operation　对立的/反向运算
price relative  相对价格；比价；价格比
unbroken  　adj.  完整的; 继续的；不间断的,
Investment Horizon 投资期限
The total length of time that an investor will expect to hold any particular security or portfolio. The investment horizon is used to determine the income needs and desired risk exposure of the investor, which is then used to aid in security selection
independently and identically distributed 　独立相同分布
stationarity  　n.  固定性, 平稳性, 稳态
michelin    米其林(财富500强公司之一，总部所在地法国,主要经营轮胎橡胶)
instantaneous 　adj. 立即的； 即时的, 同时发生的, 瞬间的
time horizon  时间范围　定期性
The length of time over which an investment is made or held before it is liquidated. Time horizons can range from seconds, in the case of a day trader, all the way up to decades for a buy-and-hold investor. There is no "right" time frame - it depends on the investor's individual objectives.
iterative adj.  反复的,重复的,迭代的　 adv.　iteratively 
Iteration　迭代(法),循环,重复
recipen.1. 烹饪法;食谱;配方;制法2【医】处方;照处方配成的药3秘方,秘诀，诀窍，方法
European Option　欧洲式期权
An option that can only be exercised at the end of its life.
American Option  美式期权
An option that can be exercised anytime during its life. The majority of exchange-traded options are American.
running tabulation　连续表格
random number generator  n.随机号码产生器,随机数发生器
evaluate 　 vt.1. 对...估价, 对...作评价2. 【数】求...的值, 以数目表示
Market Timing　市场时机
market timing ability　市场择时能力
buy-and-hold strategy　　买入并持有策略
outline  n.提纲，要点，轮廓
cause and effect  因果　有因果关系的
equally likely outcomes　等可能结果
pairwise    ad. 对偶地(成对地)
unbroken  adj.  完整的; 继续的；不间断的,未破的
what if  假设分析
Tick　　最小波动幅度
The minimum upward or downward movement in the price of a security.
marking to market　以市值计价
stratified random sampling  分层随机抽样
point estimate  n.点估计:用作总体参数估计量的值
estimator  n.估计量
statistical estimation  n.统计估计
pitfall   n. 1. 陷阱, 圈套, 诱惑2. 隐蔽的危险, 易犯的错误
simple random sampling  简单随机抽样
sampling plan  n.抽样方案
systematic sampling  系统抽样
replication 　　n. 复制
quantifiable 　a. 可以计量的
Credit Quality　信用质量
cross sectional data  n.剖面数据
homogeneous  adj.1. 同种的, 同类的, 相似的2. 纯一的, 均质的; 均匀的3. 【数】齐性的, 齐次的
array　　数组　阵列
matrix  n.矩阵
panel data  固定样本数据
latitude     n.纬度
longitude   n.经度, 经线
hypothesis  n. 假设;前提　pl. -ses
shrinkage factor  收缩系/因数；收缩率
practitioner  　从业者
lower bound  n.下界
integraladj.1. 构成整体所必需的,主要的, 必备的2. 完整的, 整体的; 综合的3. 【数】整的; 积分的; 
calculus  n.微积分
asymptotic     a. 渐近线的
asymptote  　n.  渐近线
degree of confidence  置信度
confidence limit  n.置信界限
the level of significance　显著性水平
endpoint  　n.  端点, 终点
reliability factor  可靠性因子
literature  n. 著作; 文学; 文艺
standpoint  n.  立场, 看法, 观点
peakedness  n.峰度
resemble　　 vt.象; 类似
reprise　v重复，重奏n年金，租金
critical value  临界值
outweigh 　　v. 比...为重,比...重要,比...有价值
correction factor  n.校正系数，修正系数
out-of-sample  test 样本外检验
snoop     n.  到处窥视, 私家侦探v.  探听, 偷窃, 调查
snooping  n. 窥探者v. 窥伺,打听
plausible  adj.  貌似真实的, 貌似有理的; 花言巧语的; 貌似可信的
intergenerational  adj.  存在于两代[数代]人之间的
crucial  adj.  关键的,决定性的, 重要的,严厉的
cogent   a 有说服力的,使人信服的;切实的;有力的
cogency （指论据p 道理等的）说服力; 中肯
dow dividend strategy 　道琼斯红利策略
fractured   断裂的
synonym  n.同义词
partake  v1参与;分享,分担;陪同(吃饭)2 [口]吃光, 喝光3 带有某种性质[特征]等of/　in
rationale  n.理由,基本原理
income statement  n.收益表
Market Failure  市场失灵
An economic term that encompasses a situation where, in any given market, the quantity of a product demanded by consumers does not equate to the quantity supplied by suppliers. This is a direct result of a lack of certain economically ideal factors, which prevents equilibrium.
hyper-　　pref.  表示 “超出”, “过于”, “极度”, 
Hyperinflation  恶性通货膨胀
hetero- 　　构词成分　　　异的，杂的
heterogeneous　　adj. 驳杂的； 异种的, 异质的; 非均匀的
defunct　　adj.1. 死了的; (公司)倒闭了的, 已不存在的2. 已废止的, 已失效的3. [the defunct]【律】死人
The condition of a company, whether publicly traded or private, that has gone bankrupt and ceased to exist. If the company was publicly traded, it will be delisted from the exchange where it was listed, and its stock will be worth nothing. 
financial times  金融时报
Market Capitalization  总市值
anomaly 　n. 异常,反常；异常的人或物; 不规则
be meant to  应该是,希望是
null hypothesis  n.零假设
alternative hypothesis  备择假设
decision rule  决策规则
the power of a test　假设检验的正确性
parametric and nonparametrc test  参与和非参数检验
term stucture of interest rate  n.利率的期限结构
gauge　　n.1. 标准尺寸,标准规格[U][C]2. 测量仪器;规,表,计[C] 3. 大小,程度;范围;容量[U]4. 估计(或判断)方法[C]5. (枪管)的口径;(铁道的)轨距[U][C] 6. (金属板等的)厚度;(钢丝等的)直径[U][C]　vt.1. 量,测2. 估计,判断3. 给...定规格
bid and asked  n.喊价和要价
rigorous  a. 精准的，严厉的,严酷的,严格的
assertion   n.1. 主张, 要求, 断言2. 维护, 坚持3. 【数】断定, 命题
focal point   焦点
analogy   　n.  类似, 相似; 类推, 类比; 比拟; 模拟
trade off  　n. 权衡(折衷,换位,比较评定,放弃,交换)
detract from  减损; 降低
rejection point   拒绝点　抑制点　　critical value  n.临界值
critical region  判别区域　临界区域
pertinent   adj.  相关的, 切题的, 中肯的
statistically significant  统计上显著的 统计性显著
agnostic  　adj.  【哲】不可知论的n.  不可知论者
chi square  　n.卡方　x检验法
file away  把...归档(+away)She filed all her letters carefully她把她所有的信件仔细归档。
analysis of variance  n.方差分析
robust   adj.  强健的; 健全的; 茁壮的; 结实的, 坚固耐用的  稳定性　稳健性
outlier  n.门外汉　异常值
Equity Fund  股票资金(投资于范围广泛、多元化股票的共同基金) 
A mutual fund that invests principally in stocks. It can be actively or passively (index fund) managed. Also known as a "stock fund".
verbal   n.  准动词adj.  言语的, 逐字的, 口头的
casual clothing   休闲服饰
retail chain    n.零售联营
commercial paper  商业本票,商业票据(企业发行的无抵押、短期债务，经常用来筹集应收账款及库存的资金，利率一般低于当时市场利率)
An unsecured, short-term debt instrument issued by a corporation, typically for the financing of accounts receivable, inventories and meeting short-term liabilities. Maturities on commercial paper rarely range any longer than 270 days. The debt is usually issued at a discount, reflecting prevailing market interest rates.
pooled estimate  合并估计
tip  技巧
seniority         n.1. 年长2. 老资格; 资历深; 职位高3服务年限
preponderance   n.  重量的优势, 优越, 优势
ponder     v.  仔细考虑; 反思, 回想; 衡量; 沉思, 默想; 仔细考虑
mean difference  n.平均差
paired observations  对比观察
paired comparisons test  成对比较检验
paired comparisons method  n.成对比较法
paired comparison test  n.一对一比较试验
triple witching days 三重巫法日
singed-rank test    符号秩次检验
Runs Test  连续检验
A statistical procedure that examines whether a string of data is occurring randomly given a specific distribution. The runs test analyzes the occurrence of similar events that are separated by events that are different. 
spearman rank correlation  斯皮尔曼等级相关
bivariate   adj.  二元的, 二变量的n.  双变数
depart from  1. 离开; 从...出发2. 违反; 背离
in place of   代替
power of a test   假设检验的正确性 检定的功效 检验的势
indices  n.目录,指数,符号，索引   indices  index 的复数

index   n.  索引, 指数, 指针 v.  编入索引中; 指出 
in contrast with/to  和...形成对比［对照］
contend    v.  奋斗, 竞争, 斗争; 为...斗争; 坚决主张, 声称
philosophy  n.  哲学, 原理, 人生观
Fundamental Analysis  基本面分析(通过计算股票的内在价值评估其价值的方法。基本面分析员研究的范围从总体经济和行业环境以至公司本身的财务状况及管理)
A method of evaluating a security by attempting to measure its intrinsic value by examining related economic, financial and other qualitative and quantitative factors. Fundamental analysts attempt to study everything that can affect the security's value, including macroeconomic factors (like the overall economy and industry conditions) and individually specific factors (like the financial condition and management of companies). 
    The end goal of performing fundamental analysis is to produce a value that an investor can compare with the security's current price in hopes of figuring out what sort of position to take with that security (underpriced = buy, overpriced = sell or short).
This method of security analysis is considered to be the opposite of technical analysis.
intrinsic value  内在价值；固有价值
 1. The actual value of a company or an asset based on an underlying perception of its true value including all aspects of the business, in terms of both tangible and intangible factors. This value may or may not be the same as the current market value. Value investors use a variety of analytical techniques in order to estimate the intrinsic value of securities in hopes of finding investments where the true value of the investment exceeds its current market value.
    2. For call options, this is the difference between the underlying stock's price and the strike price. For put options, it is the difference between the strike price and the underlying stock's price. In the case of both puts and calls, if the respective difference value is negative, the instrinsic value is given as zero.
1. 一家公司或一种资产根据隐含价值概念评估的价值
2. 对于买入期权，相等于相关股票价格与行使价格之间的差额。对于出售期权，相等于行使价格与相关股票价格之间的差额。若相关股票价格与行使价格的差额为负数，则内在价值为零，这适用于买回及出售期权
whereas   conj.  然而; 鉴于; 反之
Insider   内幕人士 
Any person who has knowledge of, or access to, valuable nonpublic information about a corporation. 拥有或可接触公司有价值的非公开信息的任何人士
bandwagon  n.  乐队花车; 流行
wherein    adv.  在何处, 在其中
espouse   v.  支持, 赞成, 嫁娶
generally accepted accounting principles  n.公认会计原理;n.公认会计原则
much less  n.更不用说,何况; 更少; 不及
psychological factor  心理因素
Goodwill  商誉 
An account that can be found in the assets portion of a company's balance sheet. Goodwill can often arise when one company is purchased by another company. In an acquisition, the amount paid for the company over book value usually accounts for the target firm's intangible assets.
quantifiable  adj.  可以计量的 nonquantifiable adj不可能计量的
better off    景况较佳; 更有余裕
be tied up   被缠住的, 有要务在身的, 对某事有责任的
tie up    阻碍  n.用来捆扎的东西,停泊处,停止活动
reticent  adj.沉默寡言的, 缄默的, 有保留的, 含蓄的(of, about, on)
be reticent about [on] the matter对该问题保持沉默
be reticent of one's opinion有保留意见
random walk  n.随机漫步/步行法
empirical test  经验检验
self-fulfilling  自我实现的/(预言)等本身自然会实现的
technical trading 技术交易规则
Trough  波谷
The stage of the economy's business cycle that marks the end of a period of declining business activity and the transition to expansion. 
break through  突破
astute  adj.  机敏的; 狡猾的
contrary opinion rules  反市场操作观点
cash position  现金头寸
impending  adj.(常指不快之事)逼近的, 即将发生的, 紧急的
Put-Call Ratio  买入-出售比率
A ratio of the trading volume of put options to call options. It is used to gauge investor sentiment. 出售期权与买入期权交易量的比率，用作评估市场的投资气氛
pervasive   adj.  普遍的; 遍布的;渗透的; 弥漫的; 无处不在的
the smart money  聪明资金
confidence index  信心指数
Yield Spread  收益率差额/价
The difference between yields on differing debt instruments, calculated by deducting the yield of one instrument from another. The higher the yield spread, the greater the difference between the yields offered by each instrument. The spread can be measured between debt instruments of differing maturities, credit ratings and risk.
momentum indicator  动量指标
general trend  n.总趋势
overhang  vt.  (-hung)1. 悬于...之上; 突出于...之上2.(危险、灾难等)逼近; 威胁
rebound   回升；反弹
speculate    vi.1. 沉思, 思索, 揣想, 设想, 推测(about, on, upon)2. 投机(in)
vt.  对(有风险的事业)投资
Polarized Fractal Efficiency (PFE)  极化分形效率指标
A technical indicator developed by Hans Hannula that was invented to determine price efficiency over a user-defined time period. This indicator fluctuates between -100 and +100 with 0 as the center line. Securities with a PFE greater than zero are deemed to be trending up, while a reading of less than zero indicates the trend is down.
group charts  行业级别
point and figure charts  圈叉图
period of consolidation  盘整期 巩固期
Nikkei  日经指数
roller-coaster 过山车
Intraday  当天的
Another way of saying "within the day". Intraday price movements are particularly important to short-term traders looking to make many trades over the course of a single trading session. The term intraday is occasionally used to describe securities that trade on the markets during regular business hours, such as stocks and ETFs, as opposed to mutual funds, which must be bought from a dealer.
commensurate  adj.1. 同量的，同大的，同单位的（with）2. 相称的，相当的；成（适当）比例的（to; with）; 能通约的3. 匹配的，配比的
yield to      vt.服从,弯曲,凹进
exacerbate   vt.1. 使(病等)加重[恶化], 使(痛苦等)加深2. 激怒; 使烦恼
necessitate   vt.1. 使成为必需; 使需要2. [主要用于被动式]迫使 -tation n. 迫使,被迫
tangential    adj.  切线的, 正切的, 相切的
tangency    n.  接触;【数】正切, 切线
algorithm    n.  【数】算法; 运算法则; (数学用语) 算题的每步过程 (通常包括重复步骤)
Hurdle Rate  最低预期回报率
The minimum amount of return that a person requires before they will make an investment in something. 投资者进行投资要求的最低回报率
bimodal   adj.【统】(分布曲线)双峰的; 双模态的bimodal distribution【统】双峰分布
trait       n.  特色, 特性, 品质
magnitude  n [U] 1（通常指大的）量, 大小:2重要; 重要性; 重要程度
crunch     vt.发嘎吱嘎吱声,摩擦,压过;n.嘎吱嘎吱声,摩擦
mechanics   n.  力学; 机械学; 技术; (制做的或操作的）过程, 手法, 技巧
the nominal(stated) rate   名义利率
compound value   复利本利和,复利终值
Good money 好钱  Bad money 坏钱 All bad 全部一团糟 every lesson learned by the hard way 每一个教训都是以很痛苦的方式获得
wishful thinking 一厢情愿的想法    Breakeven point盈亏平衡点

Collapse 崩盘  sophisticated investors  理性的投资者  Cut loss 止损
grind out   用功做出
The Impact of Investment Horizon on the Optimal Portfolio Selection
投资期限的长度对投资组合选择的影响
~ (sth) (into sth)    （使事物）联合或合并
pertain  [p?(?)?tein]vi.1. 属于, 附属(to)2. 关于, 有关(to)3. 适合, 相配(to) n.附属
cross section  横截面,横断面
weighted mean  n.加权平均数
a.k.a.=also known as 又名，亦称
over and over 再三
bullet  一次还本贷款
Semivariance   半方差
A measure of the dispersion of all observations that fall below the mean or target value of a data set. Semivariance is an average of the squared deviations of values that are less than the mean. The formula for semivariance is as follows:
 


Where:
 n = the total number of observations below the mean
rt = the observed value
average = the mean or target value of the data set
注：有的地方1/n改为用1/（n-1）,即用sample
die  [dai]vi.  死亡, 消逝, 平息, 熄灭, 漠然, 渴望vt.  死n.  骰子, 冲模
dice  [dais]n. [die的复数, 在口语中亦可用作单数] (pl. dice, dices)骰子；掷骰子游戏 vt.切成丁
cumbersome  [?k?mb?s?m]adj.1. 麻烦的2. 不方便的, 笨重的
obscure  [?b?skju?]   a.不著名的；费解的 vt.使变模糊，掩盖
flip  [flip]  vt.快速翻动；轻抛；轻拍 n.轻抛 a.轻浮的
toss  [t?s]  v./ n.扔；猛抬(头)；掷钱币决定
contingent upon  视...而定
put option     认沽期权；看跌期权
An option contract giving the owner the right, but not the obligation, to sell a specified amount of an underlying security at a specified price within a specified time. This is the opposite of a call option, which gives the holder the right to buy shares.
boldface  ['b?uldfeis]  n.  黑体字, 粗体铅字
correlation coefficient  n.相关系数
correlation  相关
tedious  [?ti:di?s] a.乏味的，单调的，冗长的
redundant  [ri'd?nd?nt]  a.  多余的, 过剩的, 过多的, 冗长的
sprinter  n.短跑运动员 短跑选手
Roy’s safety-first criterion  Roy安全第一原则
Binomial Distribution     二项式分布
A probability distribution that summarizes the likelihood that a value will take one of two independent values under a given set of parameters or assumptions. The underlying assumptions of the binomial distribution are that there is only one outcome for each trial, that each trial has the same probability of success and that each trial is mutually exclusive.
pairwise disjoint set     n.两两不相交集
pairwise independence  n.两两独立
pairwise orthogonal     n.两两正交
orthogonal  [???θ??nl]adj.1. 直角的; 互相垂直的; 正交的2. (统计数学)互不相关的3. 
矩形的an orthogonal section正(交)剖面  n.  波向线
-wise  suff 后缀 (with ns forming adjs and advs 与名词结合构成形容词和副词) 
 in the manner or direction of 以某方式p 方法或沿某方向: likewise * clockwise * anti-clockwise * lengthwise. 
 (infml 口) with reference to; as far as sth is concerned 关於; 在某方面: businesswise * weatherwise * profitwise.
spike  [spaik]  n.  长钉, 鞋钉, 钉状物, 尖峰状物, 穗vt.  以大钉钉牢, 用尖物刺穿, 阻止, 弃置不用计] 尖峰信号[医] 峰, 峰形(示波图中); 穗状花序spiked  a.  有穗的adj.  短粗刺状(的)
hypothesis testing    n.假设测算
perspective  [p??spektiv]   n.视角，观点；远景；透视画法，透视图
resulting  [计] 结果的, 合成的
commit  [k??mit]  vt.犯(错误等)，干(蠢事等);调拨…供使用; 对...作出保证； 承诺； 把...提交给； 把...押交［拘留， 判处］.
commit oneself on  对...表态     commit oneself to  委身于， 专心致志于
turn out  [?t?:n ?aut]   结果是；关掉，旋熄；制造；驱逐
Value Stock  价值股票
A stock that tends to trade at a lower price relative to it's fundamentals (i.e. dividends, earnings, sales, etc.) and thus considered undervalued by a value investor. Common characteristics of such stocks include a high dividend yield, low price-to-book ratio and/or low price-to-earnings ratio.
价值投资者认为估值过低的股票。这种股票的常见特点是高股息收益及价值相对账面比率低
stumble  [stum?ble || 'st?mbl]n.  绊倒, 失策v.  绊倒, 失策, 失足; 使绊倒, 使困惑
stumble upon [on, across]  偶然找到, 无意中发现, 偶然碰见[发现]
systematically  adv.  有系统地; 有计划地; 有组织地; 有条不紊地
finite variance   有限方差
allow for  考虑到




=========================
volum2
=========================
franchise  n.选举权；特许权；专营权
disposable income 　　 one can spend oneself after paying one's income tax, social security contributions, etc 可支配收入（缴纳所得税p社会福利金等之后自己可以动用的部分）
GDP  国内生产总值：一个经济体系在特定时期内生产的所有货品及服务的总值，其中包括消费、政府购买、投资及出口减进口
Gross Domestic Product (GDP)
The monetary value of all the finished goods and services produced within a country's borders in a specific time period, though GDP is usually calculated on an annual basis. It includes all of private and public consumption, government outlays, investments and exports less imports that occur within a defined territory. 
GDP = C + G + I + NX
where:
"C" is equal to all private consumption, or consumer spending, in a nation's economy
"G" is the sum of government spending
"I" is the sum of all the country's businesses spending on capital
"NX" is the nation's total net exports, calculated as total exports minus total imports. (NX = Exports - Imports)
GNP  国民生产总值：一种经济统计数据，相等于国内生产总值（GDP）加国内居民来自海外投资的收入，减海外居民在国内赚取的收入
self-correcting  a.  自动调整的, 自动修正的	
Consideration  约定金额；代价；对价；考虑因素　pecuniary consideration  金钱报酬
similarity consideration (=similitude consideration)  相似［模拟］条件
stochastic consideration  或然率考虑　　stochastic  [st?u?k?stik] adj.【数】随机的
pecuniary  [pi?kju:ni?ri]　a.1金钱上的，金钱的；2应罚款的
keynesian model  n.凯恩斯派的模型
Elasticity  弹性　　一个可变因素对另一个可变因素的敏感度。更具体来说，是指消费者对价格变动的反应。计算方法为：需求量变动% / 价格变动% 
A measure of a variable's sensitivity to a change in another variable. In economics, elasticity refers the degree to which individuals (consumers/producers) change their demand/amount supplied in response to price or income changes.   Calculated as:
	
   cross elasticity   交叉弹性
   unit elasticity    n.单一弹性
Efficiency　　效率　效能
A level of performance that describes a process that uses the lowest amount of inputs to create the greatest amount of outputs. Efficiency relates to the use of all inputs in producing any given output, including personal time and energy.
slash  [sl??]  vt.砍；大幅度削减 n.砍，砍痕；斜线号
slope   【数】斜率[度]  ;【刷 】斜体
Econometrics  计量经济学：将统计理论运用在经济上，目的在于预测未来趋势
well-being  [?wel?bi:i?]  n.幸福；健康；福利
debt securities  债务证券；债券
risk premium  风险溢价
We must choose a consistent time frame in which to count the defects.This will ensure that we have an apples-to-apples comparison.  其中apples-to-apples意思是有可比性的
apples-to-apples   同类相比较   apple to orange     不同类的比较
公平，平分的原则，我们现在常说的AA制就是这么来的。
excruciate  [iks?kru??ieit]vt.1. 使苦恼[痛苦]2. [古]拷打; 折磨excruciating  [?k?skru???e?t??]adj.1. 使苦恼的; 极痛苦的; 难忍受的2. 极度的, 强烈的 -atinglyadv.n.1. 苦恼, 巨痛; 折磨2. [古]酷刑, 拷问n.

grind out  用功做出
deplete  [di'pli:t]  v. 耗尽,使...空竭  n.亏空
Consumer Surplus	消费者盈余/剩余
An economic measure of consumer satisfaction, which is calculated by analyzing the difference between what consumers are willing to pay for a good or service relative to its market price. A consumer surplus occurs when the consumer is willing to pay more for a given product than the current market price. 
Investopedia Says:
Consumers always like to feel like they are getting a good deal on the goods and services they buy and consumer surplus is simply an economic measure of this satisfaction. For example, assume a consumer goes out shopping for a CD player and he or she is willing to spend $250. When this individual finds that the player is on sale for $150, economists would say that this person has a consumer surplus of $100. 
消费者为一定数量的产品愿意支付的总价格和必须支付的总价格（或市价）之间的差异
Man proposes, God disposes.  [谚]谋事在人, 成事在天。
propose sb. for         提名某人(任某职); 推荐某人
propose to sb.          向某人求婚
trade off     相互替代，交替换位, 交替使用, 卖掉
discriminate  [dis?krimineit]  vi.(between)区别；(against)歧视
deadweight loss  净损失，额外损失,实在损失,无谓的损失
The costs to society created by an inefficiency in the market.
Investopedia Says:
Mainly used in economics, the term "deadweight loss" can be applied to any deficiency due to an inefficient allocation of resources. Lost production due to inaccurate forecasting for labor is an example of a deadweight loss.
Tax Incidence　　税收归宿，纳税负担，课税归宿
An economic term for the division of a tax burden between buyers and sellers. Tax incidence is related to the price elasticity of supply and demand. When supply is more elastic than demand, the tax burden falls on the buyers. If demand is more elastic than supply, producers will bear the cost of the tax.
as opposed to  	与...形成对照
entrepreneur  [en?tre?pre?neur |]n.  企业家; 主办人
entrepreneurial  adj.  企业家的; 中间商的; 创业者的
as with  与…一样
assemble  [?'sembl]vt.  集合, 收集, 装配vi.  集合[计] 汇编[化] 装配
assembly  [??sembli]    n.1议会；2集会，集合;4组装, 安装,组合,部件,系统
assembly line       装配线, 流水作业线
shirk  [??rk /???k]   v.  1逃避, 躲避, 推卸; 2逃避义务, 偷懒
account for... 1解释..., 说明..., 是...的原因/理由, 2(数量)占... 3对...负有责任; 4证明
Turnover
1. In accounting, the number of times an asset is replaced during a financial period. 
2. The number of shares traded for a period as a percentage of the total shares in a portfolio or of an exchange.
Investopedia Says:
1. In accounting, turnover often refers to inventory or accounts receivable. A quick turnover is desired because it means that inventory is not sitting on the shelves for too long. 
2. In a portfolio, a small turnover is desired because it means the investor is paying less in commissions to the broker. It is called "churning" when a broker unethically generates numerous trades solely in order to increase commissions
Turnover  周转率、成交量解释/例子:
1. 在会计上，指在财务时期一种资产置换的次数。最常用于库存或应收账款周转率
2. 在证券交易上，指一个投资组合或交易所在一段期间交易股份的数量占总股票数量的百分比
Herfindahl―Hirschman lndex   HHl  赫芬达尔?赫斯曼指数
用来评估一个行业或市场组成部分的集中度。HHI以行业中每个竞争者市场份额百分点的平方数之和求得。理论上说，其范围从最大的10000(1个垄断者占有100％的市场份额)到最小的不到1(有许多竞争者，每个竞争者的市场份额不到l％)。司法部的指引将HHI值小于1000的归类为非集中行业，将介于1000―1800之间的行业视为适度集中行业，而将大于1800的行业归类为高度集中行业。
赫芬达尔―赫希曼指数(Herfindahl-Hirschman Index，简称HHI） 
什么是赫芬达尔―赫希曼指数 
　　赫芬达尔―赫希曼指数，简称赫芬达尔指数，是一种测量产业集中度的综合指数[1]。它是指一个行业中各市场竞争主体所占行业总收入或总资产百分比的平方和，用来计量市场份额的变化，即市场中厂商规模的离散度。
　　赫芬达尔指数是产业市场集中度测量指标中较好的一个，是经济学界和政府管制部门使用较多的指标。 
赫芬达尔―赫希曼指数的计算 
　　赫芬达尔指数能区别公司市场占有率为基础的市场结构。赫芬达尔指数(Herfindahl Index)的计算方法如下
　　1、取得竞争对手的市场占有率，可忽略过小的竞争对手。 
　　2、将市场占有率平方。 
　　3、将这些平方值加总。 
赫芬达尔――赫希曼指数是用某特定市场上所有企业的市场份额的平方和来表示，其公式为：
 
　　式中： 
X――市场的总规模 
Xi――i企业的规模 
Si＝Xi／X――第i个企业的市场占有率 
n――该产业内的企业数 
　　赫芬达尔一赫希曼指数是计算某一市场上50家最大企业(如果少于50家企业就是所有企业)每家企业市场占有份额(取百分之的分子)的平方之和。显然， HHI越大，表示市场集中程度越高，垄断程度越高。 
　　该指数不仅能反映市场内大企业的市场份额，而且能反映大企业之外的市场结构，因此，能更准确地反映大企业对市场的影响程度。 
赫芬达尔-赫希曼指数的特点 
　　赫芬达尔指数是产业市场集中度测量指标中较好的一个，具有如下特点。 
　　(1)当独家企业垄断时，该指数等于10000，当所有企业规模相同时，该指数等于1/n，故而这一指标在1/n～100000之间变动，数值越大，表明企业规模 分布的不均匀度越高。 
　　(2)兼有绝对集中度和相对集中度指标的优点，并避免了它们的缺点。因为该值对规模较大的上位企业的市场份额反映比较敏感，而对众多小企业的市场份额小幅度的变化反映很小。 
(3)可以不受企业数量和规模分布的影响，较好地测量产业的集中度变化情况。 
Herfindahl-Hirschman Index (HHI)
A commonly accepted measure of market concentration. It is calculated by squaring the market share of each firm competing in a market, and then summing the resulting numbers. The HHI number can range from close to zero to 10,000. The HHI is expressed as: 
HHI = s12 + s22 + s32 + ... + sn2 (where sn is the market share of the ith firm). 
The closer a market is to being a monopoly, the higher the market's concentration (and the lower its competition). If, for example, there were only one firm in an industry, that firm would have 100% market share, and the HHI would equal 10,000 (100^2), indicating a monopoly. Or, if there were thousands of firms competing, each would have nearly 0% market share, and the HHI would be close to zero, indicating nearly perfect competition.

The U.S. Department of Justice uses the HHI for evaluating mergers.
Investopedia Says:
The U.S. Department of Justice considers a market with a result of less than 1,000 to be a competitive marketplace; a result of 1,000-1,800 to be a moderately concentrated marketplace; and a result of 1,800 or greater to be a highly concentrated marketplace. As a general rule, mergers that increase the HHI by more than 100 points in concentrated markets raise antitrust concerns.
Outsourcing   外包
A practice used by different companies to reduce costs by transferring portions of work to outside suppliers rather than completing it internally
  指将部分工序转交外部供spread out  
(人群等)散开；伸展，延伸
应商，不在公司内进行，从而减低成本的措施
hone  [h?un]  n.  磨刀石, 抱怨, 想念 vt.  用磨刀石磨, 磨练　well-honed adj
spread out    分摊；(人群等)散开；伸展，延伸
price taker  　n.价格接受者，随行就市的商人
Price-Taker
1. An investor whose buying or selling transactions are assumed to have no effect on the market. 
2. A firm that can alter its rate of production and sales without significantly affecting the market price of its product.
Investopedia Says:
1. In the context of the stock market, individual investors are price-takers.
2. Suppose you sell water, which of course is supplied by millions of other places, including the sky. If you decide to set the price of a gallon of your water at $10, you will likely sell nothing because this commodity is readily available elsewhere for a much cheaper price.
lay off  (暂时)解雇；停止做
well-defined  	adj 定义明确的; 清晰的
communications   commission   联邦通讯委员会
pharmaceutical  a.  药学的, 制药的, 药用的, 药物的, 药剂师的, 药师的
n.	药品, 成药, 药剂
price discrimination  n.价格差别
A pricing strategy that charges customers different prices for the same product or service. In pure price discrimination, the seller will charge each customer the maximum price that he or she is willing to pay. In more common forms of price discrimination, the seller places customers in groups based on certain attributes and charges each group a different price.
Investopedia Says:	
Price discrimination allows a company to earn higher profits than standard pricing because it allows firms to capture every last dollar of revenue available from each of its customers. While perfect price discrimination is illegal, when the optimal price is set for every customer, imperfect price discrimination exists. For example, movie theaters usually charge three different prices for a show. The prices target various age groups, including youth, adults and seniors. The prices fluctuate with the expected income of each age bracket, with the highest charge going to the adult population.
monopolist  [m??n?p?list]n.1. 	独占者, 垄断者; 专利者; 专卖者2.垄断论者; 专利论者
Rent-seeking  寻租
1、经济学上把超出机会成本的获利称作“租”，因此，诉诸非市场机制来获取“租”的活动就被称作“寻租”。它是一种维护既得经济利益或是对既得利益进行再分配的非生产性活动，本身并不能增加社会的福利，且需耗费社会成本。
2、个人和利益集团意在直接或间接地获得更多的消费者剩余、生产者剩余或经济利益而影响公共政策的行为。
When a company, organization or individual uses their resources to obtain an economic gain from others without reciprocating any benefits back to society through wealth creation.
Investopedia Says:
An example of rent-seeking is when a company lobbies the government for loan subsidies, grants or tariff protection. These activities don't create any benefit for society, they just redistribute resources from the taxpayers to the special-interest group.
lobby  [?l?bi]n.大厅，休息室；院外活动集团 v游说, 游说议员; 经常出入休息室
Squeeze
1. In financial terms, a period of time when borrowing is difficult. 
2. In general business terms, times when increasing costs cannot be passed onto consumers. The decrease in profits is said to be caused by a "squeeze" on profit margins.
Investopedia Says:
Be careful not to confuse this with the short squeeze, which is an upward movement in price of a stock caused by investors covering their short positions.
Squeeze  紧缩  解释/例子:
1. 对于金融市场而言，指借贷困难的时期
2. 对于一般商业，指成本不断增长，但不能转嫁给消费者。利润率紧缩导致利润减低
Short Squeeze
A situation in which a lack of supply and an excess demand for a traded stock forces the price upward.
Investopedia Says:
Short squeezes occur more often in smaller cap stocks with small floats. 
If a stock starts to rise rapidly, the trend may continue to escalate because the short sellers will likely want out. For example, say a stock rises 15% in one day, those with short positions may be forced to liquidate and cover their position by purchasing the stock. If enough short sellers buy back the stock, the price is pushed even higher.
squeeze  [skwi:z]   v./ n.挤；榨取；挤过；握(手)；拮据
pronounced  [pr??naunst]    a.明显的, 显著的, 明白的, 断然的
prisoners’ 　dilemma 　囚徒困境
collude  [k??lu:d]　　v.串通（作弊），共谋
collusion  串通共谋，串通舞弊
A non-competitive agreement between rivals that attempts to disrupt the market's equilibrium. By collaborating with each other, rival firms look to alter the price of a good to their advantage. The parties may collectively choose to restrict the supply of a good, and/or agree to increase its price in order to maximize profits. Groups may also collude by sharing private information, allowing them to benefit from insider knowledge.
Investopedia Says:
Collusion involves people cooperating or working together when they should be competing. In the stock market, collusion can take many forms. Traders participating in accommodation trading, where goods are exchanged for non-competitive prices, are involved in collusion. 
Colluding traders might share private information regarding upcoming takeovers, allowing them to benefit from insider trading. Price rigging also involves the collusion of sellers, who inflate the price of an asset to realize higher profits.
rigging  n.操纵证券市场
rig  [rig]　vt. 垄断；装帆 n.船桅(或帆等)的装置
kinked'demand curve  　n.折弯/斯威齐需求曲线
dominant firm 　 优势厂商，主要公司，主要商号,占统治地位的公司
weigh  [wei　]vt.1. 称, 称...的重量, 估量...的轻重2. 考虑, 斟酌; 衡量
~ sth (with/against sth) consider carefully the relative value or importance of sth 仔细考虑某事物的相对价值或重要性等; 权衡; 斟酌:
better-off  a.  境况较好的
factor market  生产要素市场
marginal revenue product  n.边际收益产量
trade  sth　for sth　以...换取...
trad sb for sb       同某人交换某物
(phr v) trade sth in (for sth) give (a used article) to a seller as part of the payment for a new article 用（旧物）贴换新物: He traded in his car for a new model. 他把旧汽车折价添钱买了辆新型号的. trade sth off (against sth) give sth up (in exchange for sth else) as a compromise 放弃某物作为让步（以换取他物）: The company is prepared to trade off its up-market image against a stronger appeal to teenage buyers. 该公司拟改变只售高档商品的形像, 以吸引青少年顾客. trade on sth (esp derog 尤作贬义) make use of sth for one's own advantage 利用某事谋取私利: You shouldn't trade on her sympathy. 你不应该利用她的同情心. * He trades on his father's reputation. 他用他父亲的名誉牟利.
renewable  [ri?nju(?)?bl]adj.1. 可更新的; 可再生的2. 可恢复[复活]的3. (契约等)可延期[更新]的, 继续有效的4. 可重新开始的 a renewable contract可续订的契约
curtail  [cur?tail || k??'te?l] v.n.   缩短,减少，缩减 简略, 剥夺
economic rent  经济地租,经济租金
生产要素所有者的收入，即等于或高于吸引该所有者提供要素用于生产的金额
Unemployment Rate
The percentage of the total labor force that is unemployed but actively seeking employment and willing to work. 
Investopedia Says:
From 1948 to 2004, the monthly U.S. unemployment rate has ranged between about 2.5% to 10.8%, averaging approximately 5.6%.  The unemployment rate is considered a lagging indicator, confirming but not foreshadowing long-term market trends.  
foreshadow  v.  成为前兆, 预示, 暗示
Discouraged Worker  失望工人
An economic term for a person who is eligible for employment and is able to work, but is currently unemployed and has not attempted to find employment in the last four weeks. Discouraged workers have usually given up on searching for a job because they found no suitable employment options and/or were met with lack of success when applying.
Investopedia Says:
Some discouraged workers, however, are voluntarily unemployed. Stay-at-home parents, for example, have chosen to not work in order to tend to their children and pursue other interests.
Since discouraged workers are no longer looking for employment, they are not counted as active in the labor force. This means that unemployment rates, which are based on labor force calculations, do not consider discouraged workers as unemployed.
employment statistics  n.就业（率）统计
Aggregate Hours
The sum of the hours worked by all employed people, either full or part time, during the course of a year. Aggregate hours can also refer to the total hours worked by one sector or group of workers.
Investopedia Says:
Aggregate hours is a measure of the total labor required to produce real GDP. Because it reports a total number of hours, it generally provides a better measure for total labor than the number of people employed. Between the overtime hours, part-time and full-time jobs, the number of people employed cannot provide as accurate a quantifiable measure of total labor.　　　quantifiable  [quan?ti?fi?a?ble |　adj.  可以计量的
abstain from  戒; 弃权; 避免
Full Employment　　充分就业  no cyclical unemployment but frictional and structural still exist
A situation in which all available labor resources are being used in the most economically efficient way. Full employment embodies the highest amount of skilled and unskilled labor that could be employed within an economy at any given time. The remaining unemployment is frictional. 
Investopedia Says:
Frictional unemployment is the amount of unemployment that results from workers who are in between jobs, but are still in the labor force. Full employment is attainable within any economy, but may result in an inflationary period. The inflation would result from workers, as a whole, having more disposable income, which would drive prices upward.
Many economists have estimated the amount of frictional unemployment, with the number ranging from 2-7% of the labor force.
beverage  [bev?er?age || 'bev?r?d?]n.  饮料
apparel  [ap?par?el || ?'p?r?l]n.  衣服, 服装; 外观; 衣着　v.  使穿衣, 装饰
overstate  [??uv??steit]　vt.把...讲得过分; 夸大, 夸张
entitlement  [en'ti?tle?ment || -m?nt]n.  应得的权利; 津贴
entitlement payment  n.津贴
National Bureau of Economic Research (NBER)
This private, non-profit, non-partisan （非政治性）research organization's main aim is to promote greater understanding of how the economy works. It disseminates economic research among public policymakers, business professionals and the academic community.
Investopedia Says:
Hundreds of the nation's leading scholars in economics and business are also NBER researchers, who focus on four types of empirical research: developing new statistical measurements, estimating quantitative models of economic behavior, assessing the effects of public policies on the U.S. economy, and projecting the effects of alternative policy proposals. Twelve of the 31 American Nobel Prize winners in Economics have been researchers at the bureau.
in terms of  以 … 之观点, 以 … 之方式
compensation  ①报酬②补偿,赔偿（金）③［美］薪水， 工资（for）
compensation of employees  雇员的报酬
Monetarist  n.货币学派;n.货币主义者
An economist who holds the strong belief that the economy's performance is determined almost entirely by changes in the money supply.
Investopedia Says:
Milton Friedman was a well-known monetarist.
Monetarism
A set of views based on the belief that inflation depends on how much money the government prints. It is closely associated with Milton Friedman, who argued, based on the Quantity Theory of Money, that the government should keep the money supply fairly steady, expanding it slightly each year mainly to allow for the natural growth of the economy. 
Investopedia Says:
Monetarism had it's heyday in the early 1980's, when economists, governments and investors eagerly jumped at every new money supply statistic. In the years that followed, however, monetarism fell out of favor with economists, and the link between different measures of money supply and inflation proved to be less clear than most monetarist theories had suggested. Many central banks today have stopped setting monetary targets and instead have adopted strict inflation targets. 
economy  经济；经济体系
over time  随着时间的过去
disposable  / d??sp?uz?bl; d?Aspoz?bl/ adj [esp attrib 尤作定语] 
 made to be thrown away after use 用完即可丢弃的; 一次性的: disposable razors, nappies, syringes, plates 一次性的剃刀p 尿片p 注射器p 盘子. 
 (finance 财) available for use 可动用的: disposable assets, capital, resources, etc 可支配的资产p 资本p 资源等 * disposable income, ie that one can spend oneself after paying one's income tax, social security contributions, etc 可支配收入（缴纳所得税p 社会福利金等之後自己可以动用的部分）.
Depression
A severe and prolonged recession characterized by inefficient economic productivity, high unemployment and falling price levels.
Investopedia Says:
In times of depression, consumers' confidence and investments decrease, causing the economy to shut down. The classic example of this occurred in the 1930s, when the Great Depression shook the global economy
Depression  经济萧条
长期持续的严重经济衰退情况，特点包括经济生产力低、失业率高及价格下跌
prolong  [pro?long || pr?'l?? /-'l??]v.  延长, 拉长; 拖长的发音; 拖延
Derivatives  派生产品；衍生产品；衍生金融投资工具
衍生产品或工具的价值随着一个或多个基础市场变量（如股票或商品价格、利率或汇率）的变化而变化。基础衍生产品包括远期合约、期货、掉期、期权、认购或认沽权证和可转换债券。
Credit Union
Member-owned financial co-operative. These institutions are created and operated by its members and profits are shared amongst the owners.
Investopedia Says:
As soon as you deposit funds into a credit union account, you become a partial owner and participate in the union's profitability. Credit unions are formed by large corporations and organizations for their employees and members.
Credit Union  信用合作社
由会员拥有的财务合作社。这些机构由其会员成立及营运，利润也由会员分享
repeal  [ri?pi?l]
n.  (法令等的)废除[弃, 止], 作废, 撤销; [英]取消联合(19世纪初, 爱尔兰独立运动领袖奥康诺等反对与英国并成联合王国的主张); [美]废除禁酒法
vt.废除, 撤销(法律、判决、决议等); 召回; 放弃, 否定
grow out  出[发]芽
grow out of  1. 长得太大而穿不上衣服2.产生于， 起因于, 来自于3. (由于成长)抛弃(早年的习惯)
circumvent  
/ ?s??k?m?vent; ?s?k?mAv?nt/ v [Tn] (fml 文) find a way of overcoming or avoiding (sth) 设法克服或避免（某事物）; 规避; 回避: circumvent a law, rule, problem, difficulty 规避一法规p 规则p 问题p 困难. > circumvention
Federal Funds Rate
The interest rate at which a depository institution lends immediately available funds (balances at the Federal Reserve) to another depository institution overnight.
Investopedia Says:
This is what news reports are referring to when they talk about the Fed changing interest rates. In fact, the FOMC sets a target for this rate, but not the actual rate itself (because it is determined by the open market).
Federal Funds Rate  联邦基金利率
一家存托机构利用手上的资金向另一家存托机构借出隔夜贷款的利率
Discount Rate
1. The interest rate that an eligible depository institution is charged to borrow short-term funds directly from a Federal Reserve Bank. 
2. The interest rate used in determining the present value of future cash flows.
Investopedia Says:
1. This type of borrowing from the Fed is fairly limited. Institutions will often seek other means of meeting short-term liquidity needs. The Federal funds discount rate is one of two interest rates the Fed sets, the other being the overnight lending rate, or the Fed funds rate.
2. For example, let's say you expect $1,000 dollars in one year's time. To determine the present value of this $1,000 (what it is worth to you today) you would need to discount it by a particular rate of interest (often the risk-free rate but not always). Assuming a discount rate of 10%, the $1,000 in a year's time would be the equivalent of $909.09 to you today (1000/[1.00 + 0.10]).   
Discount Rate  贴现率、折让率
1. 合资格存托机构直接向美国联邦储备银行借贷短期资金的利率
2. 计算未来现金流现值的利率
special drawing right  特别提款权
Treasury Bill  短期国库券
美国政府发行的债务证券，期限少于一年。短期国库券通过竞标过程发售，价格相对面值有折扣，所以不会像大部分其他债券一般支付定额利息
treasury notes  n.美国财政部发行的中期证券
Federal Reserve Notes  联邦储备券
currency drains  n.货币外流 －银行外货币持有增加
Capital Account
The net result of public and private international investments flowing in and out of a country.
Investopedia Says:
The net results includes foreign direct investment, plus changes in holdings of stocks, bonds, loans, bank accounts, and currencies.
Capital Account  资本帐户
流入及流出一个国家公共及私人国际性投资的净额
ready cash  现金; 现款
proliferate  / pr??l?f?re?t; US pr?u-; proAl?f??ret/ v 
 [I] produce new growth or offspring rapidly; multiply （迅速地）繁殖; 增殖; 增生. 
 [Tn] reproduce (cells, etc) 分裂, 繁殖（细胞等）. 
 [I] increase rapidly in numbers （数量）激增.
> proliferation / pr??l?f??re??n; US pr?u-; pro?l?f?Are??n/ n 
1 [U] proliferating or being proliferated （迅速的）繁殖; 增殖; 增生: [attrib 作定语] a nuclear non-proliferation treaty, ie one aimed at preventing the spreadof nuclear weapons to countries that do not already possess them 禁止核扩散条约. 
2 [C usu sing 通常作单数] rapid growth or increase 迅速的繁殖或增长.
costlier  a. 较昂贵的
costly通常指“由于物品华丽、稀少而价格高的”， 如：costly jewels 贵重的宝石。expensive系常用词， 指“价格超过货物本身的价值或一般人的购买力”， 如：an expensive book 一本价钱贵的书。dear 指“价格比通常情况或其实际价值高”， 如：Meat is dear these days. 近日肉类很贵。valuable 指“由于有价值很值钱而价格高的”， 如：valuable collections 贵重的收藏品。 invaluable指“价值高得不能以钱来评估的”， 即“无价的”， 如：invaluable aid 宝贵的援助
Quantity Theory Of Money
An economic theory which proposes a positive relationship between changes in the money supply and the long-term price of goods.  It states that increasing the amount of money in the economy will eventually lead to an equal percentage rise in the prices of products and services. The calculation behind the quantity theory of money is based upon Fisher Equation:
Calculated as:
 
Where: 
M represents the money supply.
V represents the velocity of money.
P represents the average price level.
T represents the volume of transactions in the economy.
Investopedia Says:
This theory originated in the sixteenth century as European economists noticed higher levels of inflation associated with importing gold or silver from the Americas.  
According to how the formula is derived, holding the transaction volume and velocity of money constant, any increases in the money supply will yield a proportional increase in the average price level.
Quantity Theory of Money  货币数量理论 
Velocity  速率
unchecked  未受制止的, 未加抑制的, 未经检查的
/ ??n?t?ekt; ?nAt??kt/ adj (derog 贬) not resistedor restrained 不受抑制的; 未加约束的: the enemy's unchecked advance 敌军未受阻遏向前推进 * rumours spreading unchecked 广为流传而未受制止的谣言 * The use of credit continues/grows unchecked. 信用贷款不断增加而未受限制.
GDP Deflator　名义国内生产总值(nominal GDP)是未经价格变动调整的产值，按当时（即计算期或当期）的市场价格计算。 实际(real)国内生产总值则是扣除了价格变动因素的产值，以某一基准年的价格计算。联系实际与名义产值的就是GDP价格平减指数，该指数是正式的通货膨胀指标之一。 若实际产出不变，但价格持续上升，名义GDP亦会上升。
Deflator　　紧缩指数，平减物价指数，消除通货膨胀指数
或　通货紧缩因子：用于调整通货膨胀前后的价差
GDP Deflator  GDP平减数
在计算GDP时用以平衡通胀的因素，方法为将根据当时价值计算的生产额转换成固定美元的GDP。GDP平减数能显示出基准年GDP的变动受到价格变动影响的程度
spiral  ['spair?l]n.  螺形之物, 螺旋线a.  螺旋形的, 盘旋的
vi.	螺旋形下降, 螺旋形上升, 螺旋形行进vt.  使螺旋形行进
flat spirals  　　　　平螺旋线, 光滑旋管
deflationary spiral  紧缩的螺旋式上升
deflate  
v 
 / d??fle?t; d?Aflet/ [Tn] (a) let air or gas out of (a balloon, tyre, etc); let down 放出（气球p 轮胎等）的气. (b) (fig 比喻) make (sb, esp sb proud or too confident) feel or appear embarrassed or discouraged 使（某人, 尤指骄傲的或自负的人）尴尬, 泄气: I felt quite deflated by your nasty remark. 你那些难听的话使我觉得无地自容. * Nothing could deflate his ego/pomposity, ie make him less self-assured or pompous. 任何事都不能削弱他的自信心[气焰]. 
 / ?di??fle?t; diAflet/[I, Tn] reduce the amount of money in circulation in(an economy), in order to lower prices or keep them steady 紧缩（通货）: The Government decided to deflate. 政府决定紧缩通货
with no initial change in aggregate demand  初始总需求无变化
Boom　　繁荣,高涨,市面繁荣,上升,景气
A period of time during which sales or business activity increases rapidly.
bust  　　经营失败,破产, 倒闭，暴降
the boom turn into a bust 繁荣终结
net effect   最后效果; 综合效果
discretionary fiscal policy  任意性、自由裁量(斟酌使用)(相机抉择)(自行决定)的财政政策：是指政府通过修订财政政策，如改变税率结构或改变财政支出计划，从而导致预算收支的变化。但另一方面，在预算收支中还有相当大的大部分是自动增长或减少，而不能由政府自行决定。
automatic fiscal  policy    自动(稳定)的财政政策	
automatic fiscal stabilizers  财政自动稳定因素
automatic stabilizer   自动稳定因素/措施
An economic policy or program that increases or decreases automatically to offset the current economic trend without government assistance.
Investopedia Says:
An example of such a policy would be unemployment insurance
tax wedge　　　税收楔子  工资税收影响：税前工资率与税后工资率的差
supply Cside effect 供应面
analogous  [??n?l?g?s]　　a.相似的
crowd out  挤出, 排挤
medicare  [?medi?k??]n.1. [美, 加]对老年病人的国家医疗照顾制2. 医疗救护
levy  [?levi]　　vt.征收(税等) ，扣押某物（迫使还债n.征税，税款
balanced budget multiplier  n.平衡预算乘数
complication  [?k?mpli?kei??n]　n.(新出现的)困难，难题；并发症
built-in　　　内在的; 固有的；嵌入的; 嵌装的; 固定的
generational imbalance 连续不均衡：假设目前生产适应现行的税收和收益水平下，在目前和未来之间财政不均衡的分布
induced taxes 　诱发性税收
与实际GDP变化有关的税收
Stagflation
A condition of slow economic growth and relatively high unemployment - a time of stagnation - accompanied by a rise in prices, or inflation.
Investopedia Says:
Stagflation occurs when the economy isn't growing but prices are, which is not a good situation for a country to be in. This happened to a great extent during the 1970s, when world oil prices rose dramatically, fueling sharp inflation in developed countries. For these countries, including the U.S., stagnation increased the inflationary effects.
stagflation  [st??flei??n]　n.  【经】经济停滞与通货膨胀　滞胀
Stagnation　　停滞，萧条
A period of little or no growth in the economy. Economic growth of less than 2-3% is considered stagnation. Sometimes used to describe low trading volume or inactive trading in securities.
Investopedia Says:
A good example of stagnation was the U.S. economy in the 1970s.

	



=========================
volum3
=========================
footnote  n.附注,脚注
proxy statement  n.委托书
A document containing the information that a company is required by the SEC to provide to shareholders so they can make informed decisions about matters that will be brought up at an annual stockholder meeting.
Investopedia Says:
Issues covered in a proxy statement can include proposals for new additions to the board of directors, information on directors' salaries, information on bonus and options plans for directors, and any declarations made by company management.
ongoing  / ??ng?u??; An?o??/ adj [esp attrib 尤作定语] continuing to exist or progress 继续存在的; 进行中的: an ongoing debate 持续的辩论 * an ongoing programme of research 正在进行的研究计划.
regular member  正式会员
affiliate membership　　附属会员　
peripheral  [p??rif?r?l]adj.1. 不重要的;周界的;外围的;外部的;边缘的2.非本质的;不深入的;肤浅的
incidental  [,insi'dent?l]a.  附带的, 偶然的, 容易发生的n.  附带事件
[医] 偶然的[经] 附带的, 非主要的
Subsidiary
A company whose voting stock is more than 50% controlled by another company, usually referred to as the parent company.
Investopedia Says:
As long as the parent company has more than 50% of the voting stock in the subsidiary, it has control. In the case of a foreign subsidiary, the company under which the subsidiary is incorporated must adhere to the laws of the country in which the subsidiary operates, although the parent company still carries the foreign subsidiary's financials on its books (consolidated financial statements).
Subsidiary  子公司、附属公司:50%或以上投票股权由另一家公司持有的企业
a.	辅助的，附设的 ~ (to sth) 附属的; 从属的; 次要的:
subsidy  [?s?bsidi]n.津贴，补助金
retirement  ①退役,报废②退股,还本③退休
schedule  [sched?ule || 'sked??l /'?edju?l]
n.  时间表, 计划, 一览表v.  将...列表; 安排, 预定; 将...列入计划表
acquisition  收购；购置；取得
disposal    处置；脱手
legal action  [经] (法律)诉讼
contingency  n.  偶然性, 可能性, 意外事故----意外事项,或有事项
commitment  [k??mitm?nt]n.承诺，保证；信奉，献身；承担的义务
enter into commitment 承担义务； (商业上的)约定
additional commitments  追加的投资， 追加承诺
irrevocable commitments to disburse  	不可撤销的拨付承诺的款项
loan commitment  贷款承诺
commit  [k??mit]vt.  (committed; committing)1. 犯（错误， 罪行）； 干（坏事）
2. 委托（to）3. 对...作出保证； 承诺； 把...提交给； 把...押交［拘留， 判处］
4. 使...承担任务； 使表态5. 调配...供使用； 指定...用于6. 使（部队）投入战斗
7. 约束； 连累
commit oneself on  对...表态
commit oneself to  委身于， 专心致志于
hedging  对冲；套期保值
perspective  [p??spektiv] n.视角，观点；远景；透视画法，透视图
overview  [??uv?vju:]n.概述,概观,综缆，综述，总的看法
discontinued operations  n.非连续性（持续性）经营活动
Extraordinary Item
Gains or losses included in a company's financial statements, which are infrequent and unusual in nature. These are usually explained further in the "notes to the financial statements."
Investopedia Says:
These are the result of unforeseen and atypical events. They are usually accounted for separately so they don't skew the company's regular earnings. 
An example would be a snowstorm in Hawaii creating extraordinary losses to banana crops. These losses might be written down as a one-time charge due to an extraordinary item.
Extraordinary Item  非经常项目； 特殊帐项
公司财务报表包含的非经常、不常见收益或损失，一般在作会计报表附注中详细说明
unusual  [?n?ju??u?l]adj.1. 不常见的; 难得的2. 稀罕的3. 例外的; 奇异的
unusual or infrequent events 偶然项目或事件、非经常项目
implication  [?impli?kei??n]n.含意，暗示，暗指；卷入，牵连	
interim  ['int?rim]　a.  暂时的, 临时的, 间歇的n.  过渡时期　[经] 期中, 中期; 暂时的
in interim financial statements 中期财务报表
certified  注册的，合格的，持有证明书的,已证明的
public accounting firm  n.会计师事务所,会计公司
general accepted auditing standards  n.公认审计准则
accepted accounting principles  n.公认会计原则
omission  [?u'mi??n]n.  省略, 遗漏, 疏忽[化] 省略[经] 省略, 删节, 遗漏
realization  变现；变卖产业卖产业
asset value  [经] 资产价值
litigation  n.诉讼　起诉
act  　法案,法规
retrieval  [ri'tri:vl]n.  取回, 恢复, 检索[计] 检索
Securities and Exchange Commission  证券交易管理委员会
Corporate governance  企业管治；公司治理
The relationship between all the stakeholders in a company. This includes the shareholders, directors, and management of a company, as defined by the corporate charter, bylaws, formal policy and rule of law.
Investopedia Says:
Ethical companies are said to have excellent corporate governance.
一家企业所有权益方之间的关系，包括股东、董事及管理层等，根据企业章程、附则、正式政策及法规来确定
as defined by...  按...确定
common-size statement  共同尺度报表　　百分率表
intend  [in?tend]　vt.打算，计划；打算使(成为)，想让…做
intended  [in'tendid] . 打算之中的, 预期的; 计划之内的2. 有意的, 故意的3. 未婚的; 未来的 n.  未婚夫(妻)[法] 故意的, 有意的, 有计划的
recommendation  [?rek?men?dei??n]n.推荐(信)；建议；优点，长处
along with  与...在一起; 在...以外
Press Release  新闻稿:
如果是盈利公布，新闻稿包含最近季度的财务业绩，也可能包括公司管理人员的评论。新闻稿经常包括有助研究的联系信息，例如公司的网站
News that is sent out or released by the company making the news. If it's an earnings press release, the release will discuss the financial results of the company for the recently completed quarter and may provide comments from management. Press releases often list valuable contact information that can assist you in your research, such as the company's web address, information contacts and address information.
Investopedia Says:
Remember that press releases are written by the companies, not by a reporter, so they can be full of company bias. Often, as you search online news databases, it may be difficult to distinguish between a press release and a news story written by a journalist. The best way to distinguish the two is by looking closely at the first couple words of the story, which is where the source of the story is usually identified. If the source is identified as "BusinessWire" or "PR Newswire" then it is a press release issued by a company
repurchase  购回；回购；购回股份 
line item    排列项 项目 条目
contra account  备抵账户　　抵销账户；对销科目
allowance for bad debt  备抵呆帐,备抵坏账,呆帐备抵,呆帐准备,坏帐准备金
Allowance For Doubtful Accounts
An estimation made by a company and documented on its balance sheet for receivables that might go uncollected.
Investopedia Says:
It is standard practice for a company to have funds set aside for money that cannot be collected.
Allowance For Doubtful Accounts  呆账准备金
公司对可能不能收到的应收账款的预测，这项数据将纪录在公司的资产负债表上
allowance  　①备抵②折让、折扣③津贴
Marketable Securities
Very liquid securities that can be converted into cash quickly at a reasonable price. 
Marketable securities are very liquid as they tend to have maturities of less than one year. Furthermore, the rate at which these securities can be bought or sold has little effect on their prices. 
Investopedia Says:
Examples of marketable securities include commercial paper, banker's acceptances, Treasury bills and other money market instruments.
Marketable Securities  有价证券　（可上市证券 （内）；流通证券）
流通性非常高，可迅速以合理价格转换成为现金的证券
prepaid expenses  预付款　　预付费用 （内&港）；预计开支 （港）
Property
1. Anything over which a person or business has legal title. Property may be tangible or intangible, but it is owned by an entity and is therefore considered an asset or a liability attributable to that entity.
2. An employee who is under contract because he or she has something - skills, talents, etc. - of such value that a business may not be able to function without his or her services.
3. Another way of saying real property, real estate or land.
Investopedia Says:
1. Some examples of tangible property that may be included as assets of a business are furniture家俱, fixtures（装置,夹具；[pl. ]【律】(不动产的)固定附着物(房屋、树木等) ）and equipment. Intangible property includes copywritten material, ideas, patents, rights and so on.
2. Because of their importance to the companies for which they work, some employees are under contract and actually considered to be the property of a business for a period of time. For example, celebrities and professional athletes are often termed the "exclusive property" of the production companies, sports franchises or other corporations that have them under contract (for example, a basketball star who endorses footwear for a company like Nike or Reebok may be that company's "exclusive property").
3. Land and buildings are examples of real property. 
celebrity  [si?lebriti]n.1. 名声, 名誉2. 名人, 知名之士of great celebrity大名鼎鼎的
franchise  [?fr?nt?aiz]n.1. 公民权; 选举权; 参政权2. [美](政府授予个人、公司或社团的)特权, 特许3. 免除赋税负担的特权4. 经销(尤指拥有经销权的地区)5. (保险)免赔额
The United States granted the franchise to women in 1920.
美国于1920年给妇女以参政权。
vt.授某人以参政权、特许权或公民权
an amendment -sing adults over 18关于授予满18岁以上的成年人以公民权的修正案
继承用法:
franchisee  [?fr?nt?a?Azi?]n.  特许状持有人; 特许经销代理人
franchiser  [Afr?nt?a?Az?(r)]n.  代[经]销商; 给予特许者-chisaladj.　n.
Deferred Tax Asset
An asset on a company's balance sheet that may be used to reduce any subsequent period's income tax expense. Deferred tax assets can arise due to net loss carryovers, which are only recorded as assets if it is deemed more likely than not that the asset will be used in future fiscal periods.
Investopedia Says:
It must be determined that there is more than a 50% probability that the company will have positive accounting income in the next fiscal period before the deferred tax asset can be applied. 
If, for example, a company has a deferred tax asset of $25,000 on its balance sheet, and then the company earns $75,000 in before-tax accounting income, accounting tax expense will be applied to $50,000 ($75,000 - $25,000), instead of $75,000.
当纳税单上的应税收益额大于财务报表上的税前收益时，将其超过部分乘以法定税率，记入报表的“递延税款资产”
Deferred Tax liabilities  递延税款负债
是指由于临时差异而预计存在的税务债项，但是只有将来纳税时才会变成应付项目
claim  n.要求权
Unearned Revenue
When an individual or company receives money for a service or product that has yet to be fulfilled.
Investopedia Says:
For example, prepayment on a lease contract - the revenue is a liability until it has been earned.
Unearned Revenue　　未实现/得到的收入 　预收收入
指一名人士或一家公司对未完成服务或产品收取的收入
Property plant equipment 土地　厂房　设备　
Income taxes payable 应缴所得税
contributed capital  投入资本, 实缴资本，缴入资本,
Retained Earnings
The percentage of net earnings not paid out as dividends, but retained by the company to be reinvested in its core business or to pay debt. It is recorded under shareholders' equity on the balance sheet. 
Calculated by adding net income to (or subtracting any net losses from) beginning retained earnings and subtracting any dividends paid to shareholders:
 
Also known as the "retention ratio" or "retained surplus".
Investopedia Says:
In most cases, companies retain their earnings in order to invest them into areas where the company can create growth opportunities, such as buying new machinery or spending the money on more research and development.
Should a net loss be greater than beginning retained earnings, retained earnings can become negative, creating a deficit. 
retained earnings  留存收益　未分配盈利
没有用作股息派发给股东，但保留在公司用作投资公司核心业务或偿付债务的净利润百分比。在资产负债表内列在股东权益项下
计算方法为净利润加（或净亏损减）期初保留盈利，然后减向股东派发的股息
Additional Paid In Capital  附加实缴股本,附加资本,实收超额资本；附加缴入资本
A value that is often included in the contributed surplus account in the shareholders' equity section of a company's balance sheet. The account represent the excess paid by an investor over the par-value price of a stock issue. Additional paid-in-capital can arise from issuing either preferred or common stock.
Investopedia Says:
For example, assume that a company issues 1 million shares with a par value of $50 per share. When the shares are purchased by investors, however, they pay $70 per share - a premium of $20 over par value. When the capital received from this issue is recorded, $50 million ($50*1 million) will be allocated to a share capital or paid-in-capital account. The excess $20 million ($20*1 million) will be allocated to the contributed surplus account as additional paid-in-capital.
Some companies will choose to separate additional paid in capital from contributed surplus on their balance sheets
Contributed Surplus   实缴资本盈余
The amount of money that a company earns from sources other than its profits, such as when a company issues and sells shares at a price greater than their par value. The contributed surplus figure helps both investors and the company to distinguish between non-operational and operational income. It is found within the balance sheet.
Investopedia Says:
If this value was combined with operational earnings, investors would have a hard time forecasting relatively accurate future earnings because earnings from contributed surplus are not a part of ongoing business operations.
Treasury Stock  库存/藏股：一家公司回购其普通股，并将股票储存于库房
是指发行出去但因特殊原因而由公司收回，且未被注销的股票。公司原则上是不可以买回自己的股票，以免减少法定资本而分割债权人的保障。但在以下情况下，公司可收回或收买自己的股票：1股东清算或受破产宣告时，可按市价收回该股份，以抵偿股东结欠公司的债务；2公司决定和其它公司合并，但少数股东反对，公司得以公平价格购回少数股东的股票；3公司的营业或资产有重大变更，比如出租或委托他人经营，但股东反对，可由公司以公平价格购回持反对意见股东的股票。持有的库藏股，并没有使公司有收取现金股息、投票表决、行使优先认股权及清算时收受资产的权利。在英国，则指金边政权giltedged secureities 
foreign currency translation  外币折算
general expenses  n.一般费用/开支,总务费,各项费用----营业费用
office supplies  [经] 办公用品
accrual accounting  n.权责发生制会计,应计发生制
An accounting method that measures the performance and position of a company by recognizing economic events regardless of when cash transactions occur. The general idea is that economic events are recognized by matching revenues to expenses (the matching principle) at the time in which the transaction occurs rather than when payment is made (or received). This method allows the current cash inflows/outflows to be combined with future expected cash inflows/outflows to give a more accurate picture of a company's current financial condition. 
Accrual accounting is considered to be the standard accounting practice for most companies, with the exception of very small operations. This method provides a more accurate picture of the company's current condition, but its relative complexity makes it more expensive to implement. This is the opposite of cash accounting, which recognizes transactions only when there is an exchange of cash.
Investopedia Says:
The need for this method arose out of the increasing complexity of business transactions and a desire for more accurate financial information. Selling on credit and projects that provide revenue streams over a long period of time affect the company's financial condition at the point of the transaction. Therefore, it makes sense that such events should also be reflected on the financial statements during the same reporting period that these transactions occur.
For example, when a company sells a TV to a customer who uses a credit card, cash and accrual methods will view the event differently. The revenue generated by the sale of the TV will only be recognized by the cash method when the money is received by the company. If the TV is purchased on credit, this revenue might not be recognized until next month or next year. 
Accrual accounting, however, says that the cash method isn't accurate because it is likely, if not certain, that the company will receive the cash at some point in the future because the sale has been made. Therefore, the accrual accounting method instead recognizes the TV sale at the point at which the customer takes ownership of the TV. Even though cash isn't yet in the bank, the sale is booked to an account known in accounting lingo as "accounts receivable," increasing the seller's revenue
lingo  ['l??g??]n. 奇怪难懂的语言; 隐语; 行话
subscription  [sub?scrip?tion || s?b'skr?p?n]n.  捐献, 订阅, 订金；认股
on account  n.记帐;赊帐;n.为了,由于...的原因
mall  [m?l /m??l, m?l]n.  林荫大道; 铁圈球场; 铁圈球戏; 设在郊区的大规模购物中心
accounting entry  会计分录
book keeping by double [single] entry复[单]式簿记
elimination entry  抵销分录	   end-of-period adjusting entry  期末调整分录
provision     拨款；预留款项；备付款项；准备金　【律】规定, 条款
　　备抵项目：在会计核算中，对于由于时间或金额的不确定性而产生的或有负债
provision for tax  n.纳税准备金，备付税项provision for income tax  备付所得税
provision on account  临时拨款额　provision estimate 临时估计数字
provisional  tax 暂缴税　provisional profits tax　暂缴所得税
journal entry  日记帐分录  general journal  (总)普通日记帐
general ledger  总账  总分类帐    ledger  分类帐  总帐
trial balance  电子表格
convergence  趋于一致；整合；会聚,聚焦
financial performance  财政/务状况；财政/务业绩DDDDD经营业绩
financial position  财务状况
emerging market  新兴市场
achieve convergence　实现一体化
arguable  adj.可论证的,可辩论的　
registration statement  n.有价证券申请上市登记表　上市申请书
entity  实体；机构；个体 　　an entity 会计主体
separate entity  单独实体　taxable entity  应纳税单位
impersonal entity  法人单位legal entity  法人实体off-budget entity  预算外单位
profit-oriented business entity  营利企业单位risk-bearing entity  保险实体
business entity  企业单位, 营业单位
qualitative characteristics( of accounting information)  会计信息的质量特征
substance over form 实质重于形式
economic reality 经济实质
arm's length transaction  正常[公平]交易
in the senes of  n.在...意义上
free of  a. 免于
The ship was free of the harbor.  那艘船离开了港囗。
Don't interrupt him; he's been writing away all morning and likes to have a long period free of other considerations.
别打搅他，他已不停地写了一上午了。他喜欢有个较长的时间不受其它事情的干扰。
He was free of the house.   他可以自由使用那房子。
Going Concern
A term for a company that has the resources needed in order to continue to operate indefinitely. If a company is not a going concern, it means the company has gone bankrupt.
Also known as "Going Concern Value".
Investopedia Says:
In other words, this refers to a company's ability to make enough money to stay afloat or avoid bankruptcy. For example, many dotcoms are no longer going concern companies.
持续经营:指一家公司拥有继续经营所需的资源。若公司不持续经营，即已经破产
afloat  [??fl?ut]adj.  [多作表语],adv.1. 漂浮(的), (能)航行的2. 在海[船]上3. 为海浪所冲打(的), 浸在水中, 泛滥4. 免于经济困难的out of debt or difficulties 无债; 无困难: The firm managed to stay afloat during the recession. 在经济衰退期间, 公司设法渡过了难关. 5. 漂浮不定, (计划等)尚未定案6. 流传, 散播7. 【商】(票据等)可流通
fair presentation  公允表达/述
balance sheet item  资产负债表科目
on/upon  the face of  1. 从...字面上看, 按照字面的意义2. 显而易见, 显然
comparative  n.比较的, 接近的
Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB)　　财务会计标准委员会
A seven-member independent board consisting of accounting professionals who establish and communicate standards of financial accounting and reporting in the United States. FASB standards, known as generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP), govern the preparation of corporate financial reports and are recognized as authoritative by the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Investopedia Says:
Accounting standards are crucial in an efficient market, as information must be transparent, credible and understandable. The FASB sets out to improve corporate accounting practices by enhancing guidelines set out for accounting reports, identifying and resolving issues in a timely manner and creating a uniform standard across the financial markets
International Accounting Standards Board (IASB)  国际会计准则委员会
reconciliation statement  对帐表；调整/节表
Reconciliation
An accounting process used to compare two sets of records to ensure the figures are in agreement and are accurate. Reconciliation is the key process used to determine whether the money leaving an account matches the amount spent, ensuring that the two values are balanced at the end of the recording period.
Investopedia Says:
At the end of every month it is a good idea to reconcile your checkbook by comparing your receipts with your bank statement. Among other advantages, this type of account reconciliation makes it possible to determine whether money is being fraudulently withdrawn from an account.
reconciliation  n.调节,调整，一致,调解；对账
coherent  [co'her?ent || -??r?nt]　adj.  互相密合着的, 连贯的, 凝聚性的
International Financial Reporting Standards (IFRS)
A set of international accounting standards stating how particular types of transactions and other events should be reported in financial statements. IFRS are issued by the International Accounting Standards Board. 
IFRS are sometimes confused with International Accounting Standards (IAS), which are the older standards that IFRS replaced. (IAS were issued from 1973 to 2000.)  
Investopedia Says:
The goal with IFRS is to make international comparisons as easy as possible. This is difficult because, to a large extent, each country has its own set of rules. For example, U.S. GAAP are different from Canadian GAAP. Synchronizing accounting standards across the globe is an ongoing process in the international accounting community.
Cost Of Goods Sold (COGS)
The direct costs attributable to the production of the goods sold by a company. This amount includes the cost of the materials used in creating the good along with the direct labor costs used to produce the good. It excludes indirect expenses such as distribution costs and sales force costs. COGS appears on the income statement and can be deducted from revenue to calculate a company's gross margin。
Also referred to as "cost of sales". 
Investopedia Says:
COGS is the costs that go into creating the products that a company sells; therefore, the only costs included in the measure are those that are directly tied to the production of the products. For example, the COGS for an automaker would include the material costs for the parts that go into making the car along with the labor costs used to put the car together. The cost of sending the cars to dealerships and the cost of the labor used to sell the car would be excluded. 
The exact costs included in the COGS calculation will differ from one type of business to another. 
The cost of goods attributed to a company's products are expensed as the company sells these goods. There are several ways to calculate COGS but one of the more basic ways is to start with the beginning inventory for the period and add the total amount of purchases made during the period then deducting the ending inventory. This calculation gives the total amount of inventory or, more specifically, the cost of this inventory, sold by the company during the period. Therefore, if a company starts with $10 million in inventory, makes $2 million in purchases and ends the period with $9 million in inventory, the company's cost of goods for the period would be $3 million ($10 million + $2 million - $9 million). 
已售商品成本：一家公司赚取收入的产品或货品的成本。有时称为销售成本
Operating Expense　　营业费用
A category of expenditure that a business incurs as a result of performing its normal business operations. One of the typical responsibilities that management must contend with is determining how low operating expenses can be reduced without significantly affecting the firm's ability to compete with its competitors.
Also known as "OPEX"
Investopedia Says:
For example, the payment of employees' wages and funds allocated toward research and development are operating expenses. In the absence of raising prices or finding new markets or product channels in order to raise profits, some businesses attempt to increase the bottom line purely by cutting expenses. 
While laying off employees and reducing product quality can initially boost earnings and may even be necessary in cases where a company has lost its competitiveness, there are only so many operating expenses that management can cut before the quality of business operations is damaged.
Bottom Line　底线; 账本底行（内）；损益表底线,最终财务成果；经营业绩；盈亏；结果
Refers to a company's net earnings, net income or earnings per share (EPS). Bottom line also refers to any actions that may increase/decrease net earnings or a company's overall profit. A company that is growing its net earnings or reducing its costs is said to be "improving its bottom line".
Investopedia Says:
The reference to "bottom" describes the relative location of the net income figure on a company's income statement; it will almost always be the last line at the bottom of the page. This reflects the fact that all expenses have already been taken out of revenues, and there is nothing left to subtract. This stands in contrast to revenues, which are considered the "top line" figures.  
Most companies aim to improve their bottom lines through two simultaneous methods: growing revenues (i.e., generate top-line growth) and increasing efficiency (or cutting costs).
Top Line
A reference to the gross sales or revenues of a company, or an allusion to a course of action that increases or reduces revenues.  The "top" reference relates to the fact that on a company's income statement, the first line at the top of the page is generally reserved for gross sales or revenue. A company that increases its revenues is said to be "growing its top line", or "generating top-line growth".
This contrasts with net income (or net earnings per share), which is usually the bottom line of the company's income statement.  
Investopedia Says:
While there are number of different business models that have proved to be successful, every company is faced with the two simple goals of:
1. Growing revenues, or generating top-line growth
2. Growing net income, or generating bottom-line growth.  
Part of the reason why the term is used so often is that it clarifies minor nuances between the sources of revenue, whether it's from selling a product, collecting interest or servicing an account. "Top-line" is broad enough to include all of the company revenues into one category prior to calculating other income statement metrics such as operating profit and net income.  
subtotal  [sub'to?tal || 's?bt??tl]n.  小计，部分和v.  求...的部分和; 小计达到; 求小计
allusion  [al?lu?sion || ?'lu??n]n.  暗示，暗指; 提及; 间接提到
nuance  [nu?ance || nu?'ns /nju?'?ns]n.  细微差别
Operating Profit　　营业利润
The profit earned from a firm's normal core business operations. This value does not include any profit earned from the firm's investments (such as earnings from firms in which the company has partial interest) and the effects of interest and taxes.
Also known as "earnings before interest and tax" (EBIT).
For example, suppose ABC Printing Company earns $50 million from its core printing related operations, $10 million from its 40% stake in XYZ Corp. and $3.5 million from interest earned in its money market and bank accounts. In addition, the company spends $10 million in production related costs. 
Overall, the company's operating profit is $40 million. This is calculated as the $50 million in operating revenue million minus the $10 million in production costs. The other $10 million and $3.5 million in earnings are not included in operating income because they are investment income.
Controlling Interest  控股权益  多数股权
When one shareholder or a group acting in kind holds a high enough percentage of ownership in a company to enact changes at the highest level. By definition, this figure is 50% of the outstanding shares or voting shares, plus one. However, controlling interest can be achieved with less than 50% ownership of the stock if that person/group owns a significant proportion of the voting shares, because in many cases, not every share carries a vote in shareholder meetings.
Investopedia Says:
For the majority of large public companies (such as those that belong to the S&P 500),  a shareholder with much less than 50% of the outstanding shares can still cause a lot of shake-up at the company. Single shareholders with as little as 5-10% ownership can push for their own seats on the board, or enact changes at shareholder meetings by publicly lobbying for them.
Pro-Rata    按比例：指按比例分配
Used to describe a proportionate allocation. A method of assigning an amount to a fraction, according to its share of the whole. 
Investopedia Says:
For example, a pro-rata dividend means that every shareholder gets an equal proportion for each share he or she owns. Pro-rating also refers to the practice of applying interest rates to different time frames. If the interest rate was 12% per annum, you could pro-rate this number to be 1% a month (12%/12 months).
Vested Interest
A financial or personal stake one entity has in an asset, security, or transaction.
Investopedia Says:
For example, if you have a mortgage, your bank has a vested interest on the sale of your house.
vested interest  既得权益；既得利益；法定权利/益
have a stake in  与...利害攸关
at stake to be won or lost; being risked, depending on the outcome of an event 在胜败关头; 冒风险: This decision puts our lives at stake. 这么一决定, 我们的生命就吉凶难卜了. * Our children's education is at stake. 我们孩子的教育好坏无法预料.
 go to the stake over sth maintain (an opinion, a principle, etc) at any cost 不惜一切代价地坚持（观点p 原则等）: I think I'm right on this issue but I wouldn't go to the stake over it. 我认为我在这个问题上是正确的, 但我并不想拚命坚持这一点.
gross revenue  总收入；收入总额　　net revenue  净收入　纯收入
Depletion  折耗，损耗　消耗; 用尽　　亏空
depletion of value  折价　　random depletion  偶然耗损
Depletion
An accounting term describing the amortization of assets that can be physically reduced.
Investopedia Says:
Unlike depreciation and amortization, which mainly describe the deduction of expenses due to the aging of equipment and property, depletion is the actual physical reduction of natural resources by companies. 
For example, coal mines, oil fields and other natural resources are depleted on company accounting statements. This reduction in the quantity of resources is meant to assist in accurately identifying the value of the asset on the balance sheet
Warranty  保证 担保
A type of guarantee that a manufacturer or similar party makes regarding the condition of its product. It also refers to the terms and situations in which repairs or exchanges will be made in the event that the product does not function as originally described or intended.
Investopedia Says:
Warranties usually have exceptions that limit the conditions in which a manufacturer will be obligated to rectify a problem. For example, many warranties for common household items only cover the product for up to one year from the date of purchase and usually only if the product in question contains problems resulting from defective parts or workmanship.
As a result of these limited manufacturer warranties, many vendors offer extended warranties. These extended warranties are essentially insurance policies for products that consumers pay for up front. Coverage will usually last for a handful of years above and beyond the manufacturer's warranty and is often more lenient in terms of limited terms and conditions
Warrant 1. 授权;批准. 2. 【律】授权令;逮捕证;搜查证[C] 3. (正当)理由,根据[U][(+for)] 4. 委任书;委托书;证书;凭单[C] 5. 证明;保证;诺言[U] vt.1. 授权给;批准2. 使有(正当)理由,成为...的根据[+v-ing]; 证明（某事物）正当p 有理或恰当3. 向...保证,保证(货物)的质量;担保[+(that)]
Warrantee 被保证人; 被担保人  warrantor 保证人; 担保人
warranty（商品的）保证书, 保单
lenient  ['le?ni?ent || 'l??n??nt]adj.  宽大的; 慈悲为怀的; 仁慈的
shelf life   n. 保存限期；货架期; 搁置寿命(贮藏寿命,贮藏期限,闲置时间,适用期)
approved method  准许的方法
Useful life  可用年限、可用年期/期限；有效寿命/使用寿命
The number of years, as set by the IRS, that depreciable business equipment or property is expected to be in use.
Investopedia Says:
The IRS has a depreciation table for almost every item, including computers, vehicles, and other equipment.
IRS 　　abbr.　　 Internal Revenue Service 美国国税局
Declining Balance Method　　余额递减法
A common depreciation-calculation system that involves applying the depreciation rate against the non-depreciated balance. Instead of spreading the cost of the asset evenly over its life, this system expenses the asset at a constant rate, which results in declining depreciation charges each successive period.
Investopedia Says:
For example, if an asset that costs $1,000 is depreciated at 25% each year, the deduction is $250.00 in the first year and $187.50 in the second year, and so forth. 
Salvage Value
The estimated value that an asset will realize upon its sale at the end of its useful life. The value is used in accounting to determine depreciation amounts and in the tax system to determine deductions. The value can be a best guess of the end value or can be determined by a regulatory body such as the IRS.
Investopedia Says:
The salvage value is used in conjunction with the purchase price and accounting method to determine the amount by which an asset depreciates each period. For example, with a straight-line basis, an asset that cost $5,000 and has a salvage value of $1,000 and a useful life of five years would be depreciated at $800 ($5,000-$1,000/5 years) each year. 
Within the tax system, when a person donates a car he or she receives a tax deduction. The value of this deduction depends on the salvage value of the car. This salvage value is determined to be the current fair market value that could be obtained had the car been sold on that day rather than donated.
Salvage Value
The estimated value that an asset will realize upon its sale at the end of its useful life. The value is used in accounting to determine depreciation amounts and in the tax system to determine deductions. The value can be a best guess of the end value or can be determined by a regulatory body such as the IRS.
Investopedia Says:
The salvage value is used in conjunction with the purchase price and accounting method to determine the amount by which an asset depreciates each period. For example, with a straight-line basis, an asset that cost $5,000 and has a salvage value of $1,000 and a useful life of five years would be depreciated at $800 ($5,000-$1,000/5 years) each year. 
Within the tax system, when a person donates a car he or she receives a tax deduction. The value of this deduction depends on the salvage value of the car. This salvage value is determined to be the current fair market value that could be obtained had the car been sold on that day rather than donated.
Salvage Value  残值：资产在有用寿命结束时出售可获得的预计价值
residual value  残值　剩余价值
deduction  [di'd?k??n]  n. 减除,扣除,减除额、折扣额、扣除项目　n. 推论,推理,演绎
Any item or expenditure subtracted from gross income to reduce the amount of income subject to tax.　Also referred to as "allowable deduction".
Investopedia Says:
For example, if you make $40,000 and you have a deduction for $1,000, then your taxable income is reduced to $39,000.
beginning inventory  期初存货
ending inventory  　期末存货，期末盘存
Extraordinary item  非经常项目；特殊项目
in terms of  以 … 之观点, 以 … 之方式，a. 按照(依据,用...词句,用...来,通过)
physically adv.  按照自然规律地; 实际上; 身体上; 完全地, 全然地
phaseout  n.逐渐停止（中止）　分阶段撤销
Impairment
1. A reduction in a company's stated capital. 1.设定资本，设定股本 2.申报股本
2. The total capital that is less than the par value of the company's capital stock.
Investopedia Says:
1. This is usually reduced because of poorly estimated losses or gains. 
2. Impairment can be used in many contexts. Whatever the situation, impairment is bad for the company.
（资本）损耗:1. 公司资本的减损2. 公司的资本少于公司股本面值
Write-Off   销记、注销　　
将一项资产的价值金额记入开支或损失项下，以减低资产或有关盈利的价值
A reduction in the value of an asset or earnings by the amount of an expense or loss. Companies are able to write off certain expenses that are required to run the business, or have been incurred in the operation of the business and detract from retained revenues.
Investopedia Says:
For example, if you spend money on dinner to take out a client, that meal is a possible write-off towards your income because you presumably discussed business opportunities during the dinner. Suppose, for another example, you made a sale on credit to a customer, but two weeks later the client's business declared bankruptcy and became completely unable to pay off the credit account with you. This uncollectible debt would then be written off by your company and recorded as an expense by accountants.
Write-Down　减记、冲减：减低资产的账面价值，因为相对市场价值估值过高
Reducing the book value of an asset because it is overvalued compared to the market value.
Investopedia Says:
This is usually reflected in the company's income statement as an expense, thereby reducing net income
assets write-down 降低资产账面价值　　　market write-downs 市价下跌
expropriate  [eks'pr?uprieit] vt.  剥夺, 没收, 征用
expropriation  征用,没收,让渡
The act of removing property from an owner.
Investopedia Says:
Typically, expropriation refers to the action of a government taking away a private business from its owners. This mainly occurs in countries where property laws are not concrete and well defined. Expropriation also occurs when there are legal implications.
concrete / ?k??kri?t; / adj  existing in material form; that can be touched, felt, etc 以物质形式存在的; 具体的; 实体的: Physics deals with the forces acting on concrete objects. 物理学研究作用于物体上的力.  definite; positive 确实的; 明确的; 确定的: concrete proposals, evidence, facts 明确的建议p 确实的证据; 确定的事实n.  凝结物, 混凝土
retirement of debt    n.债券本金偿还
accident-prone  a.  易出事故的
prior period adjustments  [经] 前期调整项目, 以前年度调整项目；前期损益调整
retro-  pref.  表示“ 向后”, “倒退”, “追溯”, 如:retrogress倒退, retrorocket反向火箭
retrospective  [法] 溯及既往的, 有追溯效力的, 追溯的
APB  Accounting Principles Board 会计原则局/委员会([美] AICPA)
Statement of Financial Accounting Standards (SFAS)
A formal document issued by the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB), which details accounting standards and guidance on selected accounting policies set out by the FASB. These statements of financial accounting standards are issued, with the expectation that all reporting companies listed on American stock exchanges will adhere to them. The standards are created to ensure a higher level of corporate transparency.
Investopedia Says:
New SFAS releases can have a huge affect on a business' bottom line. For example, the FAS-123(R), which refers to the expensing of share-based awards, can increase a company's expenses dramatically, often by billions of dollars. FAS-123(R) was created to enable investors and regulators to better evaluate the firm's true option expenses.
provide against  为...作好准备, 预防(灾荒, 困难)
provide for 　 1. 提供生活费; 养活2. 为...作准备, 防备3. 规定
provide with  给...提供; 以...装备
Dilution
A reduction in earnings per share of common stock that occurs through the issuance of additional shares or the conversion of convertible securities.
Investopedia Says:
Adding to the number of shares outstanding reduces the value of holdings of existing shareholders.
Dilution  摊薄、减损：
每股普通股盈利的减少。发行更多普通股或可转换证券被转换都会造成摊薄或减损
outstanding  1.未偿还的；未偿付的；未清缴的；未完成的；未兑现的；2.已发行；发行在外的；(股票等)已发行和出售的;3.未了结的
dilutive security  稀释证券 （内&港）
Sweetener
A special feature or benefit added to a debt instrument (such as bonds) or a preferred stock offering to increase its saleability in the markets. Two popular forms of sweeteners are warrants and rights, which allow the holder to either convert securities into stock at a later date or purchase shares at below-market prices.  
Investopedia Says:
Sweeteners are especially useful for companies that are having a hard time attracting investors or raising capital at affordable（affordable adj. 负担得起的）prices. A given company may want to conduct a standard debt offering, but if there isn't enough investor appetite to sell all of the debt, the sweetener can help attract enough investors to sell the entire issue. Sweeteners will always cost something extra to the company giving them away, but the exact cost may not be calculable until some date in the future.
Warrant
A derivative security that gives the holder the right to purchase securities (usually equity) from the issuer at a specific price within a certain time frame. Warrants are often included in a new debt issue as a "sweetener" to entice investors.
Investopedia Says:
The main difference between warrants and call options is that warrants are issued and guaranteed by the company, whereas options are exchange instruments and are not issued by the company. Also, the lifetime of a warrant is often measured in years, while the lifetime of a typical option is measured in months.
Warrant  认股权证：一种衍生工具，给予持有人从发行人以特定价格在特定期间买入证券（一般是股票）的权力
Rights  配股权；配股权证 （内）；供股权 （港）
A security giving stockholders entitlement to purchase new shares issued by the corporation at a predetermined price (normally less than the current market price) in proportion to the number of shares already owned. Rights are issued only for a short period of time, after which they expire.
Investopedia Says:
This also known as "subscription rights" or "share purchase rights".
Subscription Right  认股权, 认购权
The right of existing shareholders in a company to retain an equal percentage ownership over time by subscribing to new stock issuances at or below market prices.  The subscription right is usually enforced by the use of rights offerings, which allow shareholders to exchange rights for shares of common stock at a price generally below what the stock is currently trading for.  
Also known as the "subscription privilege" or "preemptive right" of the shareholder.
Investopedia Says:
Subscription rights are not necessarily guaranteed by all companies, but most have some form of dilution protection in their charters. If granted this privilege, shareholders may purchase their shares before they are offered to the secondary markets. This form of dilution protection is usually good for a few weeks before a company will go about seeking new investors in the broad market.
Investors will receive notification of their subscription right by mail (from the company itself) or through their brokers or custodians
January   February   March   April  May  June  July  August  September  October November December
Stock Dividend 股票股息/利 ：以额外股份形式，而不是现金形式支付的股息
A dividend payment made in the form of additional shares, rather than a cash payout. 
Also known as a "scrip dividend."
Investopedia Says:
Companies may decide to distribute stock to shareholders of record if the company's availability of liquid cash is in short supply. These distributions are generally acknowledged in the form of fractions paid per existing share. An example would be a company issuing a stock dividend of 0.05 shares for each single share held.
scrip dividend  以股代息
Stock Split　分股、股份拆细、拆股：将公司现有股票划分为更多的股票。在一分为二的分股中，每名股东每持有一股便可额外获得多一股
A corporate action in which a company's existing shares are divided into multiple shares. Although the number of shares outstanding increases by a specific multiple, the total dollar value of the shares remains the same compared to pre-split amounts, because no real value has been added as a result of the split.
In the U.K., a stock split is referred to as a "scrip issue", "bonus issue", "capitalization issue" or "free issue".
Investopedia Says:
For example, in a 2-for-1 split, each stockholder receives an additional share for each share he or she holds.
One reason as to why stock splits are performed is that a company's share price has grown so high that to many investors, the shares are too expensive to buy in round lots. 
For example, if a XYZ Corp.'s shares were worth $1,000 each, investors would need to purchase $100,000 in order to own 100 shares. If each share was worth $10, investors would only need to pay $1,000 to own 100 shares.
reacquired stock  购回股份  reacquisition  重购 （内）；再购回 （港）
Stock Option  股票期权；股票购买选择权；股票购买权(内）;股份认购权(港）认股权
A privilege, sold by one party to another, that gives the buyer the right, but not the obligation, to buy (call) or sell (put) a stock at an agreed-upon price within a certain period or on a specific date.  In the U.K., it is known as a "share option".
Investopedia Says:
American options can be exercised anytime between the date of purchase and the expiration date. European options may only be redeemed at the expiration date. Most exchange-traded stock options are American
股票期权：一方售予另一方的特权，使买方有权（但无责任）以特定的价格在特定的时间内购买（买回）或出售（卖回）一种股票
contingent share  或有股份 （内&港）
Acquisition    收购:一家公司收购另一家公司的多数股权

A corporate action in which a company buys most, if not all, of the target company's ownership stakes in order to assume control of the target firm. Acquisitions are often made as part of a company's growth strategy whereby it is more beneficial to take over an existing firm's operations and niche compared to expanding on its own. Acquisitions are often paid in cash, the acquiring company's stock or a combination of both.
Investopedia Says:
Acquisitions can be either friendly or hostile. Friendly acquisitions occur when the target firm expresses its agreement to be acquired, whereas hostile acquisitions don't have the same agreement from the target firm and the acquiring firm needs to actively purchase large stakes of the target company in order to have a majority stake.
In either case, the acquiring company often offers a premium on the market price of the target company's shares in order to entice shareholders to sell. For example, News Corp.'s bid to acquire Dow Jones was equal to a 65% premium over the stock's market price.
common size financial statements  n.百分率表
common size statement  n.百分率表  共同尺度报表
time series  时间数列
delve  [delv]vt.,vi.  [古、方]1. 掘, 挖, 刨2. 探究, 钻研delve into books钻研书本delve into the past调查过去的情况n.  穴, 凹, 坑delve into  钻研, 深入研究
Time Series
A sequence of numerical data points in successive order, usually occurring in uniform intervals. In plain English, a time series is simply a sequence of numbers collected at regular intervals over a period of time.
Investopedia Says:
Time series analysis can be useful to see how a given asset, security or economic variable changes over time or how it changes compared to other variables over the same time period. For example, suppose you wanted to analyze a time series of daily closing stock prices for a given stock over a period of one year. You would obtain a list of all the closing prices for the stock over each day for the past year and list them in chronological order. This would be a one-year, daily closing price time series for the stock. 
Delving a bit deeper, you might be interested to know if a given stock's time series shows any seasonality, meaning it goes through peaks and valleys at regular times each year. Or you might want to know how a stock's share price changes as an economic variable, such as the unemployment rate, changes.
seasonality  n.季节性
chronological  adj.  按年代顺序排列的　按时间的前后顺序排列的:
Retained earnings  未分配盈利；保留盈余
Retained Earnings
The percentage of net earnings not paid out as dividends, but retained by the company to be reinvested in its core business or to pay debt. It is recorded under shareholders' equity on the balance sheet. 
Calculated by adding net income to (or subtracting any net losses from) beginning retained earnings and subtracting any dividends paid to shareholders:
 
Also known as the "retention ratio" or "retained surplus".
Investopedia Says:
In most cases, companies retain their earnings in order to invest them into areas where the company can create growth opportunities, such as buying new machinery or spending the money on more research and development.
Should a net loss be greater than beginning retained earnings, retained earnings can become negative, creating a deficit. 
没有用作股息派发给股东，但保留在公司用作投资公司核心业务或偿付债务的净利润百分比。在资产负债表内列在股东权益项下
计算方法为净利润加（或净亏损减）期初保留盈利，然后减向股东派发的股息
Retention Ratio　　留存比率
The percent of earnings credited to retained earnings. In other words, the proportion of net income that is not paid out as dividends.
Calculated as:
 
Investopedia Says:
The retention ratio is the opposite of the dividend payout ratio. In fact, it can also be calculated as one minus the dividend payout ratio.
scrap  [skr?p]n.1. 打架; 口角; 格斗2. 职业拳击赛have scrap with sb.跟某人打架[争吵] n.  碎片,残余物vt., vi.(scrapped; scrapping)打架, 吵架； 将...作为废物; 废弃; 将...拆毁;；
Its scrap value is2, 500.  他的报废价值是2，500英镑
He was always scrapping at school.  他在学校总打架.
Storage is10% of value, so we scrapped the stock.
因仓储费是货物价值的10％，所以我们就废弃了这批存货。
scrapping  n.废弃
snapshot  [?sn?p??t]n. 快照, 快相 ；瞬像；瞬态；「
off balance sheet finance  n.不列入资产负债表的融资－表外融资
trade payable  n.应付货款　应付贸易帐款
operating period  营业周期
Working Capital　营运资金；周转资金；估值标准之一，计算方法为流动资产减流动负债
A measure of both a company's efficiency and its short-term financial health. The working capital ratio is calculated as:
  
Positive working capital means that the company is able to pay off its short-term liabilities. Negative working capital means that a company currently is unable to meet its short-term liabilities with its current assets (cash, accounts receivable and inventory).
Also known as "net working capital".
Investopedia Says:
If a company's current assets do not exceed its current liabilities, then it may run into trouble paying back creditors in the short term. The worst-case scenario is bankruptcy. A declining working capital ratio over a longer time period could also be a red flag that warrants further analysis. For example, it could be that the company's sales volumes are decreasing and, as a result, its accounts receivables number continues to get smaller and smaller.
Working capital also gives investors an idea of the company's underlying operational efficiency. Money that is tied up in inventory or money that customers still owe to the company cannot be used to pay off any of the company's obligations. So, if a company is not operating in the most efficient manner (slow collection), it will show up as an increase in the working capital. This can be seen by comparing the 
be tied up  被缠住的, 有要务在身的, 对某事有责任的；不能挪作他用的; 人等脱不了身的; 忙得不可开交的
Most of his money's tied up in property.他大部分钱都投资在房地产上无法动用.
I'm tied up in a meeting until 3 pm.我开会直到下午三点钟方可脱身.
The thieves left her tied up with rope but she wriggled (herself) free.
窃贼用绳子把她捆了起来, 但她扭动着（身子）挣脱开了.
mezzanine  ['mez?ni:n]  n. 夹楼（层）、中层楼　a. 中楼的
creditworthiness  信誉；信用可靠程度/信贷价值
Carrying Value   账面价值  账面现行价值  置存价值
An accounting measure of value, where the value of an asset or a company is based on the figures in the company's balance sheet. For assets, the value is based on the original cost of the asset less any depreciation, amortization or impairment costs made against the asset. For a company, carrying value is a company's total assets minus intangible assets and liabilities such as debt.    Also known as "book value".
Investopedia Says:
This is different from market value, as it can be higher or lower depending on the circumstances, the asset in question and the accounting practices that affect them. In many cases, the carrying value of an asset and its market value will differ greatly. This is because, in accordance with accounting rules, the assets are held based on original costs. If a company holds land that was purchased 100 years ago, it holds it at the cost paid. Over time, however, this real estate has likely gained considerably in value.
Overhead  间接费用；间接成本; 制造费用
直接劳工成本、物料或行政成本以外的所有成本
A reference in accounting to all costs not including or related to direct labor, materials, or administration costs.
Investopedia Says:
A very ambiguous term unless a modifier is added. A commonly used expression is manufacturing overhead.
Promissory Note
A written, dated and signed two-party instrument containing an unconditional promise by the maker to pay a definite sum of money to a payee on demand or at a specified future date.
Investopedia Says:
The only difference between a promissory note and a bill of exchange is that the maker of a note pays the payee personally, rather than ordering a third party to do so. 
When a bank is the maker promising to repay money it has received plus interest, the promissory note is called a certificate of deposit (CD).
本票：一份书面、附有日期及双方签署的档，声明付款方在受款方要求下或在特定的未来日期向受款方支付特定金额款项的无条件承诺
standard costing  标准成本计算法
retail method  n.零售法
amortized cost   摊余成本  已摊成本
 is equal to the face (par)value less any unamortized discount or plus any unamortized premium.
authorized share  核定股本   incorporation  注册成立
Article  条款，章程，文章; 冠词, 物品, 物件
solvency ratio  偿债能力比率
One of many ratios used to measure a company's ability to meet long-term obligations. The solvency ratio measures the size of a company's after-tax income, excluding non-cash depreciation expenses, as compared to the firm's total debt obligations. It provides a measurement of how likely a company will be to continue meeting its debt obligations.
The measure is usually calculated as follows:
 
Investopedia Says:
Acceptable solvency ratios will vary from industry to industry, but as a general rule of thumb, a solvency ratio of greater than 20% is considered financially healthy. Generally speaking, the lower a company's solvency ratio, the greater the probability that the company will default on its debt obligations
a rule of  thumb rough practical method of assessing or measuring sth, usu based on past experience rather than on exact measurement, etc (and therefore not completely reliable in every case or in every detail) （对事物）粗略但实用的估计方法（通常指凭经验而不作精确的计量等, 故并非时时处处均可靠）: 
As a rule of thumb, you should cook a chicken for 20 minutes for each pound that it weighs. 凭经验估计, 每磅鸡肉应烹调20分钟
differ in  在...方面不同
Financial Risk  财务风险
The risk that a company will not have adequate cash flow to meet financial obligations.
Investopedia Says:
Financial risk is the additional risk a shareholder bears when a company uses debt in addition to equity financing. Companies that issue more debt instruments would have higher financial risk than companies financed mostly or entirely by equity.
forward looking  n.前瞻性；a.  向前看的, 有远见的
Delinquent  [美]拖欠(税款)的 拖欠的  n.  行为不良的人, 流氓 做错事的或失职的（人）
A term describing the failure to meet required obligations according to schedule.
Investopedia Says:
In the world of finance, this term is used in a number of ways from describing a company late in filing its regulatory requirements to failure to meet required loan obligations. Generally, companies that are delinquent in their obligations receive a some sort of punishment.
拖欠债务:未能按偿付时间表还本付息
be headed for  v. 朝...方向去
financial flexibility  财务弹性：对财务困难和机会做出反应和接受的能力
proceeds   [pl. ](从事某种活动或变卖财物等的)收入, 收益
He sold his house and lives on the proceeds.
他卖了房子靠房款收入过日子。
net proceeds  纯收入, 净收益sales proceeds  销货进款 securities proceeds  出售证券收入tax proceeds  捐税收入, 税收proceeds in cash  货币收入proceeds of instalment sales  分期付款销售收入proceeds of sale  销售收入
cash basis accounting  现金收付制会计；收付实现制会计
accrual basis accounting  权责发生制会计；应计会计制
sustainable  adj.  足可支撑的, 可以忍受的, 养得起的，能保持一定速度的
determinant  [di?t??min?nt]adj.  决定性的, 确定的, 限定性的n.决定因素
resume　　履历（表）; 恢复, 重新开始；摘要; 概要
Capital Asset  资本性资产; [法] 固定资产
A type of asset that is not easily sold in the regular course of a business's operations for cash and is generally owned for its role in contributing to the business's ability to generate profit. Furthermore, it is expected that the benefits gained from the asset will extend beyond a time span of one year. On a business's balance sheet, capital assets are represented by the property, plant and equipment figure.
Investopedia Says:
Examples include land, buildings, machinery, etc. Generally, these are assets that cannot quickly be turned into cash and are often only liquidated in a worst-case scenario. For example, a company might look at selling a capital asset if it was looking at restructuring or the business was engaged in bankruptcy proceedings. 
Depending on the business involved, capital assets may represent the majority of assets that are owned. For example, in equipment heavy operations such as oil exploration, it is not surprising to find the majority of a business's assets to be capital assets.
coverage ratio  偿还能力系数、偿债能力比率、盈利与利息比率
obsolete  a.荒废的, 已废弃的,成废物的,陈旧的,老式的,过时的n.废词,废物
obsolete equipment　陈旧设备
bank note  银行纸币；钞票
Mortgage　　按揭；抵押，房地产抵押
A debt instrument that is secured by the collateral of specified real estate property and that the borrower is obliged to pay back with a predetermined set of payments. Mortgages are used by individuals and businesses to make large purchases of real estate without paying the entire value of the purchase up front.
Mortgages are also known as "liens against property" or "claims on property".
Investopedia Says:
In a residential mortgage, a home buyer pledges his or her house to the bank. The bank has a claim on the house should the home buyer default on paying the mortgage. In the case of a foreclosure, the bank may evict the home's tenants and sell the house, using the income from the sale to clear the mortgage debt.
evict  vt.1. 收回(租屋、租地等)2. 驱逐, 赶出(房客等)evict tenant赶走房客
LIFO Liquidation
When a company using the LIFO (Last In, First Out) method of inventory costing liquidates their older LIFO inventory. A LIFO liquidation would occur if current sales are higher than current purchases, as a result, any inventory not sold in previous periods must be liquidated.
Investopedia Says:
Due to inflation and general price rises, the amount a company pays for its inventory will usually increase with time. If a company decides to perform a LIFO liquidation, the old costs will be matched with the current higher sales prices. Thus, a cost to using the LIFO liquidation method is higher tax liability if prices have risen since LIFO was adopted. The expected tax advantage of LIFO tunrs into a disadvantage because older, lower costs (of older inventory) are matched with current revenues. Another cost may be lost sales.
Leverage Ratio  杠杆率　产权比率  debt to equity
1. Any ratio used to calculate the financial leverage of a company to get an idea of the company's methods of financing or to measure its ability to meet financial obligations. There are several different ratios, but the main factors looked at include debt, equity, assets and interest expenses.
2. A ratio used to measure a company's mix of operating costs, giving an idea of how changes in output will affect operating income. Fixed and variable costs are the two types of operating costs; depending on the company and the industry, the mix will differ.
Investopedia Says:
1. The most well known financial leverage ratio is the debt-to-equity ratio. For example, if a company has $10M in debt and $20M in equity, it has a debt-to-equity ratio of 0.5 ($10M/$20M).
2. Companies with high fixed costs, after reaching the breakeven point, see a greater increase in operating revenue when output is increased compared to companies with high variable costs. The reason for this is that the costs have already been incurred, so every sale after the breakeven transfers to the operating income. On the other hand, a high variable cost company sees little increase in operating income with additional output, because costs continue to be imputed into the outputs. The degree of operating leverage is the ratio used to calculate this mix and its effects on operating income.
longevity  [l?n?d?eviti]　　n.1. 长寿2. 长期供职, 资历
stem from  vt.源于,基于,出于
Correct decisions stem from correct judgements.　正确的决心来源于正确的判断。
profit margin  n.利润率,边际利润(盈利能力的指标)税后净利润/总收入 以百分比表示
A ratio of profitability calculated as net income divided by revenues, or net profits divided by sales. It measures how much out of every dollar of sales a company actually keeps in earnings.
Profit margin is very useful when comparing companies in similar industries. A higher profit margin indicates a more profitable company that has better control over its costs compared to its competitors. Profit margin is displayed as a percentage; a 20% profit margin, for example, means the company has a net income of $0.20 for each dollar of sales.
Investopedia Says:
Looking at the earnings of a company often doesn't tell the entire story. Increased earnings are good, but an increase does not mean that the profit margin of a company is improving. For instance, if a company has costs that have increased at a greater rate than sales, it leads to a lower profit margin. This is an indication that costs need to be under better control. 
Imagine a company has a net income of $10 million from sales of $100 million, giving it a profit margin of 10% ($10 million/$100 million). If in the next year net income rose to $15 million on sales of $200 million, its profit margin would fall to 7.5%. So while the company increased its net income, it has done so with diminishing profit margins.
Charge Off  出账、销账  把...作为损耗 把...归因
A term describing an expense on a company's income statement. A charge-off will fall under one of the following categories: 
1. A debt that is deemed uncollectible by the reporting firm and is subsequently written off. This type will be classified as 'bad debt expense' on the income statement, and removed from the balance sheet.
2. A probable one-time extraordinary expense incurred by a company that negatively affects earnings and results in a write-down of some of the firm's assets. The write-down arises due to impairments of assets.
Investopedia Says:
1. Bad debt expenses arise when a firm is unable to collect on some of its accounts receivable. When this occurs, the firm has little recourse; it could either sell the probable bad debt to a collection agency (a sale will be recorded on the firm's books, but not as an expense), or it could just write off the uncollectible amount as an expense on the income statement.
2. Companies often say something like: "we will take a one-time charge against earnings this quarter." This means that an extraordinary event has occurred and, altough it affects present earnings, it is unlikely to occur again. As a result, a company will usually provide an EPS figure with and without this charge.
undo  [??n?du?]vt.  (-did[-?did]; -done [-dQn]; 第三人称单数现在式 -does [-?d?z])
1. 解开,; 松开（结p 钮扣等）; 打开, 拆开（包裹p 信封）2. 废除; 使复原, 使失效/无效; 使复旧3. [古]解(谜等); 说明4. 使失效; 破坏; 糟蹋; 使破落5. 扰乱, 使不安
Interest Coverage Ratio　.盈利对利息之倍数　偿付利息能力比率　利息保障倍数　已获利息倍数
A ratio used to determine how easily a company can pay interest on outstanding debt. The interest coverage ratio is calculated by dividing a company's earnings before interest and taxes (EBIT) of one period by the company's interest expenses of the same period:
copyright  版权,著作权
Carrying Value  账面现行价值 账面价值
An accounting measure of value, where the value of an asset or a company is based on the figures in the company's balance sheet. For assets, the value is based on the original cost of the asset less any depreciation, amortization or impairment costs made against the asset. For a company, carrying value is a company's total assets minus intangible assets and liabilities such as debt. Also known as "book value".
Investopedia Says:
This is different from market value, as it can be higher or lower depending on the circumstances, the asset in question and the accounting practices that affect them. In many cases, the carrying value of an asset and its market value will differ greatly. This is because, in accordance with accounting rules, the assets are held based on original costs. If a company holds land that was purchased 100 years ago, it holds it at the cost paid. Over time, however, this real estate has likely gained considerably in value.
Return On Assets (ROA)  资产回报率　评估公司相对其总资产值的盈利能力的有用指标。计算的方法为公司的年度盈利除以总资产值，资产回报率一般以百分比表示。有时也称为投资回报率　净收入 / 总资产值　备注：有些人士在计算回报率时在净收入上加回利息开支，以得出扣除借贷成本前的营运回报率

An indicator of how profitable a company is relative to its total assets. ROA gives an idea as to how efficient management is at using its assets to generate earnings. Calculated by dividing a company's annual earnings by its total assets, ROA is displayed as a percentage. Sometimes this is referred to as "return on investment".
 
Note: Some investors add interest expense back into net income when performing this calculation because they'd like to use operating returns before cost of borrowing.
Investopedia Says:
ROA tells you what earnings were generated from invested capital (assets). ROA for public companies can vary substantially and will be highly dependent on the industry. This is why when using ROA as a comparative measure, it is best to compare it against a company's previous ROA numbers or the ROA of a similar company. 
The assets of the company are comprised of both debt and equity. Both of these types of financing are used to fund the operations of the company. The ROA figure gives investors an idea of how effectively the company is converting the money it has to invest into net income. The higher the ROA number, the better, because the company is earning more money on less investment. For example, if one company has a net income of $1 million and total assets of $5 million, its ROA is 20%; however, if another company earns the same amount but has total assets of $10 million, it has an ROA of 10%. Based on this example, the first company is better at converting its investment into profit. When you really think about it, management's most important job is to make wise choices in allocating its resources. Anybody can make a profit by throwing a ton of money at a problem, but very few managers excel at making large profits with little investment.
negate  [ni?eit]　vt.1. 否认, 否定; 拒绝, 拒不接受2. 取消, 使不起作用, 使无效3. 求反, “非”, 对...施以“非”操作
Sinking Fund
A means of repaying funds that were borrowed through a bond issue. The issuer makes periodic payments to a trustee who retires part of the issue by purchasing the bonds in the open market.
Investopedia Says:
Rather than the issuer repaying the entire principal of a bond issue on the maturity date,  another company buys back a portion of the issue annually and usually at a fixed par value or at the current market value of the bonds, whichever is less. Should interest rates decline following a bond issue, sinking-fund provisions allow a firm to lessen the interest rate risk of its bonds as it essentially replaces a portion of existing debt with lower-yielding bonds.
From the investor's point of view, a sinking fund adds safety to a corporate bond issue: with it, the issuing company is less likely to default on the repayment of the remaining principal upon maturity since the amount of the final repayment is substantially less. This added safety affects the interest rate at which the company is able to offer bonds in the marketplace.
偿债基金：偿付来自债券发行资金的方法。发行人定期向一个信托人支付款项，然后信托人通过在公开市场买入债券而赎回部分债券
be alert to  对...警惕(警觉,留神,注意等)
severance pay  离职金; 遣散费
Compensation that an employer gives to someone who is about to lose his or her job.
jeopardy  [?d?ep?di]n.1.危难,危险2.【律】有罪受刑的可能性3.刑事案件中被告的处境
in jeopardy in danger of harm, loss or destruction 处于受伤害p 受损失或受破坏的危险境地
Restructuring 业务重组  重组
A significant modification made to the debt, operations or structure of a company. This type of corporate action is usually made when there are significant problems in a company, which are causing some form of financial harm and putting the overall business in jeopardy. The hope is that through restructuring, a company can eliminate financial harm and improve the business.
Investopedia Says:
When a company is having trouble making payments on its debt, it will often consolidate and adjust the terms of the debt in a debt restructuring. After a debt restructuring, the payments on debt are more manageable for the company and the likelihood of payment to bondholders increases. A company restructures its operations or structure by cutting costs, such as payroll, or reducing its size through the sale of assets. This is often seen as necessary when the current situation at a company is one that may lead to its collapse.
assets retirement  资产报废
offshore a.1. 近岸的;近海的2. 离岸的;向海的3. 【美】国外的;在国外而不受税法限制的
ad.1. 离岸;向海面
strip mine    n. <美>露天矿
set aside 1. 留出,拨出 2. 不顾;不理会 3. 驳回;取消
tax due  n.到期应纳税款 应交/纳税额
premium  ①升水,溢价②奖金,津贴③保险费
refund  n. 退税，退还税款，退款,偿还金额v.付还,偿还借款,换回新公债,退还,归还;偿还
Tax credit  n.税额减/抵免  税收抵免　课税扣除
A dollar-for-dollar reduction in the tax payment required from a person.
Investopedia Says:
Deductions and exemptions only reduce the amount of your income that is taxable. Tax credits reduce the actual amount of tax owed.
statutory  adj.1. 法律的; 法令的; 法规的2. (有关)法令的; 法定的; 依照法令的; 规定的, 依法处罚的　statutory tariffs　法定税率　
jurisdiction n.  司法权, 管辖权, 审判权　　管辖范围 （内&港）；辖区 （内）；管辖权
indefinite reversal  n.无限期转回
unconsolidated   adj.  未凝固的, 未硬化的, 未固结的；松散的
undistributed earnings of subsidiary  n.未分配子公司收益
joint venture　　ph.1. 【商】合资企业;合营企业　临时合伙
两名或以上人士或两家或以上企业合作组成一家企业，双方分享利润及控制权并分担亏损
liability method  n.负债法,用于递延所得税
Backlog  订单积压　未交付订货累积　积压而未交付的订货
The total value of sales orders（销售定单）waiting to be fulfilled.
Investopedia Says:
This figure is used mainly in the manufacturing industry. Increases or decreases in a company's backlog indicate the future direction of sales and earnings.
reconciliation  对帐 （内&港）；调帐；调节表 （内）  调节,一致,调解
Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery System (MACRS)
The new accelerated cost recovery system, created after the release of the Tax Reform Act of 1986, which allows for greater accelerated depreciation over longer time periods.
Investopedia Says:
Faster acceleration allows individuals to deduct greater amounts during the first few years of an asset's life
misstatement fixed  修正虚假陈述　虚假声明；错误陈述
tax holiday  n.免税期　：向国外投资者提供税务宽减的政府鼓励措施
A government incentive program that offers a tax reduction to foreign investors.
Investopedia Says:
Used in the hopes of increasing domestic GDP, tax holidays are a way in which governments attract foreign investors.
sporadic  [sp?'r?dik] 偶发的; 偶见的; 仅在少数地方发生或见到的
sporadic showers 阵雨 * sporadic raids, gunfire, fighting 零星的袭击p 炮击p 战斗
Modified Accelerated Cost Recovery System (MACRS)
The new accelerated cost recovery system, created after the release of the Tax Reform Act of 1986, which allows for greater accelerated depreciation over longer time periods.
Investopedia Says:
Faster acceleration allows individuals to deduct greater amounts during the first few years of an asset's life.
修订加速成本回收制度：是美国为税收目的计算折旧额的基础，它以人为规定的回收期作为摊销期，而不是以有效寿命为摊销期
tax loss carryforward　　税收损失递延
指纳税人可以将当年一定数量的净资产损失延续到下一年，来抵减下一年税额
The current net taxable loss that is used to reduce taxable income (thus ,taxes payable)in future years and can generate a deferred tax asset
Domicile  住处, 住所（尤指正式住址, 据此履行纳税等法律义务者）. 【律】户籍, 定居户籍期票支付场所
The location where an individual, partnership, or corporation establishes permanent residence as per legal obligations.
Investopedia Says:
In order to file taxes, collect insurance, or create a company, firms and individuals must have a recognized place of residence under law.
domiciled  adj [pred 作表语] a. 指定支付地点的; 定居的
coupon rate  票面利率,息票利率
senior   adj.1. 年长的(父子兄弟同名时指年长者, 常缩作Sr.或Sen.)2. 上级的; 前辈的; 地位高的3. [美](中学)最高年级的; (大学或四年制中学的)毕业班的, [英]高年级的4. (债券, 股票对企业财产、红利而言) 有优先权的   senior security优先股(利证券)
Down Payment   首期/次付款　分期付款的首笔付款/头款
A type of payment made in cash during the onset of the purchase of an expensive good/service. The payment typically represents only a percentage of the full purchase price; in some cases it is not refundable if the deal falls through. Financing arrangements are made by the purchaser to cover the remaining amount owed to the seller. 
Making a down payment and then paying the rest of the price through installments is a method that makes expensive assets more affordable for the typical person.
Investopedia Says:
For example, because houses are extremely expensive assets, home buyers typically pay down payments that equal 5-25% of the total value of a home. The remaining 75-95% of the price will be covered by a bank or other financial institutions through a mortgage loan.
Time Horizon   投资期
The length of time over which an investment is made or held before it is liquidated. Time horizons can range from seconds, in the case of a day trader, all the way(一直，完全; 从远道; 一路上; 自始至终) up to decades for a buy-and-hold investor. There is no "right" time frame - it depends on the investor's individual objectives.
Investopedia Says:
Knowing your time horizon is extremely important when it comes to choosing the type of investments you want and your asset allocation. All things being equal, you can afford to be more aggressive with a longer time horizon. For example, most advisors would recommend that the asset allocation of a 30 year old be more heavily weighted in equities than that of someone who is close to retirement. 
That said, age isn't the only determinant of time horizon. A 30 year old who is saving money for a down payment on a house in one year would be investing with a one-year time horizon, despite the fact that retirement is years away. Given the short time frame, it would be prudent to invest more conservatively because there is little time to make up any losses.
bond with warrants  附有认股权债券
Debt Security债务证券
A security representing a loan given by an investor to an issuer. In return for the loan, the issuer promises to pay interest and to repay the debt on a specified date.
Investopedia Says:
Issuers may include corporations, municipalities, the federal government, or a federal agency.
证明投资者向发行人借出资金的证券。接受贷款的发行人承诺在特定日期偿还债务，并在期内支付利息
qualitatively  adv.  从品质上讲,定性地
charge  vt.vi.n 1. 装(满), 使饱含; 装料, 充气[电]; 注(油, 入)2. 使承担(任务等), 委托, 嘱咐, 命令, 告诫, 指示3. 控告, 指责(with); 把...归咎于(to, on, upon)4. 要(价), 收(费); 记帐, 把...记入(to)5. 突击, 猛攻, 冲击6. 压入, 增压
take or pay agreement  n.或取或付协议
take or pay contract  接受或付款契约
指一种表外融资的方式，一方许诺在长期内向另一方购买商品，这将为另一方提供稳定的资金来源。与产量安排（throughput arrangement）相区别
Exchangeable Debt：可交换债券
与可转换债券相似，区别在于可交换债券可交换成为发行人以外公司的普通股（一般为发行人的子公司）
Similar to convertibles, except this type of debt can be converted into the shares of a company other than the issuing company (usually a subsidiary).
OR：debt convertible into the shares of a company other than the issuing compay is referred to  as exchangeable debt
Investopedia Says:
Often used by corporations to sell a large position in the shares of another company.
as with  与…一样
piecemeal  ad. 一件一件地, 逐个地,零碎地a. 一片一片的, 逐渐的, 零碎的n.  断片
better off  景况较佳; 更有余裕
qualify as   1. 取得...资格2. 把(某人)说成
qualify to do sth   使有资格做某事
callable  可随时支付的(如贷款),见通知即兑付(证券或贷款); 可赎回的
callable bond 可提前赎回债券：允许债券发行者在债券到期前的某个特定时期以预先确定的价格再购回的债券
void  　adj 无效的, 作废的
Defeasance  宣告（合约）无效、废止契约
A provision that voids a bond or loan when the borrower sets aside cash or bonds sufficient enough to service the borrower's debt.  Also referred to as "defease."
若借方预留足以还本付息的现金或债券，可注销债券或贷款的条款
Investopedia Says:
The borrower sets aside cash to pay off the bonds, therefore the outstanding debt and cash offset each other on the balance sheet and don't need to be recorded.
1．作废、废除：指合同的解除　2.债务融通：是指使用一组无风险债券（通常是指政府债券）来偿还其它债务
in trust  被托管　　in substance  本质上, 基本上
construction company  建筑公司
priority of claims  优先求偿权
offset  抵销；弥补；冲销
in effect  a. 1在功效方面;实际　2生效;在实行中
lessee  承租人　租户　perpetual lessee永久承租
lessor  出租人　地主
refurbish  将（某物）弄干净; 使（某物）恢复光亮; 重新装饰/再磨光, 刷新
outright sale  n.公开销售
outright 　adv： 1 坦率地; 率直地; 诚实地; 无保留地 I told him outright what I thought of his behaviour. 我把我对他所作所为的看法直率地告诉了他. 2一下子; 立即 buy a house outright, ie not by instalments 以一次付款方式买房.
adj [attrib 作定语1 without any doubt or reservation 毫无疑义的; 毫无保留的: an outright denial, refusal, etc 矢口否认p 断然拒绝. 
2 clear;unmistakable 清楚的; 无疑的: She was the outright winner. 毫无疑问她是优胜者.
market power  市场支配力
bargain purchase  廉价收购
Throughput  生产量
Take or Pay	必付合约
A provision, written into a contract, whereby one party has the obligation of either taking delivery of goods or paying a specified amount.
Investopedia Says:
This is used in some contracts as a method to ensure that the transaction occurs. For example, a Banana farmer will enter into a take or pay contract with a fruit retailer so that the retailer will buy all the bananas from the farmer or pay a provision for not buying them
合约条款，规定交易的一方必须收取交付的货品或支付特定金额的款项
Decompose　vt.1. (使)分解[分裂], (使)还原2. (使)腐烂; 衰[蜕]变3. 剖析
tool box  n.工具箱
cursory  ['k?:s?ri]　a.  匆匆忙忙的, 草率的, 粗略的；(知识等)浅薄的
pro forma  n.预测报表,估计的,形式上
Pro Forma
A Latin term meaning "for the sake of form". In the investing world, it describes a method of calculating financial results in order to emphasize either current or projected figures.
Investopedia Says:
Pro forma financial statements could be designed to reflect a proposed change, such as a merger or acquisition, or to emphasize certain figures when a company issues an earnings announcement to the public. 
Investors should be careful when reading a company's pro-forma financial statements, as the figures may not comply with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). In some cases, the pro-forma figures may differ greatly from the those derived from GAAP.
备考、模拟：拉丁文用词，对投资界而言，指计算财务业绩，以强调当时或预计数据的方法
outline  n.  外形; 略图; 轮廓; 素描 v.  描画轮廓, 描述要点
cutting edge  n. 1 尖端 . 最前线 最重要的位置 2(刀片的)刃口, 刀刃剪刃切削刃
high end  高级, 复杂, 有先进特点或能力
first pass  第一遍、初次通过、第一孔型、一传、最初的
inordinate a. 过度的,非常的,无法无天的
creditworthiness  信誉；信用可靠程度;信用度
transparent　adj.  透明的, 明晰的, 显然的
bypass  n.  旁路, 支路v.  省略, 忽视, 绕过
joint control  共同控制权
consolidation method  合并（会计）法
proportionate consolidation method　比例合并法
illusion　n. 1. 错觉,幻觉;假象[C] 2. 幻想,错误的观念[C][U]
pharmaceutical  adj.1. 制药(学)上的2. 药剂师的3. 药物的, 药用的n.  药物
pharmacy  n.  药房, 配药学
recast   n.重新计算，重算帐目,重铸,改写





=========================
volum4
=========================
Prioritize  vt.  按优先次序列出, 优先考虑
profile    n.侧面；人物简介；轮廓，曲线 vt.为…描绘
pet  n.宠物 vt.抚摸,轻抚 a.宠爱的  
a pet project of senior management 有公司高管偏好在里面的项目
perk vi.昂首,振作,举止高傲,神气活现vt.竖起,打扮,使振作,滤煮n.小费，津贴;额外补贴
ad　 hoc  adj.  特别地; 专门地; 格外地  仅为某一目的（而做或安排）（的）; 特别（的）: 非事先计划（的）; 非正式（的）:
Yield Spread	
The difference between yields on differing debt instruments, calculated by deducting the yield of one instrument from another. The higher the yield spread, the greater the difference between the yields offered by each instrument. The spread can be measured between debt instruments of differing maturities, credit ratings and risk.
Investopedia Says:
Looking at the yield spread, often with historical spreads, can give investors ideas for potential investment opportunities.
For example, if the five-year Treasury bond is at 5% and the 30-year Treasury bond is at 6%, the yield spread between the two debt instruments is 1% (6% - 5%). If the yield spread has historically been closer to 5%, the investor is much more likely to invest in the five-year bond compared to the 30-year bond (as it should be trading around 1% instead of 6%).
In other words, if the 30-year bond is trading at 6%, then based on the historical yield spread, the five-year should be trading at around 1%, making it very attractive at its current yield of 5%.
收益利差：不同品质证券的收益率之间的差额。债券的收益率与相同到期日的无风险证券（通常是政府债券）收益率的差，该收益利差主要由市场对该债券信用风险的预期来决定的
tax bracket  n.税率等级
Corporate Tax
A levy placed on the profit of a firm; different rates are used for different levels of profits.
Investopedia Says:
Corporate taxes are usually levied by all levels of government (ie. State and Country)
公司税：因应公司利润征收的税项，不同水平利润采用不同的税率
forego  [f????u]vt.,vi.  (-went [-?went]; -gone [-??n]) 在…之前, 居先, 先行 放弃foregone  adj. 1 先前的, 已知的, 过去的2预先决定的; 确定要发生的; (结局)预料中必然的3放弃的
cash conversion cycle  资金周转周期；现金流转周期 
tied up  套牢；多头套牢；空头套牢；给套住 （内）；被缚；"大闸蟹" 
东西等搁死的; 不能挪作他用的; 人等脱不了身的; 忙得不可开交的
Overly　过度地;极度地
in the context of　　在...情况下
aging schedule  帐龄分析表　　分期表
aging schedule of account receivable  n.应收帐款帐龄分析表
aging the account  n.帐龄分价
aging the receivable  n.分析付款欠帐的时间
lenient adj.  宽大的; 慈悲为怀的; 仁慈的
carrying cost  n.仓储费用　保管费　维持成本　利息成本；持有成本；资金成本差额
put up with  忍受; 容忍，忍耐,迁就
line of credit    n. 信用贷款之最高限额　信用限额
uncommitted balance  未定用途的结余款项
uncommitted　adj 1. 未承诺的2. 不受(誓约等)约束的,自由的3. 未遂的4. 未被监禁的
overdraft  透支
An instant extension of credit from a lending institution.
Investopedia Says:
 If you have an overdraft account, your bank will cover checks which would otherwise bounce. As with any loan, you pay interest on the outstanding balance of an overdraft loan.
bounce  n.  跳, 弹力, 跳跃v.  反跳, 弹跳; 使跳回, 使撞击
退票 （内&港）；支票未兑现 （港）指支票）遭银行退票（因帐户中无钱）
Prime Rate  最优惠利率 最低利率
商业银行向最重要或信用质素最佳的客户，一般是大型机构，收取的利率
The interest rate that commercial banks charge their most credit-worthy customers. Generally a bank's best customers consist of large corporations.
Investopedia Says:
Default risk is the main determiner of the interest rate a bank will charge a borrower. Because a bank's best customers have little chance of defaulting, the bank can charge them a rate that is lower than the rate that would be charged to a customer who has a higher likelihood of defaulting on a loan.
factoring  应收帐款转/让售   n.代理经营,代理融通,因子分解
Blanket Lien  总括/一揽子留置权 
A lien covering nearly all types of assets and collateral owned by a debtor.
Investopedia Says:
A lien usually only gives the creditor the right to a specific asset. A blanket lien gives the creditor a legal interest in all the debtor's assets and other collateral. Defaulting on a debt in this situation can result in "losing your shirt".
Lien  留置权 (扣押权) 
~ (on/upon sth) right to keep sb's property until a debt owed in connection with it (for repair, transport, etc) is paid 留置权, 扣押权（扣押某人财产直至债务, 如修理费p 运输费等清偿方予放还者）.
When a creditor or bank has the right to sell the mortgaged or collateral property of those who fail to meet the obligations of a loan contract.
Investopedia Says:
This is typically enforced under provincial or state laws.
direct placement  直接发售 （内&港）；不通过中介证券出售 （内）；直接配售；发行债券时的直接销售
cost effective  成本效率;节省成本的
redundant  n.过剩的，多余的, 冗长的, 过多的
pro forma  n.预测报表,估计的,形式上  作为惯例; 形式上（的）.
Pro Forma
A Latin term meaning "for the sake of form". In the investing world, it describes a method of calculating financial results in order to emphasize either current or projected figures.
Investopedia Says:
Pro forma financial statements could be designed to reflect a proposed change, such as a merger or acquisition, or to emphasize certain figures when a company issues an earnings announcement to the public. 
Investors should be careful when reading a company's pro-forma financial statements, as the figures may not comply with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP). In some cases, the pro-forma figures may differ greatly from the those derived from GAAP.
备考、模拟：拉丁文用词，对投资界而言，指计算财务业绩，以强调当时或预计数据的方法
take note of  注意，留意
Corporate Governance  公司治理；企业/公司管治 
The relationship between all the stakeholders in a company. This includes the shareholders, directors, and management of a company, as defined by the corporate charter, bylaws, formal policy and rule of law.
Investopedia Says:
Ethical companies are said to have excellent corporate governance.
一家企业所有权益方之间的关系，包括股东、董事及管理层等，原则根据企业章程、附则、正式政策及法规
checks and balances  制衡
a system that allows each branch of a government to amend or veto acts of another branch so as to prevent any one branch from exerting too much power　
veto  [?vi:t?u]　vt.／ n.否决
have a voice in　　有发言权
critique　 n.  批评, 评论, 批评法
shareowner protection　股东保护
recuse  [ri?kju?z]vt.  [罕](认为某法官[陪审员]有偏见或其他原因)宣布反对; 要求撤换
　　　　回避
align oneself with sb join sb as an ally; come into agreement with sb 与某人结盟; 与某人一致: 
tenure   　n.终身职位；任期；(土地)保有权，保有期
stagger  [?st?g?]vt.使吃惊；使交错 n./ vi.摇晃，蹒跚 交错安排(法)[C]
staggered  ['stag?gered || 'st?g?(r)d]　adj.  吃惊的; 难以相信的
Classified Board
A structure for a board of directors in which a portion of the directors serve for different term lengths, depending on their particular classification. Under a classified system, directors serve terms usually lasting between one and eight years; longer terms are often awarded to more senior board positions (i.e. chairman of the corporate governance committee). 
Classified boards are often referred to as "staggered boards", although staggered boards and classified boards have somewhat different structures. Staggered boards need not be classified, but classified boards are inherently staggered.
Investopedia Says:
The classified board structure features continuity of direction and preservation of skill, but has come under harsh criticism from shareholder advocacy groups for a number of reasons. Opponents to the classified structure argue that the system breeds board member complacency and forces directors to develop close relations with management.
Classified boards also serve as a powerful anti-takeover measure.
累计投票制（Cumulative Voting）薪酬委员会（Compensation Committee），审计委员会（Auditing Committee），分级董事会（Classified Board），也叫做“参差董事会”（Staggered Board）
所谓分级董事会就是指董事的任期体现出一种参差的顺序，从而使得董事会每年只能改选其中1/2或1/3的董事。分级董事会的目的在于确保管理层能够避免公司股东变化带来的影响。尽管这通常仅是上市公司所特有的问题，但近来在美国这一问题也受到争议。在美国东海岸，持批评观点的人认为，那些位于西海岸的、没有确立分级董事会制度的公司上市后往往非常容易成为被收购的对象，这是因为恶意收购者可以非常迅速地取得对公司董事会的控制权。这说明，尽管对于一个小型的私有公司来说，采用简单的董事会结构确实具有降低操作成本的合理性，而一个分级董事会制度往往可以在公司上市的时候为原有股东提供更多的保护。
关联交易（Related Party Transaction）关联方（Interested Party 或 Related Party）受限股份（Restricted Shares）既得股份（Vested Shares） 既得日期（Vesting Date）
nominee  代理人；被提名人；被任命者；名义持有人 （内&港）；代名人 （港）
executive officer  主管人员* （内&港）；执行官; 主任参谋
finder's fee   中间人佣金　财务经纪费
directorship  董事/理事职务　管理者(如主管、董事等)的职位
ally  (sb/oneself) with/to sb/sth join or become joined with sb/sth by treaty, marriage, etc 与某人[某事物]结盟p 联盟或联姻:
Self Assessment  自我评估/定　自我评税
code of ethics  (职业)道德标准
Prospectus  招股说明书　招股章程；发行章程
set forth  陈述(陈列,出发,宣布)；阐明; 提出; 宣布
waive  [weiv]vt免除.1. 放弃(权利、特权、要求等)2. 丢[舍]弃(赃物等)3. 搁置; 延期进行4. 挥手让...离开; 把...撇开waive one's right of appeal放弃上诉权waive sth. aside把某事撇开不管
commensurate  adj　~(to/with sth) in the right proportion (to sth); appropriate （与某事物）成比例的, 适当的, 相称的: Her low salary is not commensurate with her abilities. 她的薪水很低, 与她的能力不相称.
means of financing　筹资方式　融资手段
shareowner  n.  股份持有人; 股东
and the like  n.等等,依此类推
remuneration  酬金；薪酬；报酬
compensation  ①报酬②补偿,赔偿
in place  在适当的位置; 适当DDD到位
Reciprocal  互惠的，相互的　【数】倒数
reciprocal decisions　　互惠性决定
nominations committee  提名委员会
By-law  细则；组织章程
Cast  投票; 选派...扮演角色, 分配角色
casting `vote vote given (eg by a chairman) to decide an issue when votes on each side are equal 决定票（当各方票数相等时, 由主席所作的决定性投票）.
prospectus  招股章程；发行章程
Prospectus
A formal legal document, which is required by and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, that provides details about an investment offering for sale to the public. A prospectus should contain the facts that an investor needs to make an informed investment decision.Also known as an "offer document".
Investopedia Says:
There are two types of prospectuses for stocks and bonds: preliminary and final. The preliminary prospectus is the first offering document provided by a securities issuer and includes most of the details of the business and transaction in question. Some lettering on the front cover is printed in red, which results in the use of the nickname "red herring" for this document. The final prospectus is printed after the deal has been made effective and can be offered for sale, and supersedes the preliminary prospectus. It contains finalized background information including such details as the exact number of shares/certificates issued and the precise offering price.

In the case of mutual funds, which, apart from their initial share offering, continuously offer shares for sale to the public, the prospectus used is a final prospectus. A fund prospectus contains details on its objectives, investment strategies, risks, performance, distribution policy, fees and expenses, and fund management.
公开说明书
1. 描述一家企业细节的正式法律文件。公开说明书一般为发行（一般是首次公开上市）而编制，但也有为说明现有业务而发表的。公开说明书包含对潜在投资者至关重要的公司信息
2. 共同基金的公开说明书描述基金的目的、历史、经理人背景及财务报表
impediment    n 
 ~ (to sb/sth) person or thing that hinders or obstructs the progress or movement of sth 妨碍p 阻碍某事物进展或活动的人或物: The main impediment to growth was a lack of capital. 影响发展的主要障碍是缺乏资本. 
 physical disability of a specified type; defect 身体上的某类残疾; 缺陷: a speech impediment, eg a lisp or a stammer 言语障碍（如口齿不清或口吃）.
Supermajority
A corporate amendment in a company's charter requiring a large majority (anywhere from 67-90%) of shareholders to approve important changes, such as a merger. 
This is sometimes called a "supermajority amendment". Often a company's charter will simply call for a majority (more than 50%) to make these types of decisions.
Investopedia Says:
For example, let's say the TSJ Sports Conglomerate is faced with a merger proposal from ABC Sports Inc. If the company has a supermajority amendment in it's charter, then before it is able to merge (even if management fully endorses the move) the company will need to hold a shareholder vote on the issue and gain a majority equal to, or greater than, the amendment specifies (anywhere from 67-90%).    
(常用supermajorities)投票数至少占总票数的五分之三
redress  [re?dress |n.  纠正, 矫正; 赔偿, 补偿v.  纠正, 矫正; 赔偿, 补偿; 革除; 补救
dissenter  [dis'sent?er || -t?] n.  不同意者, 非国教派的人, 反对者
Golden Parachute  黄金降落伞  优厚退职金
Lucrative benefits given to top executives in the event that a company is taken over by another firm, resulting in the loss of their job. Benefits include items such as stock options, bonuses, severance pay, etc.
Investopedia Says:
A golden parachute can be used as a measure to discourage an unwanted takeover attempt.
在公司被另一家公司收购时向高级行政人员提供的优厚补偿，以弥补收购导致他们失去工作。这些补偿包括股票期权、奖金、解雇费
lucrative  n.有利的, 有利益的, 合算的, 获利的
severance pay  解雇费, 离职金; 遣散费
Severance Pay
Compensation that an employer gives to someone who is about to lose his or her job.
Investopedia Says:
Severance pay is not always paid to employees. It depends on the situation in which the employee is losing his or her job and whether legislation requires severance to be paid.
Parachute n. 降落伞 v. 跳伞
Poison Pill
A strategy used by corporations to discourage a hostile takeover by another company. The target company attempts to make its stock less attractive to the acquirer. There are two types of poison pills: 
1. A "flip-in" allows existing shareholders (except the acquirer) to buy more shares at a discount. 
2. The "flip-over" allows stockholders to buy the acquirer's shares at a discounted price after the merger.
Investopedia Says:
1. By purchasing more shares cheaply (flip-in), investors get instant profits and, more importantly, they dilute the shares held by the competitors. As a result, the competitor's takeover attempt is made more difficult and expensive. 
2. An example of a flip-over is when shareholders have the right to purchase stock of the acquirer on a 2-for-1 basis in any subsequent merger. 
This is similar to the macaroni defense, except it uses equity rather than bonds.
macaroni  [?m?k??r?uni]n.  (pl. macaronis, macaronies)1. (意大利)通心面条, 通心粉2. 
(18世纪伦敦装模作样学欧洲大陆派头的)时髦男子; 浮华少年, (泛指)花花公子
poison pill 公司发行新认股权证或对优先股授权，使收购公司的成本极大，从而阻止不友好的收购兼并企图。
　　在所有反收购案例中，毒丸（poisonpill）长期以来就是理想武器。毒丸计划是美国著名的并购律师马丁?利普顿（MartinLipton）1982年发明的，正式名称为“股权摊薄反收购措施”，最初的形式很简单，就是目标公司向普通股股东发行优先股，一旦公司被收购，股东持有的优先股就可以转换为一定数额的收购方股票。在最常见的形式中，一旦未经认可的一方收购了目标公司一大笔股份（一般是10%至20%的股份）时，毒丸计划就会启动，导致新股充斥市场。一旦毒丸计划被触发，其他所有的股东都有机会以低价买进新股。这样就大大地稀释了收购方的股权，继而使收购变得代价高昂，从而达到抵制收购的目的。美国有超过2000家公司拥有这种工具。
　　“毒丸”计划一般分为“弹出”计划和“弹入”计划。“弹出”计划通常指履行购股权，购买优先股。譬如，以100元购买的优先股可以转换成目标公司200元的股票。“弹出”计划最初的影响是提高股东在收购中愿意接受的最低价格。如果目标公司的股价为50元，那么股东就不会接受所有低于150元的收购要约。因为150元是股东可以从购股权中得到的溢价，它等于50元的股价加上200元的股票减去100元的购股成本。这时，股东可以获得的最低股票溢价是200％。
　　在“弹入”计划中，目标公司以很高的溢价购回其发行的购股权，通常溢价高达100％，就是说，100元的优先股以200元的价格被购回。而敌意收购者或触发这一事件的大股东则不在回购之列。这样就稀释了收购者在目标公司的权益。“弹入”计划经常被包括在一个有效的“弹出”计划中。“毒丸”计划在美国是经过1985年德拉瓦斯切斯利(DelawanceChancery)法院的判决才被合法化的，由于它不需要股东的直接批准就可以实施，故在八十年代后期被广泛采用。
　　毒丸计划是为了公司不被人强行收购的一种计划,事先由各大股东签好协议,一旦有不被认同的人收购一部份股权,就自动增发未被收购股权的股份,使收购者的股权立即被稀释而达不到控股的目的.但因其会同时损害大股东的利益,所以称为毒丸计划.
　　具体方法有增持股份、寻求大股东联盟及收集中小股东的投票委托书、找第三方公司充当外援、高报价求购狙击手的股份、制定有针对性的股东权益计划（即“毒丸”）等
Greenmail反购回；反收购 （内&港）；绿色勒索 （港）
A situation in which a large block of stock is held by an unfriendly company. This forces the target company to repurchase the stock at a substantial premium to prevent a takeover. It is also known as a "Bon Voyage Bonus" or a "Goodbye Kiss".
Investopedia Says:
Not unlike blackmail, this is a dirty tactic, but it's very effective.
为了促使股票升值,或者迫使有意收购某公司股票以进行其抢夺经营权利的人付出更大代价,而预行购入该公司一大批股票之行为
blackmail  n.  敲诈; 勒索; 勒索所得之款v.  敲诈; 胁迫; 勒索
acquisition of 100% interest  收购全部股权
invoke  [in?v?uk]vt.1. 向神灵祈求保佑; 用符咒召唤(魔鬼)2. 行使(法权等); 援引(法规、条文等)3. 请求; 恳求(援助等)4. 引起, 产生
informed decision  有根据的决定 
反收购
　　反收购：收购分为善意收购和恶意收购，恶意收购会导致反收购的出现。反收购是指目标公司管理层为了防止公司控制权转移而采取的旨在预防或挫败收购者收购本公司的行为。
　　反收购具有以下特征：1、反收购的主体是目标公司；2、反收购的核心在于防止公司控制权的转移；3、目标公司反收购措施分为两大类：一类是预防收购者收购的事前措施，一类是为阻止收购者收购成功的事后措施。
　　1．预防性反收购措施
　　这一类反收购行为发生在要约收购出现以前，目标公司以各种形式防范以后可能出现的收购进攻，具体包括以下几种。
　　（1）毒丸
　　“毒丸”（Poison Pill）是指目标公司通过制定特定的股份计划，赋予不同的股东以特定的优先权利，一旦收购要约发出，该特定的优先权利的行使，可以导致公司财务结构的弱化或收购方部分股份投票权的丧失。这样收购方即使在收购成功后，也可能像吞下毒丸一样遭受不利后果，从而放弃收购。
　　（2）反收购条款
　　反收购条款又可称为“驱鲨剂”（Shark Repellent）或者“豪猪条款”。（Porcupine Provision）。所谓“驱鲨剂”是指在收购要约前修改公司设立章程或做其它防御准备以使收购要约更为困难的条款。而“豪猪条款”则是指在公司设立章程或内部细则中设计防御条款，使那些没有经过目标公司董事会同意的收购企图不可能实现或不具可行性。
　　（3）金降落伞
　　“金降落伞”（Golden Parachute）是指目标公司通过与其高级管理人员签订合同条款，规定目标公司有义务给予高级管理人员优厚的报酬和额外的利益，若是公司的控制权发生突然变更，则给予高级管理人员以全额的补偿金。目标公司希望以此方式增加收购的负担与成本，阻却外来收购。与之相对应的还有一个“锡降落伞”，是在金降落伞以外再规定目标公司员工若在收购后第二年被解雇，可以要求一定数量的补偿性遣散费。通过上述方式在保障有关管理人员优厚待遇的同时，增加公司被收购的难度。
　　（4）员工持股
　　员工持股计划是指鼓励公司雇员购买本公司股票，并建立员工持股信托组织的计划。虽然说员工持股计划在国外的产生与发展是公司民主化思潮及劳动力产权理论影响下的产物，但在现代西方各国，员工持股计划也成为公司进行反收购的重要手段。这是因为公司被收购往往意味着大量员工的解雇与失业，因而在收购开始时，员工股东对公司的认同感高于一般的股东，其所持股份更倾向于目标公司一方，不易被收购。
　　（5）提前偿债条款
　　指目标公司在章程中设立条款，在公司面临收购时，迅速偿还各种债务，包括提前偿还未到期的债务，以此给收购者在收购成功后造成巨额的财务危机。
　　2、抵抗性（事后）反收购行为
　　这一类反收购行为发生在敌意收购要约出现之时，目标公司以各种方式直接对抗和阻碍收购行为的顺利进行，具体包括以下几种。
　　（1）白衣骑士
　　“白衣骑士”（White Knight）是指在面临外界的敌意收购时，目标公司寻找一个友好的支持者，作为收购人与恶意收购者相竞争，以挫败收购行为。该友好的收购人即为白衣骑士，而敌意收购人则可以称为黑马骑士，以形容其秘密收购目标公司股票进行股份袭击的特征。通过白马骑士战略，目标公司不仅可以通过增加竞争者而使买方提高收购价，甚至可以通过“锁位选择权”给予白马骑士优惠的条件购买公司的资产、股票等。
　　（2）帕克曼式防御
　　这种“帕克曼式防御”（Pac-man Defense）的称谓来源于80年代初期美国颇为流行一种电子游戏。在该游戏中，程序设计的电子动物相互疯狂争斗，期间每一个没有吃掉敌手的动物都将遭到毁灭。受此启示，美国反收购中出现了“帕克曼式防御”，即指目标公司在受到敌意收购的进攻后，采取种种积极措施，以攻为守，对收购者提出反向的收购要约，以收购收购者的方式牵制收购者，或者以出让公司部分利益、部分股权为条件，策动一家与公司关系密切的友好公司出面收购收购方股份，达到反收购的效果。
　　（3）焦土政策
　　还有一种反收购措施称之为“焦土政策”（Scorched Earth）。比如，目标公司手中尚有大量的现金并准备用来回购其股票、或者目标公司可能大量举债来回购其股份。这两种方式都能阻止收购者。收购者想利用目标公司现有资金弥补其收购支出是不可能了，而该目标公司可能身负债务，收购已经变得没有意义了。
　　焦土政策的另一种方式是将目标公司吸引收购者的重要营业，即“皇冠明珠”（Crown Jewels），予以出售。比如，与白衣骑士订立协议使白衣骑士获得“皇冠明珠”,如果白衣骑士在收购战中没有获得目标公司全部股份的话。如上所述，这种方式称之为“锁定交易”。
其他的反收购措施包括存在争议的拒绝出售（just say no）、说服股东不要出售、煽动雇员、社区反对收购以及利用宣传手段阻止收购，等等。
十二大国际通行的反收购策略
　国际上常见的反收购措施主要有三类：1、采取股票交易策略，如股份回购、白衣骑士法等以防止被收购；2、采取管理上的策略，如发行有限制表决权的股 票、通过密切公司相互持股、采取毒丸措施、在公司章程中置入“驱鲨剂”反收购条款等，以防止被收购；3、诉诸于法律的保护，即根据证券法、公司法、反托拉 斯法等相关法律对收购行为的规定，求助法院确认某项收购不合法。由于反收购措施是从实践中发展起来的，部分措施只注重其反收购的效果，尤其是管理上的部分 措施如“毒丸计划”、“焦土战术”等，难免会损害部分股东的利益，影响上市公司自身的持续经营，具有一定的负面作用。
1、股票交易策略
（1）股份回购 （Share Repurchase）与死亡换股股份回购
股份回购与死亡换股股份回购是指目标公司或其董事、监事回购目标公司的股份。回购股份在实战中往往是作为辅助战术来实施的。如果单纯通过股份回购来达到 反收购的效果，往往会使目标公司库存股票过多，一方面不利于公司筹资，另一方面也会影响公司资金的流动性。目标公司财务状况是制约这一手段的最大因素。死 亡换股即目标公司发行公司债券、特别股或其组合以回收其股票。这同样起到减少在外流通股份和提升股票价格的作用。但死亡换股对目标公司的风险很大，因负债 比例过高，财务风险增加，即使公司价值不变，但权益比重降低，股价不见得会随在外流通股份的减少而升高。更有甚者，即便股价等比例上涨，但买方收购所需要 的股数也相应地减少，最后收购总价款变化不大，目标公司可能只是白忙一场。
（2）帕克曼（Pac-man）防御
收购收购者即“帕 克曼”战略，也是被收购企业可能采取的一种方式，目标企业购买收购者的普通股，以达到保卫自己的目的。但前提是被收购者与收购者的力量对比并不悬殊。该战 略是一场非常残酷的收购战，最后的胜利者往往是那些实力雄厚、融资渠道广泛的公司。如果收购战的双方实力相当，其结果很可能是两败俱伤。没有明确的研究结 果表明收购双方股东能从中受益。
（3）寻找“白衣骑士”（White Knight）
指目标企业为免遭敌意收购而自己寻找善意收 购者。公司在遭到收购威胁时，为不使本企业落人恶意收购者手中，可选择与其关系密切的有实力的公司，以更优惠的条件达成善意收购。通常，如果敌意收购者的 收购出价不是很高，目标公司被“白衣骑士”拯救的可能性就大；如果敌意收购者提出的收购出价很高，那么“白衣骑士”的成本也会相应提高，目标公司获得拯救 的可能性就会减少。
在美国1978年至1984年间的78起成功的反收购案例中，有36起是被“白衣骑士”拯救的。
2、管理策略
（1）毒丸计划（Poison Pill）
毒丸计划亦称毒丸术，最早起源于股东认股权证计划，其正式名称为“股权摊薄反收购措施”，是美国著名的并购律师马丁?利普顿（Martin Lipton）1982年发明的。
目标公司为避免被其他公司收购，采取了一些在特定情况下，如公司一旦被收购，就会对本身造成严重损害的手段，以降低本身吸引力，收购方一旦成功，就好像吞食了“毒丸”一样不好处理。常见的毒丸计划有：
a.负债毒丸计划
负债毒丸计划指目标公司在收购威胁下大量增加自身负债，降低企业被收购的吸引力。例如，发行债券并约定在公司股权发生大规模转移时，债券持有人可要求立刻兑付，从而使收购公司在收购后立即面临巨额现金支出，降低其收购兴趣。
b.人员毒丸计划
人员毒丸计划的基本方法是公司的绝大部分高级管理人员共同签署协议，在公司被以不公平价格收购，并且这些人中有一人在收购后被降职或革职时，则全部管理 人员将集体辞职。这一策略不仅保护了目标公司股东的利益，而且会使收购方慎重考虑收购后更换管理层对公司带来的巨大影响。企业的管理层阵容越强大、越精 干，实施这一策略的效果将越明显。当管理层的价值对收购方无足轻重时，人员毒丸计划也就收效甚微了。
毒丸计划从发明到广泛应用经历了三年的不断修 改和调整，在此期间，采用毒丸计划的公司数量不多。直到1985年11月，美国特拉华州（多数美国公司的注册地）法院判定家庭国际公司使用毒丸计划具有合 法性以后，毒丸计划开始被大公司广泛接受并采纳，在20世纪90年代，毒丸计划已经非常普遍了（见图1）。
而进入21世纪后，越来越少的公司 采用毒丸计划了。根据TrueCourse的数据，2003年仅有大约99家公司采用新的毒丸计划，采用率降至了10年来低点，较前一年减少了42%。虽 然2004年采用毒丸计划的净公司数量仍然占多数，但上述数据显示采用该计划的公司数量的增速正在急剧下滑。有报告认为毒丸计划给投资者留下了公司董事会 对任何出价的收购均不予考虑的印象，因此有损于股票表现。当一家公司宣布一项新的毒丸计划时，其股价往往会下跌。2001年，雅虎公司（Yahoo Inc.）的股票在公司宣布实行这一计划时就下跌了11%。
与此同时，众多美国公司开始放弃使用这一著名的反收购手段，是因为毒丸计划遭到了激进股东的反对，并且一系列公司丑闻曝光后，美国公司面临着公司治理的新压力。
据跟踪反收购案例的TrueCourse Inc.提供的数据，2004年第一季度，已有十多家公司采取了弃用毒丸的措施，相比之下，2003年全年有29家，2002年只有18家。在目前的市场 环境中，公司董事会越来越希望给外人以公司治理良好而不是层层防护的印象，因此弃用毒丸计划的趋势可能会越来越明显。
（2）焦土战术（Scorched Earth Policy）
焦土战术同样是一种两败俱伤的策略。常用做法主要有两种：
a.出售“冠珠”。公司可能将引起收购者兴趣的“皇冠上的珍珠”（Crown Jewels），即那些经营好的子公司或者资产出售，使得收购者的意图无法实现，或者增加大量资产，提高公司负债，最后迫使收购者放弃收购计划。
b.虚胖战术。公司购置大量与经营无关或盈利能力差的资产，使公司资产质量下降；或者是做一些长时间才能见效的投资，使公司在短时间内资产收益率大减。通过采用这些手段，使公司从精干变得臃肿，收购之后，买方将不堪重负。
采取类似“自残”的方式，降低收购者的收购收益或增加收购者风险也能够达到击退恶意收购的目的。“毒丸计划”和“焦土战术”是其中两个杀手锏。
（3）驱鲨剂（Shark Repellents）
所谓驱鲨剂是指公司出于反收购的目的在公司章程中设置的一些作为收购障碍的条款，又被称为“箭猪条款”或“反接收条款”。以下为两种主要的“驱鲨剂”条款：
a.分期分级董事会制度（Staggered Board Election）
又称董事会轮选制，是指公司章程规定每年只能改选１/４或1/3的董事。这意味着收购者即使收购到了足量的股权，也无法对董事会做出实质性改组，即无法 很快地入主董事会控制公司。因为董事会的大部分董事还是原来的董事，他们仍掌握着多数表决权，仍然控制着公司，他们可以决定采取增资扩股或其他办法来稀释 收购者的股票份额，也可以决定采取其他办法来达到反收购的目的。董事轮换制是一种有效的，对股价影响较小的反收购对策。
根据TrueCourse的数据，2003年新上市公司中只有不到一半拥有参差董事会，低于2002年的82%。这一数据表明，近几年采用这一策略的公司数量正在下降。
b.绝对多数条款（Super-majority Provision）
绝对多数条款是指在公司章程中规定，对于可能影响到控制权变化的重大事项决议必须经过多数人表决权同意通过。特别的，如果要更改公司章程中的反收购条 款，必须经过绝对多数股东或董事同意，这就增加了收购者接管、改组目标公司的难度和成本。比如章程中规定：须经全体股东２/３或３/４以上同意，才可允许 公司与其他公司合并。这意味着收购者为了实现对目标公司的合并，须要购买２/３或３/４以上的股权或须要争取到更多的（２/３或３/４以上）股东投票赞成 己方的意见，这在一定程度上增加了收购的成本和收购难度。这种反收购对策对股价可能有一定的影响，但仍然被认为是一种温和的反收购对策。
除此以外，还有限制大股东表决权条款、订立公正价格条款（Fair price provision）和限制董事资格条款等。
（4）牛卡计划（Dual Class Recapitalization）      
牛卡计划也称作“不同表决权股份结构”，这种反收购策略是将公司股票按投票权划分为高级和低级两等，低级股票每股拥有一票的投票权，高级股票每一股拥有 十票的投票权，但高级股票派发的股息较低，市场流动性较差，低级股票的股息较高，市场流动性较好。高级股票可以转换为低级股票。如果实行了牛卡计划，公司 管理层掌握了足够的高级股票，公司的投票权就会发生转移。即使敌意收购者获得了大量的低级股票，也难以取得公司的控制权。
与董事轮换制和绝对多数条款相比，采取牛卡计划这种反收购对策的公司要少。该对策对目标企业股价的影响较小。
8月份在NASDAQ上市的百度公司在公司章程里就有牛卡计划（在后面案例中有介绍）。上个世纪七八十年代牛卡计划在香港也出现过，例如英资的太古集团 （0019.HK）就曾采用过分设A、B类股票的方案，但由于公司小股东希望“同股同权”，这种方案从上世纪90年代开始已经十多年没有出现过，而百度采 取这样的方案，只要得到全体股东的同意，也是完全可行的。
（5）相互持股
交叉持股或相互持股也是反收购的一个重要策略，也就是关 联公司或关系友好公司之间相互持有对方股权。韩国家族企业，时常通过在关系企业中交叉持股的复杂网络来控制子公司。具体做法是，一个公司购买另一个公司 10%的股份，另一个公司反过来也购买这个公司10%的股份，一旦其中一个公司被作为收购的目标，另一个公司就会伸出援助之手，避免关联或者友好公司被收 购。
（6）寻求机构投资者和中小股东支持           
寻求股东支持通常有两种途径：
a.改善公司业绩，提升公司价值，或为公司计划光明的前景，赢得包括机构投资者和中小股东的信赖和支持；
b.公开征集其他股东投票代理权，取得股东大会上表决权的优势。
（7）管理层防卫策略
管理层防卫策略主要是指所谓的“降落伞策略”。
公司收购往往导致目标公司的管理人员被解职，普通员工也可能被解雇。为了解除管理人员及员工的这种后顾之忧，美国有许多公司采用“金降落伞” （Golden Parachutes）、“银降落伞”（Sliver Parachutes）和“锡降落伞”（Tin Parachutes）的做法。
“金降落伞”是指目标公司董事会通过决议，由公司董事及高层管理者与目标公司签订合同规定：当目标公司被并购接管、其董事及高层管理者被解职的时候，可 一次性领到巨额的退休金（解职费）、股票选择权收入或额外津贴。如对于大型公司的CEO（首席执行官），这一补偿可达千万美元以上。该等收益就像一把降落 伞让高层管理者从高高的职位上安全下来，故名“降落伞”计划；又因其收益丰厚如金，故名“金降落伞”。目前全美500强中已有一半以上通过了这项议案。
“银降落伞”是指规定目标公司一旦落入收购方手中，公司有义务向被解雇的中层管理人员支付较“金降落伞”略微逊色的保证金。
“锡降落伞”是指目标公司的员工若在公司被收购后两年内被解雇的话，则可领取员工遣散费。
显然，“银降落伞”和“锡降落伞”的得名，其理与“金降落伞”的得名出于同辙。
从反收购效果的角度来说，“金降落伞”、“银降落伞”和“锡降落伞”策略，能够加大收购成本或增加目标公司现金支出从而阻碍购并。“金降落伞”法可有助于防止管理者从自己的后顾之忧出发阻碍有利于公司和股东的合理并购，故“金降落伞”引起许多争论和疑问。
“金降落伞”策略出现后收到美国大公司经营者的普遍欢迎。在20世纪80年的，“金降落伞”增长很快，美国500家大公司中有一半以上的董事会采用了“金降落伞”议案。
（8）绿色邮件（Greenmail）
绿色邮件策略是指贿赂外部收购者，以现金流换取管理层的稳定。其基本原理为目标公司以一定的溢价回购被外部敌意收购者先期持有的股票，以直接的经济利益 赶走外部的收购者；同时，绿色邮件通常包含一个大宗股票持有人在一定期限（通常是十年）内不准持有目标公司股票的约定（standstill）。
前面所述反收购措施的共同点是被收购公司的管理层与外部敌意收购者始终处于一种对立的状态中，最后要么以外部投资人依靠很强的实力扫除一系列障碍最终入 主目标公司董事会，要么目标公司管理层运用各种手段击退敌意收购者。绿色邮件策略通过给予外部攻击者一定的直接经济利益的方法换取并购大战的和平解决和目 标公司管理层的稳定。但是由于这种政策直接以牺牲股东利益为代价来换取管理层的稳定，一般受到各国监管当局的严格禁止，基本上属于公司私下里的行为。一旦 发现，管理层通常被处以严重的惩罚。
3、诉诸于法律的保护
根据反垄断、信息披露不充分、犯罪等理由，被收购公司也可以采取法律手段提起诉讼，使收购方提高收购价。
目标公司提起诉讼的理由主要有三条：第一，反垄断。部分收购可能使收购方获得某一行业的垄断或接近垄断地位，目标公司可以此作为诉讼理由；第二，披露不 充分。目标公司认定收购方未按有关法律规定向公众及时、充分或准确地披露信息等；第三，犯罪。除非有十分确凿的证据，否则目标公司难以以此为由提起诉讼。
法律诉讼有两个目的。第一，它可以拖延收购，从而鼓励其他竞争者参与收购；第二，可以通过法律诉讼迫使收购者提高其收购价格，或迫使目标公司为了避免法律诉讼而放弃收购。
数据显示，在美国1962年至1980年间有约1/3的收购案发生了法律诉讼。
entrench  (also intrench) [in?trent?]vt.1. 用壕沟防护, 在...围以壕沟2. 使盘踞, 固守, 牢固树立; 使处于有力地位3. 挖壕,掘,深挖entrenched by long tradition由悠久传统所确立entrenched within tradition墨守成规[惯例]
vi.1. 侵犯, 侵占2. [古]接近(on, upon)
Risk Tolerance
The degree of uncertainty that an investor can handle in regard to a negative change in the value of his or her portfolio.
Investopedia Says:
An investor's risk tolerance varies according to age, income requirements, financial goals, etc. For example, a 70-year-old retired widow will generally have a lower risk tolerance than a single 30-year-old executive, who generally has a longer time frame to make up for any losses she may incur on her portfolio.
风险容忍度:投资者对于投资组合价值负面变化方面的不明朗因素的可接受程度
Itemize  vt. 分条列述;详细列举; 详列
articulate  v. 使字句明晰地发出音来, 明确表达, 咬清音节发音;明确有力地表达; 清晰地发; 使成为系统的整体; 清楚地讲话; 用关节连接起来; 清晰地发音; 接合; 能说会道的; 口齿清晰[伶俐]的
capital appreciation  资本增值
capital preservation  资本保护/保持
makeup 　n.  天性; 补充; 化妆品
current income  本期收入　经常收入　本期收益
Current Income
The investment objective for a moderately conservative portfolio of securities or mutual funds that provides high dividend and annuity payments to satisfy an investor's steady income requirements.
Investopedia Says:
Current income portfolios are often created for individuals in their retirement years because steady income is needed for living expenses. Income garnered from a current income fund is derived from bond interest payments, dividends and annuity payments.
A current income portfolio is moderately conservative, as it often contains a large percentage of fixed-income securities, in addition to other assets such as blue-chip stocks and annuities. A current income portfolio can also include mutual funds within the same asset categories and strategies, such as a government bond fund and a dividend fund.
Total Return　　总回报　　总收益
When measuring performance, the actual rate of return of an investment or a pool of investments over a given evaluation period. Total return includes interest, capital gains, dividends and distributions realized over a given period of time.
Investopedia Says:
Total return accounts for two categories of return: income and capital appreciation. Income includes interest paid by fixed-income investments, distributions or dividends. Capital appreciation represents the change in the market price of an asset.
Investment Horizon　　投资期限
The total length of time that an investor will expect to hold any particular security or portfolio. The investment horizon is used to determine the income needs and desired risk exposure of the investor, which is then used to aid in security selection.
Investopedia Says:
As investment horizons increase in length, equities represent a higher risk-adjusted return than fixed-income securities and cash. Across shorter investment horizons, equities become the riskier asset class because they carry higher levels of volatility. 
For example, a young professional with a 401(k) plan should be mostly invested in equities because this person's time horizon could be 30 years or more. For someone nearing retirement, however, preservation of capital becomes much more important, so fixed-income investments become more attractive.   
Some trading strategies, especially those based on technical analysis, can employ investment horizons of days, hours or even minutes.
Marginal Tax Rate	边际税率
The amount of tax paid on an additional dollar of income. As income rises, so does the tax rate.
Investopedia Says:
Many believe this discourages business investment by removing the incentive to work harder.
多赚1元需要支付的额外税款。税率会随着收入增加而提高
indefinitely  无期限地 不确定地 模糊地
Tax Deferred
Refers to investment earnings such as interest, dividends or capital gains that accumulate free from taxation until the investor withdraws and takes possession of them. The most common types of tax-deferred investments include those in individual retirement accounts (IRAs) and deferred annuities.
Investopedia Says:
By deferring taxes on the returns of an investment, the investor benefits in two ways. The first benefit is tax-free growth: instead of paying tax on the returns of an investment, tax is paid only at a later date, leaving the investment to grow unhindered. The second benefit of tax deferral is that investments are usually made when a person is earning higher income and is taxed at a higher tax rate. Withdrawals are made from an investment account when a person is earning little or no income and is taxed at a lower rate.  
Socially  ad.1. 在社交方面;善于交际地 2. 在社会(地位)上;在全社会中
conscious  adj  knowing what is going on around one because one is able to use bodily senses and mental powers; awake 感觉到的; 意识到的; 清醒的:  ~ of sth/that... aware; noticing 知道的; 察觉的; 注意到的 (of actions, feelings, etc) realized by oneself; intentional （指行为、感情等）自觉的; 蓄意的:  being particularly aware of and interested in the thing mentioned 对所提到的事物具有深刻认识和浓厚兴趣的
catch-all  包罗万象、总括
neatly　　ad.1. 整洁地,干净地2. 灵巧地,利索地3. 恰好地,极好地
fit into  vt. 适应(符合)
in real terms  扣除物价因素 （内）；按实值计算 （港）
bracket  n.收入额的等级  纳税人按其收入的分类(如等级、阶层、段、档等) [pl. ]括号({ }, (), [])
inclusion  包含, 含括 with inclusion of  同时包括, 同时需要考虑
cannibalization  n.  为修配而拆下旧设备部件
cannibalisation  n.  使用旧机器零件来更换其他机器零件 (也作 cannibalization)
homeowner  n.  房东; 自己拥有房子者
convex  [?k?n?veks]adj.(中)凸的,凸圆［面，出］的n.1. 凸状，凸面，凸圆体2. 钢卷尺
onerous  [??n?r?s]adj.1. 繁重的;艰巨的; 麻烦的2. 【律】负有法律义务的
portray  [p?:'trei]  v. 描写,描写...的肖像,逼真地描写
bulge  [b?ld?]n.  胀, 膨胀v.  使膨胀, 使凸起; 膨胀, 凸起; 装满
暂时上涨 （内&港）；暂时暴涨；急骤上涨 （内）
tangent | 't?nd??nt]n.  切线, 正切adj.  接触的, 相切的, 切线的
capital market line  资本市场线，资金市场线,证券投资风险及回收率关系表；资本市场贝塔风险线
kink  [k??k]n.  纽结, 颈, 蜷缩v.  扭结; 使扭结
heterogeneous  [?het?r?u?d?i?ni?s]adj.1. 异种的, 异源的, 异类的2. 异质的, 不 纯的3. 【数】非齐次(性)的, 参差的, 不纯一的4. 【化】不均匀的, 多相的5. 多色的; 多能的6. 数量上不相称的7. 有不同性质和意义的
divergence  n.分歧/分散　偏离　散度（数学用语）
Seasoned Issue　　增发
An issue of securities from an established company whose existing shares have exhibited stable price movements and substantial trading volume over time, thereby earning a good reputation. This is also known as a "seasoned equity offering" (SEO).
Investopedia Says:
These types of stocks have high liquidity within the secondary market. 
best effort selling  n.竭力推销
best effort selling agreements  n.证券全力推销协议
best efforts offerings  n.尽力推销证券
call market  短期同行拆借市场,短期拆放市场
Call Market　　集合竞价
A type of market in which each transaction takes place at predetermined intervals and where all of the bid and ask orders are aggregated and transacted at once. The exchange determines the market clearing price based on the number of bid and ask orders. A call market is contrasted to an auction market, where orders are filled as soon as a buyer/seller is found for any given order at an agreed upon price.
Investopedia Says:
In a call market, the price is set by the exchange so the market will clear, or almost clear, every time orders are filled. This is in stark （adj.硬的,完全的,十分明显的,荒凉的;adv.完全,简直）contrast to the auction market, where prices are determined by buyers and sellers. 
Because the call market groups transactions together, there is a substantial increase in liquidity. Although liquidity is generally considered to be a good quality in any marketplace, sellers may lose some of the liquidity premium, which is can be substantial.
是指在指定时间交易单个股票的市场。在同一时间所有的叫买价和叫卖价都被撮合，由市场管理者定单一价格，该价格可能将当日市场出清。
clientele  n.  (医师、律师等)顾客； 常客； (集合称)随从， 门徒， 追随者　委托人
Market Maker　　股票经纪人; 证券交易公司
A broker-dealer firm that accepts the risk of holding a certain number of shares of a particular security in order to facilitate trading in that security. Each market maker competes for customer order flow by displaying buy and sell quotations for a guaranteed number of shares. Once an order is received, the market maker immediately sells from its own inventory or seeks an offsetting order. This process takes place in mere seconds.
Investopedia Says:
The Nasdaq is the prime example of an operation of market makers. There are more than 500 member firms that act as Nasdaq market makers, keeping the financial markets running efficiently because they are willing to quote both bid and offer prices for an asset.
market maker  市场作价者；市场“庄家”； 庄家；市场制造者 （内&港）；做市商；主力大户 （内）；市场作价者 （港）
Dealer Market
A market where dealers are assigned for specific securities. The dealers create liquid markets by purchasing and selling against personal inventory.
Investopedia Says:
Unlike auction markets, the benefit of this type of market is the rapid access that investors have to buyers and sellers of a particular security. The best example of a dealer market is the Nasdaq.
交易商市场：交易者专门从事为自己的帐户买卖特定资产的市场，例如OTC市场。
Specialist
A member of an exchange who acts as the market maker to facilitate the trading of a given stock. The specialist holds an inventory of the stock, posts the bid and ask prices, manages limit orders and executes trades. Specialists are also responsible for managing large movements by trading out of their own inventory. If there is a large shift in demand on the buy or sell side, the specialist will step in and sell out of their inventory to meet the demand until the gap has been narrowed.
Investopedia Says:
There is usually one specialist per stock who stands ready to step in and buy or sell as many shares as needed to ensure a fair and orderly market in that security.
专营经纪人/特殊交易者：指拥有某些股票、在证券交易所场内进行买卖的专业人士。专营经纪人负责管理有限交易，但不会提供有关其他交易商有限订单的信息
commission broker  经纪人,掮客,佣金经纪人　佣金券商
floor broker  场内经纪商；场内经纪人；交易所经纪人 （内）；出市经纪 （港）
freelance　n.1. (不受雇于人的)自由作家(或演员等)vi.1. 当自由作家(或演员等)a.1. 自由作家(或演员等)的;独立的ad.1. 作为自由作家(或演员等);独立地
best price  n.最优/佳价格
good till cancelled  n.未取消前仍有校　注销前有效
是指商品买卖的报价或客户给予投资经纪人的证券买卖委托，指令在成交或未撤销前继续有效。
Uptick　【商】(股票)报升(成交价格比上一个交易高的成交或价格)
A transaction occurring at a price above the previous transaction. In order for an uptick to occur, a transaction price must be followed by an increased transaction price. This term is commonly used in reference to stocks, but it can also be extended to commodities and other securities.
Investopedia Says:
For example, suppose stock ABC previously traded at $10. If its next trade occurred at a price above $10, ABC would be on an uptick.
Uptick Rule
A former rule established by the SEC that requires that every short sale transaction be entered at a price that is higher than the price of the previous trade. This rule was introduced in the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 as Rule 10a-1. The uptick rule prevents short sellers from adding to the downward momentum when the price of an asset is already experiencing sharp declines. The SEC eliminated the rule on July 6, 2007.
The uptick rule was also be known as the "plus tick rule". 
Investopedia Says:
By entering a short sale order with a price above the current bid, a short seller ensures that his or her order is filled on an uptick. The uptick rule is disregarded when trading some types of financial instruments such as futures, single stock futures, currencies or market ETFs such as the QQQQ or SPDRs. These instruments can be shorted on a downtick because they are highly liquid and have enough buyers willing to enter into a long position, ensuring that the price will rarely be driven to unjustifiably low levels. 
Related Terms:
指美国法律中只有在证券上涨过程中卖空者才能进行卖空交易的这样一种规定，目的在于维持市场的稳定。
call money rate  n.活期贷款利率
Prime Rate  最优惠利率/最低贷款利率：商业银行向最重要或信用质素最佳的客户，一般是大型机构，收取的利率
margin requirement  　应付保证金；保证金要求/规定
margin call  追缴保证金通知；追补按金通知
A broker's demand on an investor using margin to deposit additional money or securities so that the margin account is brought up to the minimum maintenance margin. 
This is sometimes called a "fed call" or "maintenance call".
Investopedia Says:
You would receive a margin call from a broker if one or more of the securities you had bought (with borrowed money) decreased in value past a certain point. You would be forced either to deposit more money in the account or to sell off some of your assets. 
margin purchase  n.保证金购进/买
short sale　 (证券、商品等的)卖空
Market Capitalization  市场资本值；市值
Sinking Fund
A means of repaying funds that were borrowed through a bond issue. The issuer makes periodic payments to a trustee who retires part of the issue by purchasing the bonds in the open market.
Investopedia Says:
Rather than the issuer repaying the entire principal of a bond issue on the maturity date,  another company buys back a portion of the issue annually and usually at a fixed par value or at the current market value of the bonds, whichever is less. Should interest rates decline following a bond issue, sinking-fund provisions allow a firm to lessen the interest rate risk of its bonds as it essentially replaces a portion of existing debt with lower-yielding bonds.
From the investor's point of view, a sinking fund adds safety to a corporate bond issue: with it, the issuing company is less likely to default on the repayment of the remaining principal upon maturity since the amount of the final repayment is substantially less. This added safety affects the interest rate at which the company is able to offer bonds in the marketplace.
偿债基金：偿付来自债券发行资金的方法。发行人定期向一个信托人支付款项，然后信托人通过在公开市场买入债券而赎回部分债券
sinking fund  
偿债基金：一种偿债安排，允许债券发行人提前购回一定比率的债券，购回的方式可以是公开市场上，也可以是按照偿债基金条款所约定的赎回价格购回。
autocorrelation test  自相关检验
是一种对有效市场假设的检验，是将期间内证券价格变化与可预测相关形态进行的比较。
Filter Rule　过滤规则　筛选规则
Rules that attempt to guide investors towards buying and selling patterns that will be the most profitable.
Investopedia Says:
Filter rules are created from analyzing the historical price trends of a security. 
Evidence has suggested that filter rules are rarely successful in creating profits for the investor.
Average Down　以低于平均价格买进
The process of buying additional shares in a company at lower prices than you originally purchased. This brings the average price you've paid for all your shares down.
Investopedia Says:
Sometimes this is a good strategy, other times it's better to sell off a beaten down stock rather than buying more shares.
compelling  [k?m?peli?]adj.1. 驱使人的2. 引人注目的； 令人佩服的
innate  [?ineit]adj.1. 天生的, 固有的, 天赋的2. 遗传的
conundrum  [k??n?ndr?m]n.  谜， 猜不透的难题； (含诙谐或双关语意的)谜语
solace  [?s?l?s]n.安慰The invalid found  solace in music.那病人从音乐中得到安慰。
vt.1. 安慰2. 缓和, 减轻(悲痛等)3. 使高兴
mitigate  [mit?i?gate |　v.  镇静, 减轻, 缓和; 缓和下来; 减轻
purport  n.  意义, 大要, 要旨v.  意味着, 声称, 做为...要旨
ethnic　 adj　1民族的; 种族的; 部落的　2某文化群体的（典型的）
genetic　 a.1. 起源的,发生的2. 【生】基因的;遗传(学)的
catalog sale  　按商品目录零售
health care industry　医疗保健行业
viability  健全性；稳健性；财政上可行性
Defensive Company 稳定性/防御性公司
A company whose sales and earnings remain relatively stable during both economic upturns and downturns.
Investopedia Says:
Companies within the utilities industry, such as water and electricity companies, are defensive companies since their goods and services have inelastic demand. 
The stock of defensive companies is often classified as defensive stock.
promise  n.字据,诺言,契约　预兆, 预示
Outsourcing
A practice used by different companies to reduce costs by transferring portions of work to outside suppliers rather than completing it internally.
Investopedia Says:
Outsourcing is an effective cost-saving strategy when used properly. It is sometimes more affordable to purchase a good from companies with comparative advantages than it is to produce the good internally. An example of a manufacturing company outsourcing would be Dell buying some of its computer components from another manufacturer in order to save on production costs. Alternatively, businesses may decide to outsource book-keeping duties to independent accounting firms, as it may be cheaper than retaining an in-house accountant.
外包：指将部分工序转交外部供应商，不在公司内进行，从而减低成本的措
Liquidating Dividend  清算股利
Payment by a firm to its owners from capital rather than from earnings.
Investopedia Says:
This isn't really a good thing. It would be preferable to have dividends come from earnings.
liquidating dividends  n.还本股息;n.清算分摊额
或：清偿性股利：可冲减资本的红利
Tattoo  n (pl ~s) 1归营鼓; 归营号2归营游行（配有军乐的表演3敲鼓; 轻击; 连续有节奏的敲击声4叫声, 叫喊, 大喊   v 给（某人的皮肤）刺染图案
Gordon Growth Model  戈登增长模型
A model for determining the intrinsic value of a stock, based on a future series of dividends that grow at a constant rate. Given a dividend per share that is payable in one year, and the assumption that the dividend grows at a constant rate in perpetuity, the model solves for the present value of the infinite series of future dividends. 
 
Where: 
D = Expected dividend per share one year from now
k = Required rate of return for equity investor
G = Growth rate in dividends (in perpetuity)
Business Cycle  商业周期；经济周期；商业循环
The recurring and fluctuating levels of economic activity that an economy experiences over a long period of time. The five stages of the business cycle are growth (expansion), peak, recession (contraction), trough and recovery. At one time, business cycles were thought to be extremely regular, with predictable durations, but today they are widely believed to be irregular, varying in frequency, magnitude and duration.
Plowback  利润再投资;利润再投资额=ploughback  n. 利润再投资(额)
Plow=plough 美 n/v1.犁, 2. 似犁的工具;除雪机,铲雪机3. (大写)北斗七星[the S]4投资
allow for  考虑到
resort 　n.  休闲度假之处; 名胜; 诉诸, 依靠, 凭借v.  诉诸, 求助, 凭借; 经常去
without resort  无计可施resort to  1. 常去2. 采用, 使用(手段); 诉诸(法律)
institute　n 1研究所，学院，协会 ,2 (公认的)基本原则; 基本原理3[pl. ]法理概要; 初级法律读本 v 1建立, 设立, 制定（习俗p 规则等）;2 开始, 着手（调查等）3以正式仪式授予（某人, 尤指牧师）新职位.
pros and cons  正反双方 正面与反面
市净率（Price to book ratio即P/B），也称市账率 指的是每股股价与每股净资产的比率。
transitory  ['tr?nsit?ri]  a. 暂时的(瞬息的,短暂的,片刻的)
discretion  酌情权；酌情决定权 （内&港）；全权管理权；自行决定权；变通权 （内）
Trailing  当前的、历史的
A term used to describe the most recent time period.  
Investopedia Says:
Most often you will hear the term "trailing 12 months", and, from time to time, "trailing three months" or "trailing six months". The term may also modify a reported metric. For example, the earnings in a trailing price-to-earnings ratio refers to the past earnings per share over a certain period - usually 12 months. Trailing 12 months is denoted by the acronym "TTM".     adj.  拖尾的, 曳尾的, 被拖动的, 蔓延的
Acronym   n.  只取首字母的缩写词; 缩写字
当前市盈率（trailing P/E或current P/E），根据公司在过去四个季度（十二个月）的每股收益计算得出 
预期市盈率（leading P/E，forward P/E或 prospective P/E），按照分析师对公司未来十二个月 内的每股收益的估计计算得出
Intraday  a. 当天的,一天内的 盘中
Another way of saying "within the day". Intraday price movements are particularly important to short-term traders looking to make many trades over the course of a single trading session. The term intraday is occasionally used to describe securities that trade on the markets during regular business hours, such as stocks and ETFs, as opposed to mutual funds, which must be bought from a dealer.
Investopedia Says:
This term is often used to refer to the new highs and lows of a security. For example, "a new intraday high" means a security reached a new high relative to all other prices during a trading session. In some cases, an intraday high can be equal to the closing price. Traders pay close attention to intraday price movement by using real-time charts in an attempt to benefit from the short-term price fluctuations.
Bill And Hold
A form of sales arrangement in which a seller of a good bills a customer for products but does not ship the product until a later date. In order for a transfer of ownership to occur, certain conditions must be met. These conditions include: payment for the goods, that the goods be segregated from all other similar goods by the seller, and that the goods be finished and ready for use.
This is also referred to as "bill in place".
Investopedia Says:
The bill and hold arrangement may be beneficial for the parties involved, but great care must be taken by both parties to ensure that all of the criteria are met. If the arrangement does not meet all of the stated criteria, there will be no transfer of ownership. This means that revenue can't be recognized by the seller, and no assets or inventory can be recorded by the buyer related to this transaction.
There have been many scandals surrounding a bill and hold arrangement, and care must be taken when analyzing this type of arrangement.
  
Bill-And-Hold Basis
A method of conducting sales by billing the customer on the same day the transaction occurs, but not delivering the goods until a later date. Using the bill-and-hold basis is sometimes regarded as a controversial practice because allowing the seller to receive payment now, but making them wait a length of time before transferring the product could be used to inflate revenues meant for subsequent quarters.
Investopedia Says:
The bill-and-hold basis is one method of revenue recognition. According to the Securities and Exchange Commission, it is the buyer's responsibility to request that a transaction be on a bill-and-hold basis and must have substantial business purposes in doing so. In addition to those criteria, any goods sold under this basis must be finished goods at the time of sale and not be available to fulfill any other orders.
In 1998, Sunbeam CEO, Al Dunlap used a bill-and-hold strategy in order to make Sunbean's financial performance better than it really was by artificially inflating Sun Beam's revenue by 18%. Eventually, Dunlap was relieved of his station as the board of directors realized that he did not do anything to materially improve the company's financial situation
延时交付：售出商品直至某后再进行交付
speed up  
n.加速,追赶


=========================
volum5
=========================
Indenture
A contract between an issuer of bonds and the bondholder stating the time period before repayment, amount of interest paid, if the bond is convertible (and if so, at what price or what ratio), if the bond is callable and the amount of money that is to be repaid.
Investopedia Says:
The indenture is another name for the bond contract terms, which are also referred to as a deed of trust.
契约:债券发行人与债券持有人之间的合约，列明偿还年期、支付利率、可否转换（如可转换，转换的价格及比率），以及偿还资金的金额
callable  adj.可赎回的, 可随时支付的(如贷款),见通知即兑付(证券或贷款)
variant adj.1. 不同的; 差别的; 变异的2. 易变的, 不定的; 各种各样的 n. 变种 变量/式
Covenant  保证条款/契约:债券协议中的条文，承诺将会或不会进行某些行动
A promise in an indenture, or any other formal debt agreement, that certain activities will or will not be carried out.
Investopedia Says:
The purpose of a covenant is to give the lender more security. Covenants can cover everything from minimum dividend payments to levels that must be maintained in working capital.
straight bond  纯粹债券；直接债券（内）；传统债券；普通债券（港）；标准债券
option free bond  无期权债券
指不附任何嵌入选择权的债券，其价格与收益率不是线性关系，而是具有一定凸度的曲线关系，即不含期权债券的价格上升的速度比下降的速度快
Treasury Bond ＝T-Bond（长期） 国库券/国库债券
期限10年以上的可买卖定息美国政府债务证券
Treasury Note  政府票据  中期国库券
期限1至10年的可买卖定息美国政府债务证券
Treasury Bill  短期国库券
美国政府发行的债务证券，期限少于一年。短期国库券通过竞标过程发售，价格相对面值有折扣，所以不会像大部分其他债券一般支付定额利息
Coupon  息票：债券在发行时确定的利率，息票一般每半年支付一次
票息；券息 ：[债市]发行人承诺会按面值年率计算，向债券持有人支付直至到期日的债券利息。举例：假如债券的票息为10%，每年便按面值100元支付10元的利息，一般是分期每6个月(半年) 或3个月(每季) 派息一次。
Treasury Note 
A marketable U.S. government debt security with a fixed interest rate and a maturity between one and 10 years. Treasury notes can be bought either directly from the U.S. government or through a bank. 
When buying Treasury notes from the government, you can either put in a competitive or noncompetitive bid. With a competitive bid, you specify the yield you want; however, this does not mean that your bid will be approved. With a noncompetitive bid, you accept whatever yield is determined at auction
currency denomination  货币面值
step up notes 利率上浮债券：指一种票面利率随着时间推移会逐步上浮的债券，它包括单阶利率上浮债券、多阶利率上浮债券
Accrual Bond　　增值债券：将债券的利息累计计入本金中而不是直接支付，只有到期时才一并偿还的一种债券
A bond that does not pay periodic interest payments. Instead, interest is added to the principal balance of the bond and is either paid at maturity or, at some point, the bond begins to pay both principal and interest based on the accrued principal and interest to that point. 
lump sum  一次付款额; 总金额
coupon rate  票面利率,息票利率
floater  浮息债务工具；浮动利率票据 （内&港）；浮息证 （港）
A bond or other type of debt whose coupon rate changes with market conditions (short-term interest rates). Also known as "floating-rate debt".
Investopedia Says:
For example, a floater bond may have the coupon rate set at "T-bill rate plus 0.5%". 
This type of instrument is more beneficial to the holder as interest rates are rising because it allows the holder to participate in the upward movement in rates. Conversely a floater is less advantageous to the holder when rates are decreasing because the rate at which they are receiving interest is declining. 
London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR) 伦敦银行同业拆放利率
An interest rate at which banks can borrow funds, in marketable size, from other banks in the London interbank market. The LIBOR is fixed on a daily basis by the British Bankers' Association. The LIBOR is derived from a filtered average of the world's most creditworthy banks' interbank deposit rates for larger loans with maturities between overnight and one full year.
Investopedia Says:
The LIBOR is the world's most widely used benchmark for short-term interest rates. It's important because it is the rate at which the world's most preferred borrowers are able to borrow money. It is also the rate upon which rates for less preferred borrowers are based. For example, a multinational corporation with a very good credit rating may be able to borrow money for one year at LIBOR plus four or five points. 
Countries that rely on the LIBOR for a reference rate include the United States, Canada, Switzerland and the U.K.
margin  保证金；“I　zī展”；毛利；差价　　毛利，边际，定金
Inflation-Indexed Security　通货膨胀指数债券
A security that guarantees a return higher than the rate of inflation if it is held to maturity.
Investopedia Says:
In other words, an inflation-indexed security guarantees a real return. These usually come in the form of a bond or note
full price  　十足价格　足价　
clean price  净价 （内&港）；纯价格 （内）
agreed upon price  n.商定价格
cum coupon  附息股票,附有息单,附有息票,附息票券
cum  [k?m]pref.  连同; 附带　a. 和(附有)
ex-coupon  无息票 （内&港）；不附息票 （内）
Dirty Price　　脏价/全价　　[债市]指债券包括应计利息的现金流现值
A bond pricing quote referring to the price of a coupon bond that includes the present value of all future cash flows, including interest accruing on the next coupon payment. The dirty price is how the bond is quoted in most European markets, and is the price an investor will pay to acquire the bond. 
foreign exchange [forex]  外汇　由 foreign 和 exchange 拼缀而成
flat  n.无息的,平的,统售价格
1. A price that is neither rising nor declining.
2. In forex, the condition of being neither long nor short in a particular currency. Also referred to as 'being square'.
3. A bond that is trading without accrued interest.
Investopedia Says:
1. If a stock over the last month has been trading around $30, it can be thought of as trading flat.
2. If you had no positions in the U.S. dollar or your long and short positions canceled each other out, you would be flat or have a flat book.
3. A bond is trading flat if the buyer of the bond is not responsible for paying the interest that has accrued since the last payment (accrued interest is usually part of the bond purchase price). Bonds that are in default trade flat.
Redemption　　赎回：向投资者退还证券例如股票、债券或共同基金的本金
The return of an investor's principal in a security, such as a stock, bond, or mutual fund.
Investopedia Says:
Redemption of mutual fund shares from a mutual fund company must occur within seven days of receiving a request for redemption from the investor.
retirement  ①退役,报废②退股,还本③退休
Bullet Bond　期末一次性偿还债券：定期支付息票的债务工具，在到期日一次性偿还本金
A noncallable（callable  n.可提前赎回的，可随时支取的） regular coupon paying debt instrument with a single repayment of principal on the maturity date.
Investopedia Says:
Sometimes referred to as a virgin bond.
virgin n.  处女, 处男adj.  处女的,童贞的；原始的，纯洁的,
bullet maturity  一次还本贷款
Put　　出售权1. 一种期权合约，给与持有人以特定的价格在特定的时间内出售特定数量相关证券的权力（但并非义务）2. 行使出售期权的行动
An option contract giving the owner the right, but not the obligation, to sell a specified amount of an underlying asset at a set price within a specified time. The buyer of a put option estimates that the underlying asset will drop below the exercise price before the expiration date.
Puttable　bond 可退还债券　
　　是指持有人有权在预定时间以预定的价格将债券卖回债券发行人的债券
Puttable　可卖回的　指债券持有人有权在债券到期前的某一约定时点将债券卖还给发行人，这种债券称为可卖回债券(put bond)。债券卖回的价格在发行时已约定，可以是债券的面值，亦可以高于或低于面值
Callable　可提前赎回的
可提前赎回的债券(callable bond)给予发行人在债券期满前按约定条件赎回债券的权利。发行人通常会在票面利率高于市场利率时选择行使提前赎回权。 一般来说，可提前赎回的债券通常附带对持有人的保护条款(call protection)，注明发行人在某段时间内不能提前赎回。英文亦称为redeemable bond（可赎回债券）。
Prepayment　预付　提前偿付
1. The payment of a debt obligation prior to its due date.
2. The excess payment over a scheduled debt repayment amount
1. 在到期日前偿付债务
2. 还款高于预定偿还金额的部分
surrender  n 交出，投降, 放弃；退回；退回书；退保
v.  交出, 使投降, 放弃; 投降; 自首
quit  n.离开,解除,免除
Call Protection　提前赎回保护条款：是指确保债券在某一日期之前不会被赎回的条款
A protective provision of a callable security prohibiting the issuer from calling back the security for a period early in its life.
Investopedia Says:
The call protection is advantageous to investors because it prevents the issuer from forcing redemption early on in the life of a security. This means that investors will have a minimum number or years, regardless of how poor the market becomes, to reap the benefits of the security. 
The period for which the bond is protected  is known as the "deferment period" or the "cushion".
reap [r??p]　v.  收割, 获得, 收获; 收割; 遭到报应; 收获; 得到报偿
cushion 　缓冲；缓冲时限〔债券〕
　　　　　n.  垫子; 靠垫; 坐垫; 垫状物v.  加垫褥, 掩盖, 缓冲
deferment　延期;推迟
redeem 　v. 赎回,挽回,履行
refund  退款 （内&港）；偿还债务；重筹资/再融资（内）；退还税款 （港）
delivery  交付/收,交货,交割
lottery 　 n.1. 奖券,彩票;摸彩,抽签[C]2. 运气,难算计的事[S]
Life is a lottery.人生全靠运气。
selection method  选择法　择伐作业
Divestiture
The partial or full disposal of an investment or asset through sale,exchange,closure or bankruptcy. Divestiture can be done slowly and systematically over a long period of time, or in large lots over a short time period.
分拆、出售资产  指出售子公司
财产、权利等的剥夺, 母公司出售或回收子公司股权与之脱离关系
Divest  vt.1. 剥除;使脱去;剥夺2. 迫使放弃 解除―出售或撤销一项投资
Antitrust  反垄断 反托拉斯
The antitrust laws apply to virtually (adv.事实上, 实质上)all industries and to every level of business, including manufacturing, transportation, distribution, and marketing. They prohibit a variety of practices that restrain trade.
Investopedia Says:
Examples of illegal practices are price-fixing conspiracies(密谋策划，合谋), corporate mergers likely to reduce the competitive vigor of particular markets, and predatory掠夺性的 acts designed to achieve or maintain monopoly power. 
Microsoft, ATT, and J.D. Rockefeller Oil are companies who have been convicted of antitrust practices.
eminent domain  n.国家征用权
The power the government has to obtain the property of an individual even without the person's full consent. In most countries, including the U.S., the land owner will be compensated for the land at fair market value. This power allows the government to seize land to be used in public enterprises such as roads, schools, or utilities installations. Eminent domain is generally found in some form in most common law nations.
Also known as "compulsory purchase" (U.K, New Zealand and Ireland), "expropriation" (Canada) and "compulsory acquisition" (Australia).
Expropriation  n.没收,征用
The act of removing property from an owner.
eminent  adj1（指人）着名的,杰出的,卓越的2（指品质p特性）明显的;显着的; 突出的
eminently adv obviously; outstandingly 明显地; 显着地; 突出地:
freeway  n.  高速公路
Embedded option  
嵌入期权；内嵌期权；隐含期权
是指与其他金融工具复合在一起的期权
An option that is an inseparable part of another instrument. Compare this to a normal (or bare) option, which trades separately from the underlying security.
Investopedia Says:
A common embedded option is the call provision in most corporate bonds.
为其他金融工具不可分割部分的期权安排，与此相反的是与相关证券分开买卖的一般（或单纯）期权
一种内嵌在债务工具中，影响其本金偿还的期权（通常为利率期权）。内嵌期权的例子包括房产抵押贷款证券以及可赎回和可回售债券。内嵌期权并非一定是利率期权；一些内嵌期权与股市指数或商品的价格相联系
Sinking Fund
A means of repaying funds that were borrowed through a bond issue. The issuer makes periodic payments to a trustee who retires part of the issue by purchasing the bonds in the open market.
Investopedia Says:
Rather than the issuer repaying the entire principal of a bond issue on the maturity date,  another company buys back a portion of the issue annually and usually at a fixed par value or at the current market value of the bonds, whichever is less. Should interest rates decline following a bond issue, sinking-fund provisions allow a firm to lessen the interest rate risk of its bonds as it essentially replaces a portion of existing debt with lower-yielding bonds.
From the investor's point of view, a sinking fund adds safety to a corporate bond issue: with it, the issuing company is less likely to default on the repayment of the remaining principal upon maturity since the amount of the final repayment is substantially less. This added safety affects the interest rate at which the company is able to offer bonds in the marketplace
偿债基金:偿付来自债券发行资金的方法。发行人定期向一个信托人支付款项，然后信托人通过在公开市场买入债券而赎回部分债券
Repurchase Agreement (Repo)  回购协议
A form of short-term borrowing for dealers in government securities. The dealer sells the government securities to investors, usually on an overnight basis, and buys them back the following day. 
For the party selling the security (and agreeing to repurchase it in the future) it is a repo; for the party on the other end of the transaction, (buying the security and agreeing to sell in the future) it is a reverse repurchase agreement.
Investopedia Says:
Repos are classified as a money-market instrument. They are usually used to raise short-term capital.
account for  说明; 对...负有责任; 证明
margin buying　【解释】：交保证金的买空
保证金交易(Margin buying) 
保证金交易其实很容易明白，简单来说就是你向经纪借钱购买股票，以买入更多股票。
你首先需要开立一个保证金户口(margin account)，才能进行保证金交易。这与利用户口内现金进行买卖的普通现金账户不同。保证金户口需要有一笔基本资金，称之为最低保证金 (minimum margin)。户口一旦开立并启用，你就可以借入最高相当于股票买入价50%的资金。购买金额中，你存入的部分称为基本保证金(initial margin)。请紧记，你无须一定要用尽50%的借贷额 ── 你可选择10%、25%，这完全是你自己的决定。另外，请留意某些经纪会要求你存入高于购买金额50%以上的资金。
要维持保证金户口正常运作，有两项基本义务你必须履行。首先，透过保证金户口沽售股票时，款项必须存入经纪的户口，以支付借贷款项，直至全数清还为止。其次，还有称为维持保证金(maintenance margin)的限制，为了保持户口的最低结余，经纪会要求你存入更多现金款项，或沽售股票以支付借贷款项，这种行动称之为补仓(margin call)。
由于你借入了资金，因此将需要支付利息。若不是选择另行支付，利息将会由你的户口中扣除。随着时间的增长，你的债务将因利息不断增加，你持有的时间越长，就需要获得更大的利润，以补偿借入债务利息而达至收支平衡，所以保证金交易通常用作短线的投资。另外，并非所有的股票，都可以进行保证金交易，投资前，最好先清楚了解保证金户口的规定及限制。 
购买力的例子
假设你在保证金户口存入$10,000元，而你选择了相当于购买金额50%的借贷额时，你便因而拥有了$20,000元的购买力。若你购买价值$5000 元的股票，则剩余的购买力为$15000元，但由于你仍有足够现金支付这项买卖，所以实际上并没有借入任何资金；唯有当你购买的股票价值超过$10000 元时，才算开始借入资金。 
补仓
若你的户口结余(股票价值减去你对经纪的借贷)跌至低于维持保证金的水平，经纪便会发出补仓通知，要求投资者透过售套现或在户口中存入更多资金。
若你因任何原因而没有补仓，经纪将有权出售你的股票，令到你的户口结余增加至维持保证金水平以上。大部份的保证金协议条款，经纪行均可无须等待你补仓，便自行作出沽售股票的行动，你甚至无法指示经纪行出售哪一只股票。
因此，你必须仔细阅读及了解保证金户口的条款及细则，包括如何计算利息、支付借贷的责任及你所买入的股票如何用作支付借贷等。 
保证金交易的优点
投资者进行保证金交易，主要是因其杠杆作用(leverage)，将股票的升幅放大。若果投资正确，保证金可显着提升你的利润。
50%的保证金可让你以同样的资金，购买多一倍的股票。显而易见，保证金户口比纯普通现金账户获取更高利润，问题的关键是股价能否上升。若股价上升，保证金能让你获得更大的利润。 
保证金交易的风险
杠杆式买卖能将利润放大，同样也会将损失放大。其中一种对风险的界定是资产价格的摆幅如何。在这种界定下，杠杆式买卖由于其放大价格摆幅的特性，因而令股票投资的风险同样放大。
保证金交易是唯一可以令损失超过投入资金的股票投资。若股票跌幅超过50%或以上，你的损失除了超过100%外，还要支付利息及佣金。
quoted margin　报价边际
The quoted margin is the additional amount that the issuer agrees to pay above the reference rate. It is a constant value and can be positive or negative. It is often quoted in basis points. 
coupon rate = reference rate + quoted margin 
Examples of reference rates are LIBOR, U/S. Treasury yields. 
The coupon rate is determined at the coupon reset date but paid at the next coupon date.
Basis Point（bp）基点
用于金融方面，债券和票据利率改变量的度量单位。一个基点等于1个百分点的1%，即0.01%，1 basis point=1%/100。因此，100个基点等于1%。
　　如：
　　一浮动利率债券的利率可能比LIBOR高10个基点，100个基点相当于1%，该债券的利率可能比普遍使用的LIBOR利率高0.1%。
　　[例]
当美联储宣布将利率下调50个基点时，也就等于下降了0.5个百分点。
Strike Price　
The price at which  a specific derivative contract can be exercised. Strike prices is mostly used to describe stock and index options, in which strike prices are fixed in the contract. For call options, the strike price is where the security can be bought (up to the expiration date), while for put options the strike price is the price at which shares can be sold. 
The difference between the underlying security's current market price and the option's strike price represents the amount of profit per share gained upon the exercise or the sale of the option. This is true for options that are in the money; the maximum amount that can be lost is the premium paid.
Also known as the "exercise price".
行使价格/行权价格：指期权持有人在行使期权合约时可以买入（买入期权）或卖出（出售期权）相关股票的每股价格
Investopedia Says:
Strike prices are one of the key determinants of the premium, which represents the market value of an options contract. Other determinants include the time until expiration, the volatility of the underlying security and prevailing interest rates. Strike prices are established when a contract is first written. Most strike prices are in increments of $2.50 and $5.
行权价Exercise price, strike price (网来)
根据合约在行权时买入或卖出期货、期权、权证等衍生金融产品标的证券（正股）的价格.
行权价是决定期货、期权和权证等金融工具价值及获利空间的关键。行权价和正股市场价格的差距构成了投资期权、权证等的利润，差距越大，利润越大。例如一份认购权证的正股在行权时的价格是10元，行权价是6元，也就是是说在权证到期时投资者可以用6元购买价值10元的股票，获得4元的差价利润。通常行权价格固定不变，但会考虑除权、除息等因素，一些复杂的衍生工具行权价也有根据正股价格波动或其他因素而变动的情况。
Duration  (come from internet) 存续期
存续期是债券价格对利率变动敏感度的指标，亦可视为投资人收回其债券投资的资金所需时间的一个指标。 存续期越长，债券价格对利率的变动越敏感。 存续期与债券的年期(maturity)是不同的概念，年期一定程度上亦反映债券对利率风险的敏感度，在其他条件相同的情况下，年期越长，价格对利率的变动越敏感。 但由于债券价格对利率风险的敏感度同时受票面利率、付息的频率及年期这些因素所影响，单是年期并不是债券对利率风险敏感度的好指标。 
存续期是综合了影响债券价格对利率变动敏感度的各个因素而计算出来的一个指标。有了这一概念，各种债券和债券组合对利率风险的敏感度便有了一个简单的、可直接相比较的衡量标准。 

债券存续期有两种常用的计算方式： Macaulay Duration和modified duration。 Macaulay Duration的单位为年，如票面利率及市场收益率均为8%，每半年付息一次的10年期债券的存续期为7.07年。以D代表存续期，市场利率每变动1个百分点，债券价格就会随着变动D%(利率上升时，价格下跌；利率下跌时价格上升)。 由此可见，存续期较长的债券(或债券组合)风险较高。若预期利率下滑，调整债券投资组合以拉长存续期(可以通过调高长债的比重来达到)是理智的策略，因为一旦利率果真下滑，债券组合的价格升幅会较大。当然，若判断失误，所付出的代价亦会较为惨重。 
到期前不付息的零息债券(zero-coupon bond)的存续期，等同于其距离债券到期的年数(term to maturity)。 所有在到期前有付利息的债券的存续期，均较其距离到期的年数为短。 另外，若一切其他条件相同，票面利率越高，债券的存续期则越短。
Duration
A measure of the sensitivity of the price (the value of principal) of a fixed-income investment to a change in interest rates. Duration is expressed as a number of years. Rising interest rates mean falling bond prices, while declining interest rates mean rising bond prices. The bigger the duration number, the greater the interest-rate risk or reward for bond prices.
Investopedia Says:
The duration number is a complicated calculation involving present value, yield, coupon, final maturity and call features. Fortunately for investors, this indicator is a standard data point provided in the presentation of comprehensive bond and bond mutual fund information. 
It is a common misconception among non-professional investors that bonds and bond funds are risk free. They are not. Investors need to be aware of two main risks that can affect a bond's investment value: credit risk (default) and interest rate risk (rate fluctuations). The duration indicator addresses the latter issue. Short-term, intermediate-term and long-term bond funds will have different durations. For example, Vanguard's short-, intermediate- and long-term bond index funds generally have durations of around three years, six years and 11 years, respectively.
期限/持续时间：衡量一种定息证券的价格对利率变动100基点的敏感度。计算是基于所有现金流现值的加权平均，是收到债券全部现金流所的平均时间
residential mortgage 住宅抵押贷款；住房按揭 （内）；住宅按揭 （港）
encompass    v. 围绕; 包含; 包围; 完成
sovereign risk    政治风险；主权风险
municipality　n. 自治市; 市政当局
loosely speaking  一般来说

逐日盯市制度（marking to market）
　　所谓逐日盯市制度，亦即每日无负债制度、每日结算制度，是指在每个交易日结束之后，交易所结算部门先计算出当日各期货合约结算价格，核算出每个会员每笔交易的盈亏数额，以此调整会员的保证金帐户，将盈利记入帐户的贷方，将亏损记入帐户的借方。若保证金帐户上贷方金额低于保证金要求，交易所通知该会员在限期内缴纳追加保证金以达到初始保证金水平，否则不能参加下一交易日的交易。逐日盯市制度一般包含计算浮动盈亏、计算实际盈亏两个方面。
Marking to market
Buyers and sellers of future contracts are required to post a margin in a margin account with a member of the exchange. If decreases in the market value of the equity position make the margin fall below maintenance level, the margin account must be replenished. On the other hand, increases in the value of a contract are also added to the margin account and can be withdrawn. The adjustment of margin account is conducted on a daily basis, and is called marking to market
repudiate   v. 拒绝,拒付,拒绝履行
Credit Spread
1. The spread between Treasury securities and non-Treasury securities that are identical in all respects except for quality rating. 
2. An options strategy where a high premium option is sold and a low premium option is bought on the same underlying security.
Investopedia Says:
1. For instance, the difference between yields on treasuries and those on single A-rated industrial bonds. A company must offer a higher return on their bonds because their credit is worse than the government's. 
2. An example would be buying a Jan 50 call on ABC for $2, and writing a Jan 45 call on ABC for $5. The net amount received (credit) is $3. The investor will profit if the spread narrows. Can also be called "credit spread option" or "credit risk option".
Credit Spread  信贷息差
1. 国库券与除信用评级外所有条款相同的非国库券之间的息差
2. 卖出溢价高期权及买入同一相关证券但溢价低期权的期权投资策略
Ad   hoc  adj.  特别地; 专门地; 格外地
on the run的债券是指相同到期日国债中发行日期最近的一批债券,发行早的为off the run
vintage  n.1. 葡萄收获(期量); (当年)葡萄酒产量2. 酒; (=vintage wine)(特指某年某地所产的)美酒3. (同年代的)一批产品; 同期产生的人物4. 制造的时期; 开始存在的时期; 年龄; 寿命  adj.1. 酒的; 酿造的2. 属于某一时期制造的3. 优良的4. 古老的; 过时的(尤指曾经一度为最佳的)  vi.vt.1. 为酿酒而收(葡萄)2. 收葡萄
IRS (Internal Revenue Service)  美国国税局 (美国)国内税务局
tennessee valley authority  n.田纳西河流域开发管理局
sponsor  保荐人 （内&港）；发起人；保证人；保荐机构 （内）
Federal Agency  联邦政府机构
 Government National Mortgage Association,GNMA, 美国政府国民抵押贷款协会俗称Ginnie Mae,吉利美
Federal National Mortgage Association     FNMA 美国联邦国家房贷协会，美国联邦国民抵押贷款协会　俗称Fannie Mae，房利美
俗称Fannie Mae，这个由国会创办的公司负责确保抵押贷款投资市场的流动性。Fannie Mae会在次级市场中买进贷款抵押存据，将其聚集在一起后以转付证券的方式卖出给投资者
Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (FHLMC) 联邦住宅抵押贷款公司
俗称Freddie Mac，房地美，由美国政府授权成立的公司，目标为加强住宅抵押贷款的次级市场。
以上三家为三大政府性抵押贷款机构
Jumbo Mortgage　巨型抵押贷款：是指贷款金额超过传统行业平均水平的抵押贷款，因为金额较大，政府性抵押贷款机构不会为其所有金额提供担保。2006年单笔金额超过41.7万美元的抵押贷款被称为巨型贷款，超过65万美元的抵押贷款被称为超巨型抵押贷款（Super Jumbo Mortgage）。
优质贷款由于有政府性机构提供担保，获得很高的信用评级不足为奇。关键在于以次级贷款为基础的MBS是否能够获得较高的信用评级。针对这一点，房地产金融机构在投资银行的帮助下，开发出一种新型的MBS―――担保债务凭证（Collateralized Debt Obligation，CDO）。CDO产品的核心是一个分级（Tranches）的概念，即在同一个抵押贷款资产池上开发出信用风险不同的各级产品：优先级（Senior Tranches）、中间级（Mezzanine Tranches）和股权级（Equity Tranches）。一旦抵押贷款出现违约，那么各级产品偿还顺序由先到后为优先级、中间级和股权级。换句话说，优先级产品的偿付有中间级和股权级产品作为保障，因此往往能够获得AAA评级。中间级产品的信用评级在AA到BB之间。股权级产品一般没有信用评级。一般而言，在一个抵押贷款资产池基础上发行的CDO中，优先级约占80％，中间级和股权级各占10％左右
Federal Farm Credit System 联邦农业系统
Federal Home Loan Bank System联邦住宅贷款银行体系
Student Loan Marketing Association  学生贷款营销协会
Collateral
Properties or assets that are offered to secure a loan or other credit. Collateral becomes subject to seizure on default.
Investopedia Says:
Collateral is a form of security to the lender in case the borrower fails to pay back the loan. 
For example, if you get a mortgage, your collateral would be your house. In margin trading, the securities in your account act as collateral in the case of a margin call.
抵押品:作为贷款或其他信贷抵押的物业或资产。抵押品在违约时可被没收
Mortgage
A debt instrument that is secured by the collateral of specified real estate property and that the borrower is obliged to pay back with a predetermined set of payments. Mortgages are used by individuals and businesses to make large purchases of real estate without paying the entire value of the purchase up front.
Mortgages are also known as "liens against property" or "claims on property".
Investopedia Says:
In a residential mortgage, a home buyer pledges his or her house to the bank. The bank has a claim on the house should the home buyer default on paying the mortgage. In the case of a foreclosure, the bank may evict the home's tenants and sell the house, using the income from the sale to clear the mortgage debt.
房地产抵押 以特定房地产为抵押的贷款，借方有责任偿还预定的一系列还款
foreclosure  取消抵押品赎回权,没收抵押品
A situation in which a homeowner is unable to make principal and/or interest payments on his or her mortgage, so the lender, be it a bank or building society, can seize and sell the property as stipulated in the terms of the mortgage contract.
Investopedia Says:
In some cases, to avoid foreclosing on a home, creditors try to make adjustments to the repayment schedule to allow the homeowner to retain ownership. This situation is known as a special forbearance or mortgage modification.
Forbearance  暂缓行使（债权人权利）偿债延期
贷方或债权人暂缓债务人偿还贷款的责任，目的在于容许债务人偿还过期款项
A postponement of loan payments, granted by a lender or creditor, for a temporary period of time. This is done to give the borrower time to make up for overdue payments.
Investopedia Says:
Basically, forbearance allows the borrower to put a temporary hold on his or her monthly payments, usually for up to one year. Forbearance is common for unemployed people with outstanding student loans.
n.1. 忍耐, 克制, 耐性2. 【律】债务偿还期的延缓3. 放弃执行某些权利
Mortgage Backed Securities，MBS　抵押贷款支持证券
Mortagage passthrough security  过手型抵押支付证券 抵押转递证券　传递证券
Mortgage Pay-through security   转付型抵押支持证券
collateralized mortgage obligation 担保抵押债务/贷款证券,
附属担保品按揭证券,转手证券
stripped mortgage-backed securities　本息剥离抵押贷款证券 剥离抵押担保证券
Securitization  证券化
将资产（通常是各种形式的债务）转换为证券。这些证券的交易比基础资产的交易更为自由和廉价，而且产生的收益高于将资产用作贷款抵押品所获得的利润。一个例子是房产抵押贷款证券，它将缺乏流动性的独立房产抵押贷款汇聚成单种可交易的资产。
Or 指集合一组金融资产建立一种金融工具，并向投资者发售
The process through which an issuer creates a financial instrument by combining other financial assets and then marketing different tiers of the repackaged instruments to investors. The process can encompass any type of financial asset and promotes liquidity in the marketplace.
Investopedia Says:
Mortgage-backed securities are a perfect example of securitization. By combining mortgages into one large pool, the issuer can divide the large pool into smaller pieces based on each individual mortgage's inherent risk of default and then sell those smaller pieces to investors. 
The process creates liquidity by enabling smaller investors to purchase shares in a larger asset pool. Using the mortgage-backed security example, individual retail investors are able to purchase portions of a mortgage as a type of bond. Without the securitization of mortgages, retail investors may not be able to afford to buy into a large pool of mortgages. 
Tier  n.[C]1. (阶梯式座位等的)一排2. 一层;一层褶裥Her wedding cake had three tiers.
她的结婚蛋糕有三层。3. 阶层,等级 vt.1. 层层排列,使层叠
conform to    vt. 遵从(遵守,使自己适应)   符合
tranche  [tr?n?]n.  国际货币基金贷款划分的“部分”  发行份额/部分
　　份额、档　法语，为特定投资者设计的一类证券
http://www.firstrade.com/public/zh_cn/knowledgecenter/glossary/?letter=a
Credit Enhancement　　信用增级
Known　unknown　　我们知道自己不知道
unknown unknown　　我们不知道自己不知道
covenant-lite　　　　　，“低门槛”
Treasury STRIPS
An acronym(首字母缩略词(由一词组中各主要词的第一 字母缩合而成) for 'separate trading of registered interest and principal securities'. Treasury STRIPS are fixed-income securities sold at a significant discount to face value and offer no interest payments because they mature at par.
Strips    国库无息债券的俗称，是Separate Trading of Registered Interest and Principal of Securities的缩写。
Collateralized Mortgage Obligation  房产抵押贷款债券
[债市]一种由房产抵押贷款的还款支持的债券。
binding  n.约束
Escrow  第三方保管契约
由第三方代表持有的金融工具，直至收到书面或口头指示，或完成条件
【律】(由第三者保存、待条件完成后即交受让人的)证书[契据]
Structured Note
A debt obligation that also contains an embedded derivative component with characteristics that adjust the security's risk/return profile. The return performance of a structured note will track that of the underlying debt obligation and the derivative embedded within it.
Investopedia Says:
A structured note is a hybrid security that attempts to change its profile by including additional modifying structures. A simple example would be a five-year bond tied together with an option contract for increasing the returns.
Structured Note  结构性票据
1. 指含有可调整证券风险/回报状态的组成部分和特点的中期限合成债务
2. 价值取决于相关资产价格变动的金融工具，使投资者可从有利的价格变动中获利
结构性票据/债券是场外产品，它将数种不同成分捆绑在一起以组建单种产品，通常是在债务工具（如中期债券）中嵌入期权。结构性票据/债券一般是以对市场的观点为导向，并且其设计目的通常是吸引具有高度集中的风险/回报需求和市场观点的投资者。
Commercial Paper
An unsecured, short-term debt instrument issued by a corporation, typically for the financing of accounts receivable, inventories and meeting short-term liabilities. Maturities on commercial paper rarely range any longer than 270 days. The debt is usually issued at a discount, reflecting prevailing market interest rates.
商业票据:企业发行的无抵押、短期债务，经常用来筹集应收账款及库存的资金，利率一般低于当时市场利率
negotiable CDs  n.可转让的大额定期存款单
banker's acceptance  银行承兑汇票  银行承兑
Banker's Acceptance 银行承兑
由非金融机构发行且有银行担保的短期投资证券。银行承兑通常折价交易，是货币市场基金时常投资的项目之一。
service debt　偿债
union contract  n.工会合同
susceptibility  n.灵敏度/性
suspect  n. 嫌疑犯adj. 令人怀疑的,不可信的v. 怀疑,猜想 怀疑, 疑心; 猜疑
Secured Debt
Debt backed or secured by collateral to reduce the risk associated with lending. An example would be a mortgage, your house is considered collateral towards the debt. If you default on repayment, the bank seizes your house, sells it and uses the proceeds to pay back the debt.
Investopedia Says:
Assets backing debt or a debt instrument are considered security, which means they can be claimed by the lender if default occurs. Obviously unsecured debt is higher risk, and as such lenders of unsecured money typically require a much higher return.
有抵押债务/有担保的负债 （内）/抵押债项 （港）:有抵押品作担保或抵押，以减低借贷风险的债务
mutual agreement  n.双方协定 双方一致同意
debenture  n.1. (公司)信用债券2. (海关)退税凭单debenture stock[英]公司债券
affiliate  [美]分支机构, 分支联号, 会员
bond insurance  n.债券保险
Firm Commitment
1. A lending institution's promise to enter into a loan agreement with a specific entity within a certain period of time. 
2. An underwriter's agreement to assume all inventory risk and purchase all securities directly from the issuer for sale to the public at the price specified.
坚定承诺    不能变更的贷款承诺；确定包销 （内）；确定承诺；坚定承诺；承诺包销 （港）
1. 贷款公司承诺在特定时期内与特定实体签署贷款协议
2. 承诺承担所有库存风险及直接向发行人以向公众售股价格买入
Shelf registration  缓行注册；暂时搁置注册
A regulation that a corporation can evoke to comply with U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) registration requirements for a new stock offering up to three years before doing the actual public offering. However, the corporation must still file the required annual and quarterly reports with the SEC.
In terms of SEC regulations, it is formally known as SEC Rule 415.
美国证监会第415条条款，容许一家企业在实行公开发行前最多两年进行注册手续。有关企业必须向美国证监会提交规定的年度及季度报告
at the discretion of  n.凭...自行处理；随...的意见;由...自己处理
equity swap  股权互换 （内&港）；股权交换 （内） 债转股？
get around  vt. 规避　说服
bank line of credit  银行授信额度，银行信用额度
broker-dealer  经纪自营商 （内）；经纪交易商 （港）
certificate of deposit   n. 存款单/证
denomination  面额,票额,票面金额
insolvent  无力偿债；无偿还能力；资不抵债 （内&港）；失去偿付能力；无力偿付；破产 （内）
royalty  专营权费；专利权费；特许权使用费
A payment to an owner for the use of property, especially patents, copyrighted works, franchises or natural resources.
Investopedia Says:
Royalties are usually expressed as a percentage of the revenues obtained through the use of the owner's property.
album  n.1. 相片簿, 邮票簿, 照片簿2. 文选; 歌曲选; 唱片集3. 来宾签名簿, 粘贴簿; 画片(摄影)选; 纪念册
Insurance Wrap　保险包或称综合保险,为有共同利益的各方提供相应的全部责任保险
Collateralised Debt Obligation (CDO)  债务抵押债券
Non-performing Loans  不良贷款；逾放款；到期未能偿还贷款
problem loans  有问题贷款
bought deal  全数包销　购买承销；买断包销 （内）；
A new share issue that is bought entirely by one underwriter to resell to investors.
Investopedia Says:
An underwriter will only do a bought deal if it is confident there is enough demand for the shares.
Syndicate　承销团：一组合作执行大型项目的银行家、保险公司等
A group of bankers, insurers, etcetera, who work together on a large project.
Investopedia Says:
A syndicate only works together temporarily. They are commonly used for large loans or underwritings to reduce the risk that each individual firm must take on.
syndicate银团 （内&港）；承销团；辛迪加；贷款银团 （内）；集团 （港）
Private Placement
Raising of capital via private rather than public placement. The result is the sale of securities to a relatively small number of investors. Investors involved in private placements are usually large banks, mutual funds, insurance companies, and pension funds.
Investopedia Says:
Since a private placement is offered to a few, select individuals, the placement does not have to be registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission. In many cases detailed financial information is not disclosed and a　the need for a prospectus is waived. Finally since the placements are private rather than public, the average investor is only made aware of the placement usually after it has occurred.
私募；私募配售；非公开配售；发行债券时的直接销售　：通过非公开证券配售（相对于公开配售）筹集资金。一般的结果是买入证券的投资者数目较小
sovereign debt  国家债务;国债
Treasury Inflation Protected Securities    (TIPS)
A special type of Treasury note or bond that offers protection from inflation. Like other Treasuries, an inflation-indexed security pays interest every six months and pays the principal when the security matures. The difference is that the coupon payments and underlying principal are automatically increased to compensate for inflation as measured by the consumer price index (CPI). 
Also referred to as "Treasury inflation-indexed securities".
Yield Spread　　收益率差价
The difference between yields on differing debt instruments, calculated by deducting the yield of one instrument from another. The higher the yield spread, the greater the difference between the yields offered by each instrument. The spread can be measured between debt instruments of differing maturities, credit ratings and risk.
(衡量两只有不同期限、信用评级和风险债券收益率之间的差，从中发现投资机会的指标。
当前的收益率差价和历史的收益率差价对比后可以找到投资机会。例如，目前5年期国债收益率为5％，10年期国债收益率为6％，则两只债券的收益率差价为1％（6％－5％）。如果历史上这两只债券的收益率差价接近5％，也就是说，历史上多数时期5年期国债的收益率仅有1％左右，目前5％的收益率就非常诱人，投资者就会据此买入5年期国债。收益率差价还可以用来衡量一只债券与无风险收益率的差，来反映这只债券的风险溢价，与无风险收益率的差越大，说明该只债券的潜在风险越大，所以要提供更高的风险溢价来补偿投资者承担的额外风险。网来)
摘自词典：不同品质证券的收益率之间的差额。债券的收益率与相同到期日的无风险证券（通常是政府债券）收益率的差，该收益利差主要由市场对该债券信用风险的预期来决定的。
taxable equivalent yield　等额应税收益率
vice versa  反之亦然
inverted 　adj. 反向的,倒转的
hump 　(曲线)顶点, (巅)峰值　(驼)峰, 驼背, 背隆起物 humped　峰状的
dip  　下沉;倾斜　　dipped谷状的
adjacent 　adj. 毗连的,邻近的,接近的
spot rate  即期利率
Spread Trading  价差交易  股指期货中的交易行为一种
价差交易与套利交易的主要区别。后者是针对期货市场与现货市场相同资产价格不合理的关系进行交易，目的是获取无风险利润；而前者是针对期货市场上具有关联的不同期货合约之间的不合理价格关系进行交易，目的是为了博取差价利润。后者是跨期、现两个市场的交易，称之为Arbitrage，前者都在期货市场上进行，称之为Spreading 或Spread Trading。
股指期货中的差价交易，基本上可以分为三个类型，那就是：市场内价差（Intramarket Spread）交易、市场间价差（Intermarket Spread）交易及跨品种价差（Intercommodity Spread）交易。
（1）市场内价差（Intramarket Spread）交易是指在同一市场上对同一品种但不同交割月份的合约进行价差交易，有时也称为跨月套利（calendar spread）或跨时间套利(time spread)。比如买进交割期较近的期货合约，同时卖出交割期较远的期货合约，这时称为正向套利；或相反买进交割期较远的期货合约，同时卖出交割期较近的期货合约，这时称为反向套利。
（2）市场间价差（Intermarket Spread）交易是指在不同市场上上市的同一品种同一交割月份的合约进行价差交易，有时也称为跨市套利交易。有些交易所为了争夺市场份额，开出了完全相同的指数期货交易，最典型的如日经225指数，同时在日本、新加坡和美国进行期货交易。交易者利用两个相同合约之间的价格差，在一个交易所买进期货合约，在另一个交易所卖出期货合约，建立一个跨市套利头寸。由于合约是相同的，而且交割月份也相同，故这时一般应采用低买高卖的策略。建立套利头寸后，等到两个期货合约的期价重新相等时再行平仓，以此获得跨市套利利润。
（3）跨品种价差（Intercommodity Spread）交易是指对两个具有相同交割月份但不同的指数的期货价格差进行套利交易。当然这两个指数之间必须有一定的相关性，并且相关性越高越好。至于这两个指数期货在哪里交易倒不是主要问题，既可以是在同一个交易所中交易的，也可以是在不同交易所交易的。当然，对交易者而言，如果两个相关品种在同一个交易所中交易，进行价差交易时会更容易些。
交易者进行套利时能享受保证金优惠待遇，优惠的幅度很大，通常只有单边交易保证金的几十分之一。
Flight To Quality　安全投资转移：投资者将资金转移到最安全的投资项目，一般出现在金融市场存在不明朗因素的情况下
The action of investors moving their capital away from riskier investments to the safest possible investment vehicles. This flight is usually caused by uncertainty in the financial or international markets.  However, at other times, this move may be an instance of investors cutting back on the more volatile investments for the conservative ones (i.e. diversifying) without much consideration of the international markets.   
Investopedia Says:
For example, during a bear market investors will often move their money out of equities and into government securities and money market funds.  Another example is investors moving investments from high-risk countries with political unrest and volatile economic conditions to less risky markets of other countries. One indication of a flight to quality is a dramatic fall of the yield on government securities, which is a result of the increased demand for them.
Tax-Equivalent Yield　　应税等价收益
The pretax yield that a taxable bond needs to possess for its yield to be equal to that of a tax-free municipal bond. This calculation can be used to fairly compare the yield of a tax-free bond to that of a taxable bond in order to see which bond has a higher applicable yield.Also known as "after-tax yield."
Investopedia Says:
For example, if a tax-free bond has a yield of 20% and the tax rate is 10%, a taxable bond would need a pretax yield of 22.2% (20% / 90%) in order to be considered an equivalent investment. Therefore, all bonds with the same risk but with a pretax yield of less than 22.2% should be considered inferior investments compared to the 20% municipal bond.
 
London Interbank Offered Rate 　LIBOR　
伦敦银行同业拆放利率：在伦敦银行同业市场银行之间借贷的利率
Federal Reserve Board  美联储
联邦储备委员会(美国),联邦储备局
in  reference to  关于
with  reference to  关于
roll over  转仓；滚计；滚转；续期　再筹资
economic health  n.经济情况健全程度
transmission mechanism  传导机制 （内&港）
real output  n.实际产量
Economic Shock　经济冲击
Economic Shock
An event that produces a significant change within an economy, despite occurring outside of it. Economic shocks are unpredictable and typically impact supply or demand throughout the markets.
Investopedia Says:
An economic shock may come in a variety of forms. A shock in the supply of staple commodities, such as oil, can cause prices to skyrocket（股价大涨；飙升 （内&港））, making it very costly to use it for business purposes. The rapid devaluation of a currency would produce a shock for the import-export industry, as a nation would have great difficulty bringing in foreign products.
devaluation  n.贬值
herding behavior　羊群行为　从众行为
Overnight Rate即隔夜利率，也叫同业拆借利率，是银行间为弥补短期资金不足而相互贷款的日利率
When a bank,say bank A, needs to increase reserve in central bank but it hasn't enough, it'll lend(感觉应该是borrow) from another bank,say bank B. B agrees, but it wants an interest. The rate of the interest is overnight rate. It gets its name because A usually has to give back the money after only 24 hours.
appreciably  adv.  可察觉地, 明显地; 相当地
sequitur  ['sekwit?]n. (根据前提得出的)推断, 推理, 结论
Time horizon 投资期
yield to maturity  到期收益率
origin  【数】原[起]点
Bond Equivalent Yield 　　　　(BEY) 债券等值收益率
A calculation for restating semi-annual, quarterly, or monthly discount-bond or note yields into an annual yield. For a fixed income security with a par value of $1000, the calculation is as follows: 
 
Investopedia Says:
The BEY allows fixed-income securities whose payments are not annual to be compared with securities with annual yields. The BEY is the yield that is quoted in newspapers. Alternatively, if the semi-annual or quarterly yield to maturity of a bond is known, the APR calculation may be used.
yield to call  至通知赎回时收益率 （内&港）；至通知赎券收益率；通知收益率 （内）
Yield To Call　买回/赎回收益率
The yield of a bond or note if you were to buy and hold the security until the call date. This yield is valid only if the security is called prior to maturity. The calculation of yield to call is based on the coupon rate, the length of time to the call date and the market price.
Investopedia Says:
Generally speaking, bonds are callable over several years and are normally called at a slight premium.
投资者买入并持有债券直至买回日可得的收益率。这个收益率只有在证券在到期前被买回才有效。买回收益率根据息票率、当时与买回日期相隔的距离以及市场价格而定
Current Yield
Annual income (interest or dividends) divided by the current price of the security. This measure looks at the current price of a bond instead of its face value and represents the return an investor would expect if he or she purchased the bond and held it for a year. This measure is not an accurate reflection of the actual return that an investor will receive in all cases because bond and stock prices are constantly changing due to market factors.
 
Also referred to as "bond yield", or "dividend yield" for stocks.
Investopedia Says:
For example, if a bond is priced at $95.75 and has an annual coupon of $5.10, the current yield of the bond is 5.33%. If the bond is a 10-year bond with nine years remaining and you were only planning to hold it for one year, you would receive the $5.10, but your actual return would depend on the bond's price when you sold it. If, during this period, interest rates rose and the price of your bond fell to $87.34, your actual return for the period would be -3.5% (-$3.31/$95.75) because although you gained $5.10 in dividends, your capital loss was $8.41.
现时收益率：当期收益率；本期收益率(内）；证券年收益（利息或股息）除以证券显示价格
bond equivalent yield  债券等价/值收益率 （内&港）债券等价/值收益
Option-Adjusted Spread　期权调整价差法（以下简称OAS法）是资产支持证券（ABS）定价中使用得最多的一种方法。这种方法首先通过模拟大量的利率运动轨迹，然后决定不同利率轨迹下未来的ABS现金流量，再以模拟利率加上一个期权调整价差的和来贴现未来现金流。
总结：由于当溢价时，YTM>YTC；而当折价时，YTM<YTC。实践中，投资者同时计算YTM和YTC，选择其中较小的一个使用，这是一种比较保守的方法。
因此，当债券溢价时，其YTM＞YTC，就使用YTC；当债券折价时，YTM＜YTC，就使用YTM。
Yield to put 　售出/出售收益率　沽出实收利息
Bootstrapping 步步为营法
A procedure used to calculate the zero-coupon yield curve from market figures.
Because the T-bills offered by the government are not available for every time period, the bootstrapping method is used to fill in the missing figures in order to derive the yield curve. The bootstrap method uses interpolation to determine the yields for Treasury zero-coupon securities with various maturities.
 Coupon Bond
A debt obligation with coupons attached that represent semiannual interest payments. Also known as a "bearer bond".
Investopedia Says:
No record of the purchaser is kept by the issuer, and the purchaser's name is not printed on the certificate. 
息票债券 （内&港） 附息票债券: 附有息票的债务，每半年支付利息一次
Equivalent annual yield (EAY-sometimes known as the effective annual yield)
等值年收益率
On the run treasury security 新发行债券
Off the run treasury security 旧发行债券
Convexity  券凸性 债券凸曲度
[债市]用以量度某只债券的价格与收益关系的方法。存续期间变化比率。
Macaulay Duration  麦考利久期
The weighted average term to maturity of the cash flows from a bond. The weight of each cash flow is determined by dividing the present value of the cash flow by the price, and is a measure of bond price volatility with respect to interest rates.
Macaulay duration can be calculated by:
 
Investopedia Says:
The metric is named after its creator, Frederick Macaulay. Macaulay duration is frequently used by portfolio managers who use an immunization strategy. Macaulay duration is also used to measure how sensitive a bond or a bond portfolio's price is to changes in interest rates.
Immunization    利率变动风险防范  免疫
A strategy that matches the durations of assets and liabilities thereby minimizing the impact of interest rates on the net worth. Also known as "multiperiod immunization".
Investopedia Says:
For example, large banks must protect their current net worth, whereas pension funds have the obligation of payments after a number of years. These institutions are both concerned about protecting the future value of their portfolios and therefore have the problem of dealing with uncertain future interest rates. By using an immunization technique, large institutions can protect (immunize) their firm from exposure to interest rate fluctuations. A perfect immunization strategy establishes a virtually zero-risk profile in which interest rate movements have no impact on the value of a firm. 
利率变动风险防范：匹配资产与负债的期限，以减少利率对净值的影响
curvature  【数】曲率, 曲度; 弧度
summary  n. 总表  摘要, 概要adj.  摘要的, 简略的 , 概括的; 扼要的; 简明的
swap  互换: 指交易双方为了抵消利率或货币风险，及使其资产与负债相平衡而交换现金流量 。例如，某公司可能有必须以瑞士法郎支付的支出，但其收入是以美元计值。而另一家公司的情形正好相反。这时，银行为了赚取手续费可安排一项能满足双方要求的货币互换（换汇交易）。利率互换的情形也一样，这种互换允许双方以固定利率取代浮动利率的风险，从而使双方获益。关键是参与互换的双方没有交换本金，即数量固定的债务，而只交换现金流量，即利息。
 
 
bilateral  n.双边的,双向的,双向作用的,两面的/侧的
Counterparty Risk
The risk to each party of a contract that the counterparty will not live up to its contractual obligations.
Investopedia Says:
In most financial contracts, counterparty risk is known as "default risk".
交易对手风险；对手风险(内&港）；违约风险（内）： 合约对方不履行合约责任的风险
notional  adj.1. 概念上的; 抽象的, 纯理论的; 想象中的, 非现实的2. [美]空想的; 想法古怪的; 不根据实际的3. 名义上的; 象征性的4. 【语】表意的
notional  adj.1. 概念上的; 抽象的, 纯理论的; 想象中的, 非现实的2. [美]空想的; 想法古怪的; 不根据实际的3. 名义上的; 象征性的4. 【语】表意的
oz. (ounce)  n.  盎司
offset　平仓　抵消、冲销
locked limit 锁定限制/停板限制
outcry  n.拍卖,叫卖; 喊价
pit  交易圈；交易场  有组织市场的交易厅
A specific area of the trading floor that is designated for the trading of an individual futures or options contract.
Investopedia Says:
You've probably seen pictures of traders wildly thrashing their arms and yelling orders in the trading pit. Although it may look like a poorly coordinated Village People concert, there is actual trading going on.
bushel  n.蒲式耳,量谷物/水果容量单位
Tick size  价格变动单位；；最低价格变动
close out  平仓；结清
marking to market  盯市
exposure  承受风险；收支差〔外汇〕；揭发,暴露,存货
ex pit  n.场外交易
Tick  最小的价格波动
The minimum movement possible in the price of a financial instrument. A tick is one hundredth of a percentage point for bond yields and interest rates.
Put-Call Parity 买卖权平价
买卖权平价是指标的资产、到期日及行使价均相同的欧式买权(call)与欧式卖权(put)价格之间存在的必然关系。如果买权与卖权的价格偏离这种关系，就会出现套利的机会。欧式期权是指只能在到期日执行的期权，美式期权则可以在到期前的任何时候执行。标的资产是指行使期权时可以买进或卖出的资产。
Put call parity is a fundamental relationship that must exist between the prices of a put option and a call option on the same underlying instrument with the same strike price and expiration date. If they are not the same then there is room for arbitrage. Put call parity applies only to European-style options which can be exercised only on expiry and not before. American-style options can be exercised at any time during the life of the contract. 
Put-Call Parity
买入-出售价差  认沽认购平价；期权比价 （港）
对同一种证券、到期日相同的出售期权价格与买入期权价格之间的关系
A principle referring to the static price relationship, given a stock's price, between the prices of European put and call options of the same class (i.e. same underlying, strike price and expiration date). This relationship is shown from the fact that combinations of options can create positions that are the same as holding the stock itself. These option and stock positions must all have the same return or an arbitrage opportunity would be available to traders.  Any option pricing model that produces put and call prices that don't satisfy put-call parity should be rejected as unsound because arbitrage opportunities exist.   
 
Investopedia Says:
The above illustration demonstrates a simple put-call parity relationship. Looking at the graph, we see that a long-stock/long-put position (red line) has the same risk/return profile as a long call (blue line) with the same expiration and strike price. The only difference between the two lines is the assumed dividend that is paid during the time to expiration. The owner of the stock (red line) would receive the additional amount, while the owner of the call (blue line) would not. However, if we assume no dividend would be paid to stockholders during the holding period, then both lines would overlap. 
In The Money到价
1. For a call option, when the option's strike price is below the market price of the underlying asset.
2. For a put option, when the strike price is above the market price of the underlying asset.
Investopedia Says:
In other words, this is when your stock option is worth money and you can turn around and sell or exercise it for a profit.
对于买入期权，到价是指行使价格低于相关股票的市场价格。对于出售期权，到价指行使价格高于相关股票的市场价格
Spot Price
The current price at which a particular commodity can be bought or sold at a specified time and place.
Investopedia Says:
In other words, the price that is quoted if you want to buy any commodity today.
现货价格 （内&港）；现货价 （港）在特定时间及地点买卖特定商品的当前价格
Swap
Traditionally, the exchange of one security for another to change the maturity (bonds), quality of issues (stocks or bonds), or because investment objectives have changed. Recently, swaps have grown to include currency swaps and interest rate swaps.
Investopedia Says:
If firms in separate countries have comparative advantages on interest rates, then a swap could benefit both firms. For example, one firm may have a lower fixed interest rate, while another has access to a lower floating interest rate. These firms could swap to take advantage of the lower rates.
掉期/互换:
传统上指以一种证券交换另一种证券，以改变期限（债券）、发行质量（股票或债券），或因为投资目标有所改变。近年来，掉期包含货币掉期及利率掉期的情况日益普遍
Plain Vanilla
The most basic or standard version of a financial instrument, usually options, bonds, futures and swaps. Its opposite is an exotic instrument, which alters the components of a traditional financial instrument, resulting in a more complex security.
Investopedia Says:
For example, a plain vanilla option is the standard type of option, one with a simple expiration date and strike price and no additional features. With an exotic option, such as a knock-in option, an additional contingency is added so that the option only becomes active once the underlying stock hits a set price point
普通型、最基本、大众型
指金融工具―特别是金融衍生产品―是最基本的标准类型，不附带任何特殊的条件。
covered call  有抵补看涨期权 （内）；备兑认购期权 （港）
An options strategy whereby an investor holds a long position in an asset and writes (sells) call options on that same asset in an attempt to generate increased income from the asset. This is often employed when an investor has a short-term neutral view on the asset and for this reason hold the asset long and simultaneously have a short position via the option to generate income from the option premium. This is also known as a "buy-write".
Investopedia Says:
For example, let's say that you own shares of the TSJ Sports Conglomerate and like its long-term prospects as well as its share price but feel in the shorter term the stock will likely trade relatively flat, perhaps within a few dollars of its current price of, say, $25. If you sell a call option on TSJ for $26.00, you earn the premium from the option sale but cap your upside. One of three scenarios is going to play out:
a) TSJ shares trade flat (below the $26 strike price) - the option will expire worthless and you keep the premium from the option. In this case, by using the buy-write strategy you have successfully outperformed the stock. 
b) TSJ shares fall - the option expires worthless, you keep the premium, and again you outperform the stock. 
c) TSJ shares rise above $26 - the option is exercised, and your upside is capped at $26, plus the option premium. In this case, if the stock price goes higher than $26, plus the premium, your buy-write strategy has underperformed the TSJ shares.
Exchange Traded Fund  ETF 交易型开放式指数证券投资基金/交易型开放式指数基金/交易所交易基金 是一种在交易所上市交易的证券投资基金产品，交易手续与股票完全相同。ETF是兼具股票与基金特色的新金融商品。一来ETF是由基金公司发起与管理的基金，投资人不必自行选择投资标的。基金公司以一揽子股票为担保，将其分割为众多单价较低的投资单位，即ETF基金份额。普通投资者既可以在证券交易所像买卖股票一样买卖ETF，也可以通过赎回ETF单位换得所存托的一揽子股票。
Venture Capital  创业资本 创投基金；创业基金；风险投资基金;风险基金
12b-1fees    12b-1费根据1980年开始采用的12b-1规则而得名，其名称对中国投资者来说可能比较陌生，但实质即相当于大家所熟悉的销售服务费，主要用作宣传销售和投资者服务。美国主监会允许基金从基金资产中计提这项费用，但前提是基金公司要参与12b-1计划并受其制约。该费用包括了两部分：销售费用，基金公司可提取以支付广告费、宣传品和各类报告印刷等，但上限不超过基金资产的0.75%；持有人服务费，这部分费用主要用作投资者咨询、基金销售热线等，按规定提取不超过0.25％。因此，12b-1费用总计不能超过基金资产的1％。通常来说，如果基金不参与12b-1计划，是不允许收取此项费用的，有的基金公司仍然会提取0.25％用作投资者服务，但不会进行销售费用的提取。
以美国证期会的法条号码命名，允许基金营销的费用转嫁由基金本身支付，支付的方式则以年费的方式平均分摊于基金的交易日中，反映到基金净值的报价上，属隐含成本，因此会削弱基金净值的成长。
美国共同基金的费用主要分为两大类：基金持有人费用(Shareholder Fees)和基金年度运作费用(Annual Fund Operating FeeM。前者由持有人直接支付，后者则从基金资产中扣除。基金持有人费用一般有申购费、赎回费、红利再投资费用、基金转换费、账户保管费等。目前大多数基金不收取后三项费用。赎回费一般随着持有期的增加而递减，超过一定期限(2年或3年)则免收。《1940年投资公司法》规定的最高申购费为8.5％，但实际上各基金的收费远比这一上限低。申购费按收取时间又可分为前收费(Front-end Load)和后收费(Back-end Load)。前者在申购时收取，后者则在赎回时收取，并可以随着持有期的增加而递减。
基金年度运作费用包括管理费、托管费、12b-1费(1979年美国证监会允许基金从其资产中支付的销售费用)，以及过户代理费、律师费、审计费、股东大会费等。为了激励基金管理人，许多基金还设有业绩表现费。
ETF是英文全称exchange traded fund的缩写,字面翻译为“交易所交易基金”(实际上,国内以前大都采用这一名称),但为了突出ETF这一金融产品的内涵和本质特点,现在一般将ETF称为“交易型开放式指数基金”。
ETF是一种跟踪“标的指数”变化,且在交易所上市的开放式基金,投资者可以像买卖股票那样,通过买卖ETF,从而实现对指数的买卖。因此,ETF可以理解为“股票化的指数投资产品”。 
从本质上讲,ETF属于开放式基金的一种特殊类型,它综合了封闭式基金和开放式基金的优点,投资者既可以向基金管理公司申购或赎回基金份额,同时,又可以像封闭式基金一样在证券市场上按市场价格买卖ETF份额。不过,ETF的申购赎回必须以一篮子股票换取基金份额或者以基金份额换回一篮子股票,这是ETF有别于其它开放式基金的主要特征之一。 
与传统封闭式基金、开放式基金相比,ETF有很多优点。 
首先,ETF克服了封闭式基金折价交易的缺陷。封闭式基金折价交易是全球金融市场的共同特征,也是迄今为止经典金融理论尚无法很好解释的现象,被称为“封闭式基金折价之迷”。这一现象在我国表现得尤为突出。当前在沪深证券交易所上市的54只封闭式基金二级市场交易价格,相对于其单位净值,平均折价幅度接近30%以上。由于封闭基金的折价交易,全球封闭式基金的发展总体呈日益萎缩状态,其本来具有的一些优点也被掩盖。ETF基金由于投资者既可在二级市场交易,也可直接向基金管理人以一篮子股票进行申购与赎回,这就为投资者在一、二级市场套利提供了可能。正是这种套利机制的存在,抑制了基金二级市场价格与基金净值的偏离,从而使二级市场交易价格与基金净值基本保持一致。 
其次,ETF基金相对于开放式基金,具有交易成本低、交易方便,交易效率高等特点。目前投资者投资开放式基金一般是通过银行、券商等代销机构向基金管理公司进行基金的申购、赎回,股票型开放式基金交易手续费用一般在1%以上,一般赎回款在赎回后3日才能到帐,购买不同的基金需要去不同的基金公司或者银行等代理机构,交易便利程度还不太高。但投资者如果投资ETF基金,可以像股票、封闭式基金一样,直接通过交易所按照公开报价进行交易,资金次日就能到帐。 
最后,ETF一般采取完全被动的指数化投资策略,跟踪、拟合某一具有代表性的标的指数,因此管理费非常低,操作透明度非常高,可以让投资者以较低的成本投资于一篮子标的指数中的成份股票,以实现充分分散投资,从而有效地规避股票投资的非系统性风险。
Vicinity　　　n.周围地区，临近地区
proximity  n.接近性,亲近,近似；接近，邻近
hedonic price model　特征价格模型
regression model　回归模型
经济变量的变化是由于另一些解释变量的变化而变化的。将一个关心的经济变量对解释变量做最小二乘法的回归，建立线性或是非线性回归模型，将解释变量在未来时期的变化数值带入回归模型，计算得出关心的经济变量的预测值。
limited liability  n.有限责任
offshore  n.离岸的  境外；海外 （内&港）
limited partnership  有限责任合伙  有限合伙
两个或以上合伙人合作经营业务，其中一个或以上合伙人只需承担相等于投资额的责任。有限责任合伙人不能收取股息，但可直接分享收入及分担开支
Fund Of Funds  基金之基金 （内&港）；综合基金 （港）
A mutual fund that invests in other mutual funds. 
This method is sometimes known as "multi-management". 
Due diligence  尽职调查 勤勉尽责；
指为了达成承销一笔证券发行的目的，针对某公司或企业的业务、财务状况和前景(包括其面对的主要风险) 而进行的一个全面的调查。尽职调查一般可分为业务尽职调查和法律尽职调查两类。
1. 对可能进行投资的调查或审核。尽职调查旨在确证销售项目牵涉的所有重要事实
2. 一般而言，尽职调查指一名合理的人士在签订协议或与另一方进行交易前应该采取的调查行动
对公司所有活动的精确计划和对生意决定的意义的审查 (经济学)
backfire  n.  逆火, 放火, 回火v.  放出逆火; 事与愿违; 失败
short covering   补空仓；空头补进
Short Covering
Purchasing securities in order to close an open short position. This is done by buying the same type and number of securities that were sold short. Most often, traders cover their shorts whenever they speculate that the securities will rise. In order to make a profit, a short seller must cover the shorts by purchasing the security below the original selling price.Also referred to as "buy to cover" or "buyback".
Investopedia Says:
For example, suppose a trader has sold short 50 shares of ABC stock at a price of $10 per share because he speculated that ABC will not be successful in the near future. Unfortunately for the trader, the company has been very lucky recently and its price rises to $15 per share. In order to limit his losses, this trader decides to cover his short position by buying back the 50 short sold shares at a price of $15 per share.
Cherry Picking  选出最有利的（投资等） 摘樱桃
1. 投资者挑选其他投资组合中表现良好、并预期会继续表现良好的投资
2. 有关破产诉讼，法庭承认对破产公司有利的合约，宣告不利的合约无效
1. The act of investors choosing investments that have performed well within another portfolio in anticipation that the trend will continue. 
2. Relating to bankruptcy proceedings whereby the courts uphold contracts favorable to bankrupt companies, but annul those that are unfavorable.
Investopedia Says:
1. Used by both fund managers and individual investors, cherry picking is a method that reduces the amount of time required for researching stocks as the pool of securities in which investors pick from is significantly narrowed. For example, rather than having to research all the stocks that deal with semi-conductors within the exchanges, an investor may instead look at a few mutual funds investing exclusively in these products and research only those investments picked out to be the best performers. 
2. Legislation has been changing in order to stop this practice from continuing.
另：指投资者直接从其它投资者被证明有效的投资组合里挑选股票从而很大程度上减少自己的研究投入和风险的方法。 
很多个人投资者跟随购买一些表现良好基金公司投资的股票就是摘樱桃行为，机构投资者也有时摘别人的樱桃，比如海外有诸多投资基金的投资策略就是购买巴菲特投资的公司股票。摘樱桃投资方法虽然可以大大缩小挑选股票的范围，减少研究时间，并且风险也相对较低，但投资者还是无法省去详细研究“摘下来”的股票和公司的工作，否则买入容易，如果对公司业务发展和动态信息没有详细掌握，何时应该卖出就成了问题，易于陷入交易上的被动。所以，找到樱桃树，还需主心骨。
Fittest　　适者生存
defunct 　adj.1. 死了的; (公司)倒闭了的, 已不存在的2. 已废止的, 已失效的3. [the defunct]【律】死人a defunct law已废除的法规
closely held company  n.股东人数有限的公司　封闭型控股公司　不公共招股公司
file for  申请; 报名参加竞选
file for bankruptcy protection 申请破产保护
struggling  adj.1. 奋斗的(尤指为生计、名利等)2. 挣扎的
involvement  n.1. 卷入, 缠绕2. 牵连[连累]的事务, 复杂的情况3. 困难; 财政困难
exposure  暴露风险,承受风险,风险
Backwardation  现货升水；现货溢价；倒价〔期货〕； （也可译：交割延期费：指在证券交易所中，卖方无法如期交割证券时为要取得延期交割的权利所必须支付若干百分比的费用及利息）
A theory developed in respect to the price of a futures contract and the contract's time to expire. Backwardation says that as the contract approaches expiration, the futures contract will trade at a higher price compared to when the contract was further away from expiration. This is said to occur due to the convenience yield being higher than the prevailing risk free rate.
Investopedia Says:
When backwardation does occur in a futures market it has been suggested that an individual in the short position would benefit the most by delivering as late as possible.Backwardation in futures contracts was called "normal backwardation" by economist John Maynard Keynes. This is because he believed that a price movement like the one suggested by backwardation was not random but consistent with the prevailing market conditions.
Backwardation is the opposite of contango. 
另：在远期合约签订之时，它没有价值DDD支付只在合约规定的未来某一日进行。在远期市场中经常用到两个术语： 
　　1、如果即期价格低于远期价格，市场状况被描述为正向市场或溢价（Contango）。 
　　2、如果即期价格高于远期价格，市场状况被描述为反向市场或差价（Backwardation）。
　　远期价格的决定
　　原则上，计算远期价格是用交易时的即期价格加上持有成本（carrycost）。根据商品的情况，持有成本要考虑的因素包括仓储、保险和运输等等。 
　　远期价格＝即期或现金价格＋持有成本
Contango－升水：远期价格高于近期价格。正常情况下，市场一般处于contango，这是因为远期交割的货物会有利息和仓储费用，所以高于近期。 
但受多头挤兑空头、短期内供需缺口、突然事件等因素影响，三月期货市场可能出现贴水，也即我们常说的backwardation。 
各日期之间是否Contango或backwardation，没有固定规律，完全取决于市场。
Contango　期货升水［溢价］；（交易延期费(伦敦股票交易所),交货延期费,额外付款）
When the futures price is above the expected future spot price. Consequently, the price will decline to the spot price before the delivery date.
Investopedia Says:
This is the opposite of backwardation.
Roll Yield　迁仓收益　展期收益
The amount of return generated in a backwardated futures market that is achieved by rolling a short-term contract into a longer-term contract and profiting from the convergence toward a higher spot price. Profiting from roll yield is a common goal for many strategies used by traders in the futures market.
Investopedia Says:
Backwardation occurs when a futures contract will trade at a higher price as it approaches expiration compared to when the contract is farther away from expiration. Rolling into less expensive futures contracts allows the trader to consistently profit from the rise in a futures' price as it nears expiration. 
The biggest risk to this strategy is that the market will shift to contango (opposite as backwardation). This type of changing market has led to major losses by various hedge funds in the past and is the reason why it should only be attempted by experienced traders.
Alternative Investment翻译成中文为“另类投资”，也译为“替代投资”、“非主流投资”。另类投资是指在股票、债券及期货等公开交易平台之外的投资方式，包括私募股权(Private Equity)、风险投资(Venture Capita1)、地产、矿业、杠杆并购(Leveraged Buyout)、基金的基金(Fund of Funds)等诸多品种。
Private equity此词一般是指非上市公司的股权，但private equity fund并非指仅投资非上市公司股票的基金，而是指由private equity firm(私人直接投资公司)管理的，以策略投资者(strategic investor)的角色积极参与投资标的的经营与改造的基金。这种基金像创投基金(venture capital fund)那样，会投资未上市的新兴企业，期待靠投资标的的首次公开招股(IPO)大赚一笔，另外也会以那些陷入经营困境的上市公司为目标。他们会取得这类上市公司的主导权，然后通常会将之私有化(下市)，放手改造后再重新上市大赚一笔。
所谓私募(private placement)与公募(public placement/offering)是以证券发行方式的差别来区分的，前者是向特定的投资者私下筹募资金，后者则是公开邀请公众认购证券，须遵守有关公开发行证券的严格法规。就此而言，对冲基金(hedge fund)是一种私募基金，而共同基金(mutual fund)则是一种公募型的基金，前者所受的监管相当宽松，仅以富豪级的投资人或机构投资者为销售对象，后者则面对一般大众，受证券监管当局较严格的监督管理。

